Ohio, session 136, SB300.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 113.05, 113.051, 113.09, 113.16, 117.44, 118.05, 120.52, 128.54, 135.01, 135.032, 135.14, 135.143, 135.22, 135.35, 135.45, 135.451, 151.01, 164.09, 183.51, 317.36, 319.63, 321.46, 321.47, 323.611, 956.13, 1557.03, 3307.12, 3333.374, 3334.08, 3334.11, 3705.242, 3737.945, 3953.231, 4511.19, 4705.09, 4705.10, 5528.54, 5725.22, 5725.23, 5729.05, 5729.10, 5739.17, 5747.51, and 6101.51 be amended; section 135.45 (113.07) be amended for the purpose of adopting a new section number as indicated in parentheses; and section 113.052 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 113.05. (A) As used in sections 113.05 to 113.40 of the Revised Code: (1) "Account," "appropriation," "disbursement," "electronic funds transfer," "fund," and "warrant" have the same meanings as in section 131.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Active deposit" and "interim deposit" have the same meanings as in section 135.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Assets" has the same meaning as in section 131.01 of the Revised Code, but does not include items held in safekeeping by the treasurer of state including, but not limited to, collateral pledged to a state agency. (3) "Custodial funds" do not include items held in safekeeping by the treasurer of state including, but not limited to, collateral pledged to a state agency. (B) The state treasury consists of the moneys, claims, bonds, notes, other obligations, stocks, and other securities, receipts or other evidences of ownership, and other intangible assets of the state that are required by law to be deposited in the state treasury or are otherwise a part of the state treasury. All assets of the state treasury shall be kept in the rooms assigned the treasurer of state, with the vaults, safes, and other appliances therein; provided, that: (1) Securities and other assets required by law to be deposited or kept in the state treasury may be deposited for safekeeping with the federal reserve bank of Cleveland, Ohio or , secured and insured depositories in or out of this state, or other qualified custodians as designated by the treasurer of state. (2) Public moneys may Active deposits shall be kept in constituted state depositories designated by the state board of deposit pursuant to section 135.12 of the Revised Code and secured for repayment pursuant to section 135.18 of the Revised Code. (3) Interim deposits shall be invested in accordance with section 135.143 of the Revised Code and held in safekeeping pursuant to division (B)(1) of this section. (C)(C)(1) The custodial funds of the treasurer of state consist of the moneys, claims, bonds, notes, other obligations, stocks, and other securities, receipts or other evidences of ownership, and other intangible assets that are required by law to be kept in the custody of the treasurer of state but are not part of the state treasury. All assets of the custodial funds of the treasurer of state shall be kept in either or both any of the following: (1)(a) The rooms assigned the treasurer of state, with the vaults, safes, and other appliances therein; (2)(b) The federal reserve bank of Cleveland, Ohio or , secured and insured depositories in or out of this state, or other qualified custodians as designated by the treasurer of state; (c) Active deposits shall be kept in depositories designated by the state board of deposit pursuant to section 135.12 of the Revised Code and secured for repayment pursuant to section 135.18 of the Revised Code; (d) Interim deposits may be invested in the Ohio subdivision's fund established in the custody of the treasurer of state pursuant to section 113.07 of the Revised Code; (e) When the Revised Code allows the administrator or owner of the custodial fund to invest in securities or other assets, those securities and other assets shall be held in safekeeping pursuant to division (C)(1)(b) of this section. (2) Notwithstanding any contrary provision in division (B) or (C) of this section, money held in a depository account of a partnership, trust, limited liability company, corporation, or any other legal entity authorized to transact business in this state that has been established for the investment of funds pursuant to section 145.11, 742.11, 3307.15, 3309.15, 3334.11, 4123.44, or 5505.06 of the Revised Code is not public money or an active deposit for the purposes of Chapters 113. and 135. of the Revised Code and shall not be considered to be in the custody of the treasurer of state or subject to the state board of deposit. (D) Assets of the state treasury shall not be commingled with assets of the custodial funds of the treasurer of state. Sec. 113.051. (A) The treasurer of state or the officer who performs the duties of the office of treasurer of state is the custodian of the funds required by law to be kept in the custody of the treasurer of state. The In connection with the custodial funds described in division (C) of section 113.05 of the Revised Code or as otherwise required by law, the custodial duties of the treasurer of state include safekeeping the custodial funds active deposits and investment assets of an owner or administrator; collecting principal, dividends, distributions, and interest on custodial funds active deposits and investments of an owner or administrator; and paying for, transferring, and collecting the purchase or sale price of investments. The duties of the treasurer of state do not include making investment decisions of an owner, administrator, or its authorized agents or monitoring compliance with an owner's or administrator's internal investment policies. The treasurer of state is not responsible for the investment decisions of an owner, administrator, or agent, compliance with the owner's or administrator's internal investment policies, or any unlawful activities of an owner, administrator, or its authorized agents. (B) The treasurer of state may enter into a sub-custody or other agency agreement with a trustee who meets the requirements of section 135.18 1111.02 of the Revised Code to execute the custodial duties required by lawunder division (A) of this section. The agreement shall apply to the custodial funds and investment assets of an owner or administrator. The agreement may provide that the trustee has primary responsibility for custody of the funds and investments and any related depository accounts in order to execute an owner's or administrator's instructions. The treasurer of state or the treasurer's authorized agent may enter into additional agreements as necessary to facilitate an owner's or administrator's transactions. Sec. 113.052. (A) The treasurer of state, employees of the treasurer of state, and their bondspersons or sureties, when depositing or investing funds pursuant to this chapter and Chapter 135. of the Revised Code, shall be relieved from any liability for the loss of any public money deposited or invested by them when they have acted pursuant to law. Further, in no event shall liability attach to the treasurer of state or employees of the treasurer of state where the proximate cause of any loss related to the investment in, sale, or liquidation of any investment when such loss is due to a risk arising from an investment prudently made under their investment authority set forth in this chapter and Chapter 135. of the Revised Code. (B) This section applies to the deposit or investment of any public money, including funds in the following categories: (1) Active deposits of the state; (2) Interim deposits of the state; (3) The state treasurer's investment pool described in section 113.07 of the Revised Code; (4) Temporary investment pools of bond proceeds; (5) Funds in the Ohio subdivision's fund described in section 113.07 of the Revised Code; (6) Securities lending as authorized by section 135.47 of the Revised Code; (7) Investments related to any strategic reserve that the treasurer of state or employees of the treasurer of state are authorized to invest pursuant to the Revised Code. Sec. 135.45 113.07. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, a treasurer, governing board, or investing authority of a subdivision or state entity may pay public moneys of the subdivision or state entity into the Ohio subdivision's fund, which may be established in the custody of the treasurer of state. The treasurer of state shall invest the moneys in the fund in separately managed accounts and pooled accounts, including the state treasurer's investment pool, in the same manner, in the same types of instruments, and subject to the same limitations provided for the deposit and investment of interim moneys of the state, except that the fund shall not be invested in the linked deposits authorized under section 135.61 of the Revised Code. A treasurer, governing board, or investing authority of a subdivision or state entity shall designate two or more authorized signers associated with each account of the subdivision or state entity that is managed by the treasurer of state in the treasurer of state's investment pool. The authorized person shall deposit redemptions made from a subdivision's or state entity's account only into the subdivision's treasury or state entity's custodial account at the public depository so designated by the subdivision's governing board or the state board of deposit. (B)(1) On and after July 1, 1997, a treasurer, governing board, or investing authority of a subdivision or state entity that has not entered into an agreement with the treasurer of state under division (C) of this section shall not invest public moneys of the subdivision or state entity in a pooled account of the Ohio subdivision's fund under division (B)(6) of section 135.14 of the Revised Code or division (A)(6) of section 135.35 of the Revised Code if the pool does not maintain the highest letter or numerical rating provided by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization. (2) Upon receipt of notice that the pool does not maintain the highest letter or numerical rating required under division (B)(1) of this section, the treasurer of state shall have ninety days to obtain the required highest letter or numerical rating. If the treasurer of state fails to obtain the required highest letter or numerical rating, the treasurer of state shall have an additional one hundred eighty days to develop a plan to dissolve the pool. The plan shall include reasonable standards for the equitable return of public moneys in the pool to those subdivisions and state entities participating in the pool. (3) Treasurers, governing boards, or investing authorities of subdivisions and state entities participating in the pool shall not be required to divest in the pool during the initial one hundred eighty days following the treasurer of state's receipt of notice under division (B)(2) of this section. (C) A treasurer, governing board, or investing authority of a subdivision or state entity that wishes to invest public moneys of the subdivision in a separately managed account or pooled account of the Ohio subdivision's fund may enter into an agreement with the treasurer of state that sets forth the manner in which the money is to be invested. The treasurer of state shall invest the moneys in accordance with the agreement, subject to the limitations set forth in division (A) of this section. For purposes of this division, the limitation on investments in debt interests provided in division (A)(11)(a) of section 135.143 of the Revised Code shall not apply to a subdivision's or state entity's excess reserves. (D) The treasurer of state shall adopt such rules as are necessary for the implementation of this section, including the efficient administration of and accounting for the separately managed accounts and pooled accounts, including the state treasurer's investment pool, and the specification of minimum amounts that may be paid into such pools and minimum periods of time for which such payments shall be retained in the pools. The rules shall provide for the administrative expenses of the separately managed accounts and pooled accounts, including the state treasurer's investment pool, to be paid from the earnings and for the interest earnings in excess of such expenses to be credited to the several treasurers, governing boards, and investing authorities participating in a pool in a manner which equitably reflects the differing amounts of their respective investments in the pool and the differing periods of time for which such amounts are in the pool. (E) The treasurer of state shall give bond with sufficient sureties, payable to the treasurers, governing boards, and investing authorities of subdivisions and state entities participating in the fund, for the benefit of the subdivisions whose moneys are paid into the fund for investment, in the total penal sum of two hundred fifty thousand dollars, conditioned for the faithful discharge of the treasurer of state's duties in relation to the fund. (F) The treasurer of state and the treasurer of state's bonders or surety are liable for the loss of any interim moneys of the state, state entities, and subdivisions invested under this section to the same extent the treasurer of state and the treasurer of state's bonders or surety are liable for the loss of public moneys under section 135.19 of the Revised Code. (G) As used in this section: (1) "Interim moneys" and "governing board" have the same meanings as in section 135.01 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) "Subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 135.01 of the Revised Code, but also includes a county, a municipal corporation that has adopted a charter under Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, or any government entity for which the fund is a permissible investment. (b) "State entity" means the general assembly, the supreme court, the court of claims, the office of an elected state officer, or a department, bureau, board, office, commission, agency, institution of higher education, retirement system, or other institution or instrumentality of this state established by the constitution or laws of this state. (c) "Public moneys of a subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 135.01 of the Revised Code, but also includes "public moneys" as defined in section 135.31 of the Revised Code, and funds held in the custody of the treasurer of state notwithstanding any limitations on the permissible investments of such funds. (3) "Treasurer" has the same meaning as in sections 135.01 and 135.31 of the Revised Code. (4) "Investing authority" has the same meaning as in section 135.31 of the Revised Code. (5) "Excess reserves" means the amount of a subdivision's public moneys that exceed the average of a subdivision's annual operating expenses in the immediately preceding three fiscal years. Sec. 113.09. Except as provided in section 113.10 of the Revised Code, all All moneys deposited with the treasurer of state, the disposition of which is not otherwise provided for by law, shall be credited to the general revenue fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. If a warrant for the payment of money from the state treasury has been illegally or improperly issued, or the amount of a warrant exceeds the sum that should have been named therein, and payment of such warrant or excess has been made by the treasurer of state, the director of budget and management shall, unless the account of the appropriation from which it was paid has been closed, credit the amount collected to such appropriation; but, if such account has been closed, the director shall credit the amount so collected to the fund on which the warrant was originally drawn. All investment earnings on moneys deposited in the state treasury shall be credited to the general revenue fund unless: (A) The disposition of the earnings is otherwise provided for by law; (B) The director has provided in the plan approved under section 131.36 of the Revised Code that a different fund is entitled to the earnings. Sec. 113.16. If upon At the conclusion of an audit there is found in the state treasury and the custodial funds of the treasurer of state the moneys, claims, bonds, notes, other obligations, stocks, and other securities, receipts or other evidences of ownership, and other intangible assets which should be in the state treasury or in the custodial funds of the treasurer of stateunder section 113.14 of the Revised Code, the auditors shall make triplicate written certificates of the fact over a report of their findings and the report shall contain their official signatures. One of the certificates reports shall be delivered to the treasurer of state and recorded in his office, one to the auditor of state and recorded in his office, and one to the governor and recorded in his office. If upon an audit, under section 113.14 of the Revised Code, a deficiency is found in the moneys, claims, bonds, notes, other obligations, stocks, and other securities, receipts or other evidences of ownership, or other intangible assets which should be in the state treasury or in the custodial funds of the treasurer of state, or any irregularity or omission in the business of the office or in keeping accounts, the auditors shall state particularly the deficiency, irregularity, or omission. Sec. 117.44. To enhance local officials' background and working knowledge of government accounting, budgeting and financing, financial report preparation, and the rules adopted by the auditor of state, the auditor of state shall hold training programs for persons elected for the first time as township fiscal officers, city auditors, and village clerks, between the first day of December and the first day of April immediately following a general election for any of these offices. Similar training may also be provided to any township fiscal officer, city auditor, or village clerk who is appointed to fill a vacancy or who is elected in a special election. The auditor of state also shall develop and provide an annual training program of continuing education for village clerks. The auditor of state shall determine the manner, content, and length of the training programs after consultation with appropriate statewide organizations of local governmental officials. The auditor of state shall charge the political subdivisions that the trainees represent a registration fee that will meet actual and necessary expenses of the training, including instructor fees, site acquisition costs, and the cost of course materials. The necessary personal expenses incurred by the officials as a result of attending the training program shall be borne by the political subdivisions they represent. The auditor of state shall allow any other interested person to attend any of the training programs that the auditor of state holds pursuant to this section; provided, that before attending any such training program, the interested person shall pay to the auditor of state the full registration fee that the auditor of state has set for the training program. The auditor of state may provide any other appropriate training or educational programs that may be developed and offered by the auditor of state or in collaboration with one or more other state agencies, political subdivisions, or other public or private entities. There is hereby established in the state treasury the auditor of state training program fund, to be used by the auditor of state for the actual and necessary expenses of any training programs held pursuant to this section or section 321.46 of the Revised Code. All registration fees collected under this section shall be paid into the fund. Sec. 118.05. (A) Pursuant to the powers of the general assembly and for the purposes of this chapter, upon the occurrence of a fiscal emergency in any municipal corporation, county, or township, as determined pursuant to section 118.04 of the Revised Code, there is established, with respect to that municipal corporation, county, or township, a body both corporate and politic constituting an agency and instrumentality of the state and performing essential governmental functions of the state to be known as the "financial planning and supervision commission for _______________ (name of municipal corporation, county, or township)," which, in that name, may exercise all authority vested in such a commission by this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in division (L) of this section, a separate commission is established with respect to each municipal corporation, county, or township as to which there is a fiscal emergency as determined under this chapter. (B) A commission shall consist of the following voting members: (1) Four ex officio members: the treasurer of state; the director of budget and management; in the case of a municipal corporation, the mayor of the municipal corporation and the presiding officer of the legislative authority of the municipal corporation; in the case of a county, a member of the board of county commissioners and the county auditor; in the case of a county that has adopted a charter under Article X, Ohio Constitution, and under that charter has both a county executive and a county fiscal officer, the county executive and the county fiscal officer; and in the case of a township, a member of the board of township trustees and the county auditor. The treasurer of state may designate a deputy treasurer or director an individual within the office of the treasurer of state or any other appropriate person who is not an employee of the treasurer of state's office; the director of budget and management may designate an individual within the office of budget and management or any other appropriate person who is not an employee of the office of budget and management; the presiding officer of the legislative authority of the municipal corporation may designate any other member of the legislative authority; the board of county commissioners may designate any other member of the board or the fiscal officer of the county; the fiscal officer of a county that has adopted a charter under Article X, Ohio Constitution, may designate an individual within the county fiscal office; the county auditor may designate an individual within the county auditor's office; and the board of township trustees may designate any other member of the board or the fiscal officer of the township to attend the meetings of the commission when the ex officio member is absent or unable for any reason to attend. A designee, when present, shall be counted in determining whether a quorum is present at any meeting of the commission and may vote and participate in all proceedings and actions of the commission. The designations shall be in writing, executed by the ex officio member or entity making the designation, and filed with the secretary of the commission. The designations may be changed from time to time in like manner, but due regard shall be given to the need for continuity. (2) If a municipal corporation, county, or township has a population of at least one thousand, three additional members appointed not later than fifteen days after the auditor of state determines that a fiscal emergency exists as follows: For a municipal corporation, the governor shall appoint one member; the mayor shall appoint one member confirmed by the legislative authority of the municipal corporation; and the county auditor of the county in which the largest portion of the territory of the municipal corporation is located shall appoint one member. The county auditor may appoint the county auditor to the commission. For a county, the governor shall appoint one member and the board of county commissioners shall appoint two members. In the case of a county that has adopted a charter under Article X, Ohio Constitution, and under that charter has both a county executive and a county council, the governor shall appoint one member, the county executive shall appoint one member, and the county council shall appoint one member. A member of the board of county commissioners, a county executive, or a member of the county council is ineligible for appointment to the commission under this paragraph. For a township, the governor shall appoint one member and the board of township trustees shall appoint two members. A member of the board of township trustees is ineligible for appointment to the commission under this paragraph. Each of the three appointed members shall serve during the life of the commission, subject to removal by the appointing authority for misfeasance, nonfeasance, or malfeasance in office. In the event of the death, resignation, incapacity, removal, or ineligibility to serve of an appointed member, the appointing authority that appointed the member shall appoint a successor, except as otherwise provided in division (M) of this section. Each appointed member shall be an individual: Who has knowledge and experience in financial matters, financial management, or business organization or operations; Whose residency, office, or principal place of professional or business activity is situated within the municipal corporation, county, or township, except that a county auditor who serves on the commission of a municipal corporation is not required to reside or have an office or principal place of professional or business activity in the municipal corporation; Who shall not become a candidate for elected public office while serving as a member of the commission, except a county auditor who serves on the commission of a municipal corporation may be a candidate for reelection to the county auditor's office. (C) Immediately after appointment of the initial appointed members of the commission, the governor shall call the first meeting of the commission and shall cause written notice of the time, date, and place of the first meeting to be given to each member of the commission at least forty-eight hours in advance of the meeting. (D) The director of budget and management shall serve as chairperson of the commission. The commission shall elect one of its members to serve as vice-chairperson and may appoint a secretary and any other officers, who need not be members of the commission, it considers necessary. The chairperson may remove an appointed member if that member fails to attend three meetings. In that event, the appointing authority shall fill the vacancy in the same manner as the original appointment, except as otherwise provided in division (M) of this section. (E) The commission may adopt and alter bylaws and rules, which shall not be subject to section 111.15 or Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, for the conduct of its affairs and for the manner, subject to this chapter, in which its powers and functions shall be exercised and embodied. (F) Four members of a commission established pursuant to divisions (B)(1) and (2) of this section constitute a quorum of the commission. The affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the commission is necessary for any action taken by vote of the commission. No vacancy in the membership of the commission shall impair the rights of a quorum by such vote to exercise all the rights and perform all the duties of the commission. Members of the commission, and their designees, are not disqualified from voting by reason of the functions of the other office they hold and are not disqualified from exercising the functions of the other office with respect to the municipal corporation, county, or township, its officers, or the commission. (G) The auditor of state shall serve as the "financial supervisor" to the commission unless the auditor of state elects to contract for that service. As used in this chapter, "financial supervisor" means the auditor of state. (H) At the request of the commission, the auditor of state shall designate employees of the auditor of state's office to assist the commission and the financial supervisor and to coordinate the work of the auditor of state's office and the financial supervisor. Upon the determination of a fiscal emergency in any municipal corporation, county, or township, the municipal corporation, county, or township shall provide the commission with such reasonable office space in the principal building housing city, county, or township government, where feasible, as it determines is necessary to carry out its duties under this chapter. (I) The financial supervisor, the members of the commission, the auditor of state, and any person authorized to act on behalf of or assist them shall not be personally liable or subject to any suit, judgment, or claim for damages resulting from the exercise of or failure to exercise the powers, duties, and functions granted to them in regard to their functioning under this chapter, but the commission, the financial supervisor, the auditor of state, and those other persons shall be subject to mandamus proceedings to compel performance of their duties under this chapter and with respect to any debt obligations issued pursuant or subject to this chapter. (J) At the request of the commission, the administrative head of any state agency shall temporarily assign personnel skilled in accounting and budgeting procedures to assist the commission or the financial supervisor in its duties as financial supervisor. (K) The appointed members of the commission who are members of the board of township trustees or are not elected officials are not subject to section 102.02 of the Revised Code. Each appointed member of the commission shall file with the commission a signed written statement setting forth the general nature of sales of goods, property, or services or of loans to the municipal corporation, county, or township with respect to which that commission is established, in which the appointed member has a pecuniary interest or in which any member of the appointed member's immediate family, as defined in section 102.01 of the Revised Code, or any corporation, partnership, or enterprise of which the appointed member is an officer, director, or partner, or of which the appointed member or a member of the appointed member's immediate family, as so defined, owns more than a five per cent interest, has a pecuniary interest, and of which sale, loan, or interest such member has knowledge. The statement shall be supplemented from time to time to reflect changes in the general nature of any such sales or loans. (L) A commission is not established with respect to any village or township with a population of less than one thousand as of the most recent federal decennial census. Upon the occurrence of a fiscal emergency in such a village or township, the auditor of state shall serve as the financial supervisor of the village or township and shall have all the powers and responsibilities of a commission, including the powers and responsibilities described in section 118.07 of the Revised Code. (M)(1) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of division (B)(2) or (D) of this section, if one or more appointed seats on a commission that was established before October 17, 2017, are or become vacant, division (M) of this section applies concerning the commission. (2) In the case of a commission established with respect to a municipal corporation: (a) If one such vacancy exists on the commission, the county auditor of the county in which the largest portion of the territory of the municipal corporation is located shall appoint a member to fill the vacancy. The county auditor may appoint the county auditor to the commission. Of the two remaining appointed members of the commission, the mayor shall determine, not later than the fifteenth day after the effective date of this amendment November 2, 2018, or the fifteenth day after the vacancy occurs, whichever is later, which of those members shall be considered the member appointed by the mayor for purposes of divisions (B)(2) and (D) of this section, and the other appointed member shall be considered the member appointed by the governor for purposes of divisions (B)(2) and (D) of this section. (b) If two such vacancies exist on the commission, the county auditor of the county in which the largest portion of the territory of the municipal corporation is located shall appoint a member to fill one vacancy, and the mayor shall appoint a member confirmed by the legislative authority of the municipal corporation to fill the other vacancy. The county auditor may appoint the county auditor to the commission. The remaining appointed member of the commission shall be considered the member appointed by the governor for purposes of divisions (B)(2) and (D) of this section. (c) If three such vacancies exist on the commission, the members shall be appointed in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section. (3) In the case of a commission established with respect to a township: (a) If one such vacancy exists on the commission, the board of township trustees shall appoint a member to fill the vacancy, who shall not be a member of the board of township trustees. Of the two remaining appointed members of the commission, the board of township trustees shall determine, not later than the fifteenth day after the effective date of this amendment November 2, 2018, or the fifteenth day after the vacancy occurs, whichever is later, which of those members shall be considered the member appointed by the board of township trustees for purposes of divisions (B)(2) and (D) of this section, and the other appointed member shall be considered the member appointed by the governor for purposes of divisions (B)(2) and (D) of this section. (b) If two such vacancies exist on the commission, the board of township trustees shall appoint two members to fill the vacancies, who shall not be members of the board of township trustees. The remaining appointed member of the commission shall be considered the member appointed by the governor for purposes of divisions (B)(2) and (D) of this section. (c) If three such vacancies exist on the commission, the members shall be appointed in accordance with division (B)(2) of this section. (4) After one or more vacancies in appointed seats on a commission have been filled under division (M) of this section, any subsequent vacancy or vacancies shall be filled under division (B)(2) or (D) of this section, as applicable. Sec. 120.52. There is hereby established in the state treasury the legal aid fund, which shall be for the charitable public purpose of providing financial assistance to legal aid societies that provide civil legal services to indigents. The fund shall contain all funds credited to it by the treasurer of state pursuant to sections 1901.26, 1907.24, 2303.201, 3953.231, 4705.09, and 4705.10 of the Revised Code. The treasurer of state may invest moneys contained in the legal aid fund in any manner authorized by the Revised Code for the investment of state moneys. However, no such investment shall interfere with any apportionment, allocation, or payment of moneys as required by section 120.53 of the Revised Code. The state public defender, through the Ohio access to justice foundation, shall administer the payment of moneys out of the fund. Four and one-half per cent of the moneys in the fund shall be reserved for the actual, reasonable costs of administering sections 120.51 to 120.55 and sections 1901.26, 1907.24, 2303.201, 3953.231, 4705.09, and 4705.10 of the Revised Code. Moneys that are reserved for administrative costs but that are not used for actual, reasonable administrative costs shall be set aside for use in the manner described in division (A) of section 120.521 of the Revised Code. The remainder of the moneys in the legal aid fund shall be distributed in accordance with section 120.53 of the Revised Code. The Ohio access to justice foundation shall establish, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, rules governing the administration of the legal aid fund, including the programs established under sections 1901.26, 1907.24, 2303.201, 4705.09, and 4705.10 of the Revised Code regarding interest on interest-bearing trust accounts of an attorney, law firm, or legal professional association. Sec. 128.54. (A)(1) For the purpose of receiving, distributing, and accounting for amounts received from the wireless 9-1-1 charges imposed under section 128.40 of the Revised Code and the next generation 9-1-1 access fees imposed under sections 128.41 and 128.42 of the Revised Code, the following funds are created in the state treasury: (a) The 9-1-1 government assistance fund; (b) The 9-1-1 administrative fund; (c) The 9-1-1 program fund; (d) The next generation 9-1-1 fund. (2) Amounts remitted under section 128.46 of the Revised Code shall be paid to the treasurer of state for deposit as follows: (a) Eighty-one and one-third per cent to the 9-1-1 government assistance fund. All interest earned on the 9-1-1 government assistance fund shall be credited to the fund. (b) Two-thirds of one per cent to the 9-1-1 administrative fund; (c) One and one-third per cent to the 9-1-1 program fund; (d) Sixteen and two-thirds per cent to the next generation 9-1-1 fund. (3) The tax commissioner shall use the 9-1-1 administrative fund to defray the costs incurred in carrying out this chapter. (4) The steering committee shall use the 9-1-1 program fund to defray the costs incurred by the steering committee in carrying out this chapter. (5) Annually, the tax commissioner, after paying administrative costs under division (A)(3) of this section, shall transfer any excess remaining in the 9-1-1 administrative fund to the next generation 9-1-1 fund, created under this section. (B) At the direction of the steering committee, the tax commissioner shall transfer the funds remaining in the 9-1-1 government assistance fund to the credit of the next generation 9-1-1 fund. All interest earned on the next generation 9-1-1 fund shall be credited to the fund. (C) From the funds created in division (A)(1) of this section, the director of budget and management shall, as funds are available, transfer to the tax refund fund, created under section 5703.052 of the Revised Code, amounts equal to the refunds certified by the tax commissioner under division (D) of section 128.47 of the Revised Code, in the same percentage as the certified refund amounts were deposited in those funds as specified in division (A)(2) of this section. (D) The department of administrative services may move funds between the next generation 9-1-1 fund and the 9-1-1 government assistance fund to ensure funding remains sustainable for both funds. Sec. 135.01. Except as otherwise provided in sections 135.14, 135.143, 135.181, and 135.182 of the Revised Code, as used in sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code: (A) "Active deposit" means a public deposit necessary to meet current demands on the treasury, or a fund that is in the custody of the treasurer of state but not part of the state treasury, and that is deposited in any of the following: (1) A commercial account that is payable or withdrawable, in whole or in part, on demand; (2) A negotiable order of withdrawal account as authorized in the "Consumer Checking Account Equity Act of 1980," 94 Stat. 146, 12 U.S.C.A. 1832(a); (3) A money market deposit account as authorized in the "Garn-St. Germain Depository Institutions Act of 1982," 96 Stat. 1501, 12 U.S.C. 3503. (B) "Auditor" includes the auditor of state and the auditor, or officer exercising the functions of an auditor, of any subdivision. (C) "Capital funds" means the sum of the following: the par value of the outstanding common capital stock, the par value of the outstanding preferred capital stock, the aggregate par value of all outstanding capital notes and debentures, and the surplus. In the case of an institution having offices in more than one county, the capital funds of such institution, for the purposes of sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code, relative to the deposit of the public moneys of the subdivisions in one such county, shall be considered to be that proportion of the capital funds of the institution that is represented by the ratio that the deposit liabilities of such institution originating at the office located in the county bears to the total deposit liabilities of the institution. (D) "Governing board" means, in the case of the state, the state board of deposit; in the case of all school districts and educational service centers except as otherwise provided in this section, the board of education or governing board of a service center, and when the case so requires, the board of commissioners of the sinking fund; in the case of a municipal corporation, the legislative authority, and when the case so requires, the board of trustees of the sinking fund; in the case of a township, the board of township trustees; in the case of a union or joint institution or enterprise of two or more subdivisions not having a treasurer, the board of directors or trustees thereof; and in the case of any other subdivision electing or appointing a treasurer, the directors, trustees, or other similar officers of such subdivision. The governing board of a subdivision electing or appointing a treasurer shall be the governing board of all other subdivisions for which such treasurer is authorized by law to act. In the case of a county school financing district that levies a tax pursuant to section 5705.215 of the Revised Code, the county board of education that serves as its taxing authority shall operate as a governing board. Any other county board of education shall operate as a governing board unless it adopts a resolution designating the board of county commissioners as the governing board for the county school district. (E) "Inactive deposit" means a public deposit other than an interim deposit or an active deposit. (F) "Interim deposit" means a deposit of interim moneys. "Interim moneys" means public moneys in the treasury of any subdivision after the award of inactive deposits has been made in accordance with section 135.07 of the Revised Code, which moneys are in excess of the aggregate amount of the inactive deposits as estimated by the governing board prior to the period of designation and which the governing board finds should not be deposited as active or inactive deposits for the reason that such moneys will not be needed for immediate use but will be needed before the end of the period of designation. In the case of the state treasury, "interim moneys" means public moneys that are not active deposits and may be invested in accordance with section 135.143 of the Revised Code. (G) "Permissible rate of interest" means a rate of interest that all eligible institutions mentioned in section 135.03 of the Revised Code are permitted to pay by law or valid regulations. (H) "Warrant clearance account" means an account established by the treasurer of state for either of the following purposes: (1) The deposit of active state moneys for the purposes of clearing state paper warrants or checks through the banking system, funding electronic benefit transfer cards, issuing stored value cards, or otherwise facilitating the settlement of state obligations; (2) The deposit of custodial moneys from an account held in the custody of the treasurer of state to facilitate settlement of obligations of the custodial fund. (I) "Public deposit" means public moneys deposited in a public depository pursuant to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. (J) "Public depository" means an institution which receives or holds any public deposits. (K) "Public moneys" means all moneys in the treasury of the state or any subdivision of the state, or moneys coming lawfully into the possession or custody of the treasurer of state or of the treasurer of any subdivision. "Public moneys of the state" includes all such moneys coming lawfully into the possession of the treasurer of state; and "public moneys of a subdivision" includes all such moneys coming lawfully into the possession of the treasurer of the subdivision. (L) "Subdivision" means any municipal corporation, except one which has adopted a charter under Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, and the charter or ordinances of the chartered municipal corporation set forth special provisions respecting the deposit or investment of its public moneys, or any school district or educational service center, a county school financing district, township, municipal or school district sinking fund, special taxing or assessment district, or other district or local authority electing or appointing a treasurer, except a county. In the case of a school district or educational service center, special taxing or assessment district, or other local authority for which a treasurer, elected or appointed primarily as the treasurer of a subdivision, is authorized or required by law to act as ex officio treasurer, the subdivision for which such a treasurer has been primarily elected or appointed shall be considered to be the "subdivision." The term also includes a union or joint institution or enterprise of two or more subdivisions, that is not authorized to elect or appoint a treasurer, and for which no ex officio treasurer is provided by law. (M) "Treasurer" means, in the case of the state, the treasurer of state and in the case of any subdivision, the treasurer, or officer exercising the functions of a treasurer, of such subdivision. In the case of a board of trustees of the sinking fund of a municipal corporation, the board of commissioners of the sinking fund of a school district, or a board of directors or trustees of any union or joint institution or enterprise of two or more subdivisions not having a treasurer, such term means such board of trustees of the sinking fund, board of commissioners of the sinking fund, or board of directors or trustees. (N) "Treasury investment board" of a municipal corporation means the mayor or other chief executive officer, the village solicitor or city director of law, and the auditor or other chief fiscal officer. (O) "No-load money market mutual fund" means a no-load money market mutual fund to which all of the following apply: (1) The fund is registered as an investment company under the "Investment Company Act of 1940," 54 Stat. 789, 15 U.S.C.A. 80a-1 to 80a-64; (2) The fund has the highest letter or numerical rating provided by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization; (3) The fund does not include any investment in a derivative. As used in division (O)(3) of this section, "derivative" means a financial instrument or contract or obligation whose value or return is based upon or linked to another asset or index, or both, separate from the financial instrument, contract, or obligation itself. Any security, obligation, trust account, or other instrument that is created from an issue of the United States treasury or is created from an obligation of a federal agency or instrumentality or is created from both is considered a derivative instrument. An eligible investment described in section 135.14 or 135.35 of the Revised Code with a variable interest rate payment, based upon a single interest payment or single index comprised of other investments provided for in division (B)(1) or (2) of section 135.14 of the Revised Code, is not a derivative, provided that such variable rate investment has a maximum maturity of two years. (P) "Public depositor" means the state or a subdivision, as applicable, that deposits public moneys in a public depository pursuant to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. (Q) "Uninsured public deposit" means the portion of a public deposit that is not insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or by any other agency or instrumentality of the federal government. Sec. 135.032. (A) For the purposes of this section: (1) "Institution" means an institution eligible to become a public depository under section 135.03 or 135.32 of the Revised Code or an eligible credit union, as defined in section 135.62 of the Revised Code. (2) "Prompt corrective action directive" means a directive issued by a regulatory authority of the United States as authorized under 12 U.S.C. 1790d or 1831o or, in the case of a nonfederally insured institution chartered in this state, a directive issued by the superintendent of the division of financial institutions. (B) An institution designated as a public depository under this chapter shall notify provide written notification within five business days, as defined in section 3901.81 of the Revised Code, to each governing board that made such designation if the institution becomes party to an active prompt corrective action directive. (C) Except as otherwise provided in division (D) of this section, an institution is ineligible to become a public depository under this chapter or to have active, interim, or inactive deposits awarded, placed, purchased, made, or designated pursuant to this chapter, if the institution is party to an active prompt corrective action directive. (D) If a governing board receives notice under division (B) of this section, or otherwise becomes aware that an institution the board designated as a public depository is party to an active prompt corrective action directive, the board may do either or both of the following, if the board determines that it is in the public interest: (1) Allow the public depository to continue to have active, interim, or inactive deposits awarded, placed, purchased, made, or designated for the remainder of the designation period; (2) Designate the institution as a public depository for additional succeeding designation periods. (E) If a governing board determines that one or both of the actions permitted by division (D) of this section are in the public interest, and public moneys are lost due to the failure of the public depository subject to the active prompt correction directive, all of the following are relieved from any liability for that loss: (1) The governing board's treasurer and deputy treasurer; (2) An executive director, director, or other person employed by the governing board, its treasurer, or its deputy treasurer; (3) Bondspersons and surety of any person described in divisions (E)(1) and (2) of this section. Sec. 135.14. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Treasurer" does not include the treasurer of state, and "governing board" does not include the state board of deposit. (2) "Other obligations" includes notes whether or not issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds. (B) The treasurer or governing board may invest or deposit any part or all of the interim moneys. The following classifications of obligations shall be eligible for such investment or deposit: (1) United States treasury bills, notes, bonds, or any other obligation or security issued by the United States treasury or any other obligation guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States. Nothing in the classification of eligible obligations set forth in division (B)(1) of this section or in the classifications of eligible obligations set forth in divisions (B)(2) to (7) of this section shall be construed to authorize any investment in stripped principal or interest obligations of such eligible obligations. (2) Bonds, notes, debentures, or any other obligations or securities issued by any federal government agency or instrumentality, including but not limited to, the federal national mortgage association, federal home loan bank, federal farm credit bank, federal home loan mortgage corporation, and government national mortgage association. All federal agency securities shall be direct issuances of federal government agencies or instrumentalities. (3) Interim deposits in the eligible institutions applying for interim moneys as provided in section 135.08 of the Revised Code. The award of interim deposits shall be made in accordance with section 135.09 of the Revised Code and the treasurer or the governing board shall determine the periods for which such interim deposits are to be made and shall award such interim deposits for such periods, provided that any eligible institution receiving an interim deposit award may, upon notification that the award has been made, decline to accept the interim deposit in which event the award shall be made as though the institution had not applied for such interim deposit. (4) Bonds and other obligations of this state, or the political subdivisions of this state, provided that, with respect to bonds or other obligations of political subdivisions, all of the following apply: (a) The bonds or other obligations are payable from general revenues of the political subdivision and backed by the full faith and credit of the political subdivision. (b) The bonds or other obligations are rated at the time of purchase in the three highest classifications established by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization and purchased through a registered securities broker or dealer. (c) The aggregate value of the bonds or other obligations does not exceed twenty per cent of interim moneys available for investment at the time of purchase. (d) The treasurer or governing board is not the sole purchaser of the bonds or other obligations at original issuance. (e) The bonds or other obligations mature within ten years from the date of settlement. No investment shall be made under division (B)(4) of this section unless the treasurer or governing board has completed additional training for making the investments authorized by division (B)(4) of this section. The type and amount of additional training shall be approved by the treasurer of state and may be conducted by or provided under the supervision of the treasurer of state. (5) No-load money market mutual funds consisting exclusively of obligations described in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section and repurchase agreements secured by such obligations, provided that investments in securities described in this division are made only through eligible institutions mentioned in section 135.03 of the Revised Code; (6) The Ohio subdivision's fund as provided in section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code; (7) Up to forty per cent of interim moneys available for investment in either of the following: (a) Commercial paper notes issued by an entity that is defined in division (K) of section 1706.01 of the Revised Code and that has assets exceeding five hundred million dollars, to which notes all of the following apply: (i) The notes are rated at the time of purchase in the highest classification established by at least two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations. (ii) The aggregate value of the notes does not exceed ten per cent of the aggregate value of the outstanding commercial paper of the issuing corporation. (iii) The notes mature not later than two hundred seventy days after purchase. (iv) The investment in commercial paper notes of a single issuer shall not exceed in the aggregate five per cent of interim moneys available for investment at the time of purchase. (b) Bankers acceptances of banks that are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation and that mature not later than one hundred eighty days after purchase. No investment shall be made pursuant to division (B)(7) of this section unless the treasurer or governing board has completed additional training for making the investments authorized by division (B)(7) of this section. The type and amount of additional training shall be approved by the treasurer of state and may be conducted by or provided under the supervision of the treasurer of state. (C) Nothing in the classifications of eligible obligations set forth in divisions (B)(1) to (7) of this section shall be construed to authorize any investment in a derivative, and no treasurer or governing board shall invest in a derivative. For purposes of this division, "derivative" means a financial instrument or contract or obligation whose value or return is based upon or linked to another asset or index, or both, separate from the financial instrument, contract, or obligation itself. Any security, obligation, trust account, or other instrument that is created from an issue of the United States treasury or is created from an obligation of a federal agency or instrumentality or is created from both is considered a derivative instrument. An eligible investment described in this section with a variable interest rate payment, based upon a single interest payment or single index comprised of other eligible investments provided for in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section, is not a derivative, provided that such variable rate investment has a maximum maturity of two years. (D) Except as provided in division (B)(4) or (E) of this section, any investment made pursuant to this section must mature within five years from the date of settlement, unless the investment is matched to a specific obligation or debt of the subdivision. (E) The treasurer or governing board may also enter into a written repurchase agreement with any eligible institution mentioned in section 135.03 of the Revised Code or any eligible dealer pursuant to division (M) of this section, under the terms of which agreement the treasurer or governing board purchases, and such institution or dealer agrees unconditionally to repurchase any of the securities listed in divisions (D)(1) to (5), except letters of credit described in division (D)(2), of section 135.18 of the Revised Code. The market value of securities subject to an overnight written repurchase agreement must exceed the principal value of the overnight written repurchase agreement by at least two per cent. A written repurchase agreement shall not exceed thirty days and the market value of securities subject to a written repurchase agreement must exceed the principal value of the written repurchase agreement by at least two per cent and be marked to market daily. All securities purchased pursuant to this division shall be delivered into the custody of the treasurer or governing board or an agent designated by the treasurer or governing board. A written repurchase agreement with an eligible securities dealer shall be transacted on a delivery versus payment basis. The agreement shall contain the requirement that for each transaction pursuant to the agreement the participating institution or dealer shall provide all of the following information: (1) The par value of the securities; (2) The type, rate, and maturity date of the securities; (3) A numerical identifier generally accepted in the securities industry that designates the securities. No treasurer or governing board shall enter into a written repurchase agreement under the terms of which the treasurer or governing board agrees to sell securities owned by the subdivision to a purchaser and agrees with that purchaser to unconditionally repurchase those securities. (F) No treasurer or governing board shall make an investment under this section, unless the treasurer or governing board, at the time of making the investment, reasonably expects that the investment can be held until its maturity. (G) No treasurer or governing board shall pay interim moneys into a fund established by another subdivision, treasurer, governing board, or investing authority, if that fund was established for the purpose of investing the public moneys of other subdivisions. This division does not apply to the payment of public moneys into either of the following: (1) The Ohio subdivision's fund pursuant to division (B)(6) of this section; (2) A fund created solely for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, owning, leasing, or operating municipal utilities pursuant to the authority provided under section 715.02 of the Revised Code or Section 4 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution. For purposes of division (G) of this section, "subdivision" includes a county. (H) The use of leverage, in which the treasurer or governing board uses its current investment assets as collateral for the purpose of purchasing other assets, is prohibited. The issuance of taxable notes for the purpose of arbitrage is prohibited. Contracting to sell securities that have not yet been acquired by the treasurer or governing board, for the purpose of purchasing such securities on the speculation that bond prices will decline, is prohibited. (I) Whenever, during a period of designation, the treasurer classifies public moneys as interim moneys, the treasurer shall notify the governing board of such action. The notification shall be given within thirty days after such classification and in the event the governing board does not concur in such classification or in the investments or deposits made under this section, the governing board may order the treasurer to sell or liquidate any of such investments or deposits, and any such order shall specifically describe the investments or deposits and fix the date upon which they are to be sold or liquidated. Investments or deposits so ordered to be sold or liquidated shall be sold or liquidated for cash by the treasurer on the date fixed in such order at the then current market price. Neither the treasurer nor the members of the board shall be held accountable for any loss occasioned by sales or liquidations of investments or deposits at prices lower than their cost. Any loss or expense incurred in making such sales or liquidations is payable as other expenses of the treasurer's office. (J) If any investments or deposits purchased under the authority of this section are issuable to a designated payee or to the order of a designated payee, the name of the treasurer and the title of the treasurer's office shall be so designated. If any such securities are registrable either as to principal or interest, or both, then such securities shall be registered in the name of the treasurer as such. (K) The treasurer is responsible for the safekeeping of all documents evidencing a deposit or investment acquired by the treasurer under this section. Any securities may be deposited for safekeeping with a qualified trustee as provided in section 135.18 of the Revised Code, except the delivery of securities acquired under any repurchase agreement under this section shall be made to a qualified trustee, provided, however, that the qualified trustee shall be required to report to the treasurer, governing board, auditor of state, or an authorized outside auditor at any time upon request as to the identity, market value, and location of the document evidencing each security, and that if the participating institution is a designated depository of the subdivision for the current period of designation, the securities that are the subject of the repurchase agreement may be delivered to the treasurer or held in trust by the participating institution on behalf of the subdivision. Interest earned on any investments or deposits authorized by this section shall be collected by the treasurer and credited by the treasurer to the proper fund of the subdivision. Upon the expiration of the term of office of a treasurer or in the event of a vacancy in the office of treasurer by reason of death, resignation, removal from office, or otherwise, the treasurer or the treasurer's legal representative shall transfer and deliver to the treasurer's successor all documents evidencing a deposit or investment held by the treasurer. For the investments and deposits so transferred and delivered, such treasurer shall be credited with and the treasurer's successor shall be charged with the amount of money held in such investments and deposits. (L) Whenever investments or deposits acquired under this section mature and become due and payable, the treasurer shall present them for payment according to their tenor, and shall collect the moneys payable thereon. The moneys so collected shall be treated as public moneys subject to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. (M)(1) All investments, except for investments in securities described in divisions (B)(5) and (6) of this section and for investments by a municipal corporation in the issues of such municipal corporation, shall be made only through a member of the financial industry regulatory authority (FINRA), through a bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association regulated by the superintendent of financial institutions, or through an institution regulated by the comptroller of the currency, federal deposit insurance corporation, or board of governors of the federal reserve system. (2) Payment for investments shall be made only upon the delivery of securities representing such investments to the treasurer, governing board, or qualified trustee. If the securities transferred are not represented by a certificate, payment shall be made only upon receipt of confirmation of transfer from the custodian by the treasurer, governing board, or qualified trustee. (N) In making investments authorized by this section, a treasurer or governing board may retain the services of an investment advisor, provided the advisor is licensed by the division of securities under section 1707.141 of the Revised Code or is registered with the securities and exchange commission, and possesses experience in public funds investment management, specifically in the area of state and local government investment portfolios, or the advisor is an eligible institution mentioned in section 135.03 of the Revised Code. (O)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (O)(2) and (3) of this section, no treasurer or governing board shall make an investment or deposit under this section, unless there is on file with the auditor of state a written investment policy approved by the treasurer or governing board. The policy shall require that all entities conducting investment business with the treasurer or governing board shall sign the investment policy of that subdivision. All brokers, dealers, and financial institutions, described in division (M)(1) of this section, initiating transactions with the treasurer or governing board by giving advice or making investment recommendations shall sign the treasurer's or governing board's investment policy thereby acknowledging their agreement to abide by the policy's contents. All brokers, dealers, and financial institutions, described in division (M)(1) of this section, executing transactions initiated by the treasurer or governing board, having read the policy's contents, shall sign the investment policy thereby acknowledging their comprehension and receipt. (2) If a written investment policy described in division (O)(1) of this section is not filed on behalf of the subdivision with the auditor of state, the treasurer or governing board of that subdivision shall invest the subdivision's interim moneys only in interim deposits pursuant to division (B)(3) of this section or interim deposits pursuant to section 135.145 of the Revised Code and approved by the treasurer of state, no-load money market mutual funds pursuant to division (B)(5) of this section, or the Ohio subdivision's fund pursuant to division (B)(6) of this section. (3) Divisions (O)(1) and (2) of this section do not apply to a treasurer or governing board of a subdivision whose average annual portfolio of investments held pursuant to this section is one hundred thousand dollars or less, provided that the treasurer or governing board certifies, on a form prescribed by the auditor of state, that the treasurer or governing board will comply and is in compliance with the provisions of sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. (P) A treasurer or governing board may enter into a written investment or deposit agreement that includes a provision under which the parties agree to submit to nonbinding arbitration to settle any controversy that may arise out of the agreement, including any controversy pertaining to losses of public moneys resulting from investment or deposit. The arbitration provision shall be set forth entirely in the agreement, and the agreement shall include a conspicuous notice to the parties that any party to the arbitration may apply to the court of common pleas of the county in which the arbitration was held for an order to vacate, modify, or correct the award. Any such party may also apply to the court for an order to change venue to a court of common pleas located more than one hundred miles from the county in which the treasurer or governing board is located. For purposes of this division, "investment or deposit agreement" means any agreement between a treasurer or governing board and a person, under which agreement the person agrees to invest, deposit, or otherwise manage a subdivision's interim moneys on behalf of the treasurer or governing board, or agrees to provide investment advice to the treasurer or governing board. (Q) An investment made by the treasurer or governing board pursuant to this section prior to September 27, 1996, that was a legal investment under the law as it existed before September 27, 1996, may be held until maturity. Sec. 135.143. (A) The treasurer of state may invest or execute transactions for any part or all of the interim funds of the state in the following classifications of obligations: (1) United States treasury bills, notes, bonds, or any other obligations or securities issued by the United States treasury or any other obligation guaranteed as to principal and interest by the United States; (2) Bonds, notes, debentures, or any other obligations or securities issued by any federal government agency or instrumentality; (3)(a) Bonds, notes, and other obligations of the state of Ohio, including, but not limited to, any obligations issued by the treasurer of state, the Ohio public facilities commission, the Ohio housing finance agency, the Ohio water development authority, the Ohio turnpike infrastructure commission, the Ohio higher educational facility commission, and state institutions of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) Bonds, notes, and other obligations of any state or political subdivision thereof rated in the three highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization and purchased through a registered securities broker or dealer, provided the treasurer of state is not the sole purchaser of the bonds, notes, or other obligations at original issuance. (4)(a) Written repurchase agreements with any eligible Ohio financial institution that is a member of the federal reserve system or federal home loan bank, any registered United States government securities dealer, or any counterparty rated in one of the three highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization or otherwise determined by the treasurer of state to have adequate capital and liquidity, under the terms of which agreement the treasurer of state purchases and the eligible financial institution, dealer, or counterparty agrees unconditionally to repurchase any of the securities that are listed in division (A)(1), (2), (3), (6), or (11) of this section. The market value of securities subject to these transactions must exceed the principal value of the repurchase agreement by an amount specified by the treasurer of state, and the securities must be delivered into the custody of the treasurer of state or the qualified trustee or agent designated by the treasurer of state. The agreement shall contain the requirement that for each transaction pursuant to the agreement, the participating institution, dealer, or counterparty shall provide all of the following information: (i) The par value of the securities; (ii) The type, rate, and maturity date of the securities; (iii) A numerical identifier generally accepted in the securities industry that designates the securities. (b) The treasurer of state also may sell any securities, listed in division (A)(1), (2), (6), or (11) of this section, regardless of maturity or time of redemption of the securities, under the same terms and conditions for repurchase, provided that the securities have been fully paid for and are owned by the treasurer of state at the time of the sale. (c) For purposes of division (A)(4) of this section, the treasurer of state shall only buy or sell securities listed in division (A)(11) of this section issued by entities that are organized under the laws of this state, any other state, or the United States. (5) Securities lending agreements with any eligible financial institution that is a member of the federal reserve system or federal home loan bank or any recognized United States government securities dealer, under the terms of which agreements the treasurer of state lends securities and the eligible financial institution or dealer agrees to simultaneously exchange similar securities or cash, equal value for equal value. Securities and cash received as collateral for a securities lending agreement are not interim funds of the state. The investment of cash collateral received pursuant to a securities lending agreement may be invested only in such instruments specified by the treasurer of state in accordance with a written investment policy. (6) Various forms of commercial paper issued by any entity that is organized under the laws of the United States or a state, which notes are rated in the two highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, provided that the total amount invested under this section in any commercial paper at any time shall not exceed forty per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state; (7) Bankers acceptances, maturing in two hundred seventy days or less, provided that the total amount invested in bankers acceptances at any time shall not exceed ten per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state; (8) Certificates of deposit, savings accounts, or deposit accounts in eligible institutions applying for interim moneys as provided in section 135.08 of the Revised Code, including linked deposits as authorized under section 135.61 of the Revised Code. For interim funds invested in accordance with division (A)(8) of this section, the pledging requirements described in section 135.18, 135.181, or 135.182 of the Revised Code may be reduced by up to ten per cent in accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state. (9) Negotiable certificates of deposit denominated in United States dollars issued by a nationally or state-chartered bank, a savings association or a federal savings association, a state or federal credit union, or a federally licensed or state-licensed branch of a foreign bank, which are rated in the two highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations, provided that the total amount invested under this section in negotiable certificates of deposit at any time shall not exceed twenty-five per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state. Interim funds invested in accordance with division (A)(9) of this section are not limited to institutions applying for interim moneys under section 135.08 of the Revised Code, nor are they subject to any pledging requirements described in sections 135.18, 135.181, or 135.182 of the Revised Code. (10) The state treasurer's investment pool authorized under section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code; (11) Debt interests, other than commercial paper described in division (A)(6) of this section, rated in the four highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations and issued by entities that are organized under the laws of the United States or a state, or issued by foreign nations diplomatically recognized by the United States government, or any instrument based on, derived from, or related to such interests, provided that: (a) The investments in debt interests other than commercial paper, when added to the investment in written repurchase agreements for securities listed in division (A)(3) or (11) of this section, shall not exceed in the aggregate twenty-five per cent of the state's portfolio. (b) The investments in debt interests rated in the fourth highest category shall not exceed in the aggregate ten per cent of the state's portfolio. (c) The investments in debt interests issued by foreign nations shall not exceed in the aggregate two per cent of the state's portfolio. The treasurer of state shall invest under division (A)(11) of this section in a debt interest issued by a foreign nation only if the debt interest is backed by the full faith and credit of that foreign nation, and provided that all interest and principal shall be denominated and payable in United States funds. (d) When added to the investment in commercial paper and negotiable certificates of deposit, the investments in the debt interests of a single issuer shall not exceed in the aggregate five per cent of the state's portfolio. (e) For purposes of division (A)(11) of this section, a debt interest is rated in the four highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations if either the debt interest itself or the issuer of the debt interest is rated, or is implicitly rated, in the four highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations. (f) For purposes of division (A)(11) of this section, the "state's portfolio" means the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state. (12) No-load money market mutual funds rated in the highest category by one nationally recognized statistical rating organization or consisting exclusively of obligations described in division (A)(1), (2), or (6) of this section and repurchase agreements secured by such obligations; (13) Obligations issued by, or on behalf of, an Ohio political subdivision under Chapter 133. of the Revised Code or Section 12 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution, and identified in an agreement described in division (G) of this section; (14) Obligations issued by the state of Ohio, any political subdivision thereof, or by or on behalf of any nonprofit corporation or association doing business in this state rated in the four highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization and identified in an agreement described in division (K) of this section. (B)(1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the treasurer of state shall notify the state board of deposit that the following reports pertaining to the immediately preceding month have been posted to the web site maintained by the treasurer of state: (a) The daily ledger report of state funds prepared in accordance with section 113.13 of the Revised Code; (b) The monthly portfolio report detailing the current inventory of all investments and deposits held within the classification of interim moneys; (c) The monthly activity report within the classification of interim moneys summarized by type of investment or deposit. (2) In the event the state board of deposit does not concur in such classification or in the investments or deposits made under this section, subject to division (B)(3) of this section, the board may order the treasurer of state to sell or liquidate any of the investments or deposits, and any such order shall specifically describe the investments or deposits and fix the date upon which they are to be sold or liquidated. Investments or deposits so ordered to be sold or liquidated shall be sold or liquidated for cash by the treasurer of state on the date fixed in such order at the then current market price. Neither the treasurer of state nor the members of the state board of deposit shall be held accountable for any loss occasioned by sales or liquidations of investments or deposits at prices lower than their cost. Any loss or expense incurred in making these sales or liquidations is payable as other expenses of the treasurer's office. (3) Unless expressly authorized by the laws of this state, the state board of deposit shall not order the treasurer of state to sell or liquidate investments or deposits with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy. (C) If any securities or obligations invested in by the treasurer of state pursuant to this section are registrable either as to principal or interest, or both, such securities or obligations shall be registered in the name of the treasurer of state. (D) The treasurer of state is responsible for the safekeeping of all securities or obligations under this section. Any such securities or obligations may be deposited for safekeeping as provided in section 113.05 of the Revised Code. (E) Interest earned on any investments or deposits authorized by this section shall be collected by the treasurer of state and credited by the treasurer of state to the proper fund of the state. (F) Whenever investments or deposits acquired under this section mature and become due and payable, the treasurer of state shall present them for payment according to their tenor, and shall collect the moneys payable thereon. The moneys so collected shall be treated as public moneys subject to sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. (G) The treasurer of state and any entity issuing obligations referred to in division (A)(13) of this section, which obligations mature within one year two years from the original date of issuance, may enter into an agreement providing for: (1) The purchase of those obligations by the treasurer of state on terms and subject to conditions set forth in the agreement; (2) The payment to the treasurer of state of a reasonable fee as consideration for the agreement of the treasurer of state to purchase those obligations; provided, however, that the treasurer of state shall not be authorized to enter into any such agreement with a board of education of a school district that has an outstanding obligation with respect to a loan received under authority of section 3313.483 of the Revised Code. (H) For purposes of division (G) of this section, a fee shall not be considered reasonable unless it is set to recover only the direct costs, a reasonable estimate of the indirect costs associated with the purchasing of obligations under division (G) of this section and any reselling of the obligations or any interest in the obligations, including interests in a fund comprised of the obligations, and the administration thereof. No money from the general revenue fund shall be used to subsidize the purchase or resale of these obligations. (I) All money collected by the treasurer of state from the fee imposed by division (G) of this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state political subdivision obligations fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. Money credited to the fund shall be used solely to pay the treasurer of state's direct and indirect costs associated with purchasing and reselling obligations under division (G) of this section. (J) As used in this section, "political subdivision" means a county, township, municipal corporation, school district, or other body corporate and politic responsible for governmental activities in a geographic area smaller than that of the state. (K)(1) The treasurer of state and any entity issuing obligations referred to in division (A)(14) of this section, which obligations require a conditional liquidity requirement, may enter into an agreement providing for the following: (a) The purchase of the obligations by the treasurer of state on terms and subject to conditions set forth in the agreement; (b) Payment to the treasurer of state of a fee as consideration for the agreement of the treasurer of state to purchase the obligations. (2) The treasurer of state shall not enter into agreements under division (K)(1) of this section for obligations that, in the aggregate, exceed ten per cent of the state's total average portfolio, as determined and calculated by the treasurer of state. (3) For purposes of division (A)(14) of this section, an obligation is rated in the four highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization if either the debt interest itself or the obligor of the debt interest is rated in the four highest categories by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization. (4) All money collected by the treasurer of state from the fee imposed by division (K) of this section shall be deposited to the credit of the state securities tender program fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. The amount of income from the state securities tender program credited to the state securities tender program fund shall not exceed one per cent of the average par value of obligations subject to agreements under division (K)(1) of this section. All other such income shall be credited to the general revenue fund. The treasurer of state may use the state securities tender program fund solely for operations of the office of the treasurer of state. (L)(1) The treasurer of state and a state university or college issuing obligations under section 3345.12 of the Revised Code may enter into an agreement providing for the following: (a) The purchase of those obligations by the treasurer of state pursuant to division (A)(3)(a) of this section on terms and subject to conditions set forth in the agreement; (b) The department of higher education to withhold, in the event the state university or college does not pay bond service charges on the obligations when due, appropriated funds allocated to the state university or college in an amount sufficient to pay bond service charges on the obligations, less any amounts deposited for that purpose under the bond proceedings. Upon the request of the treasurer of state, the department of higher education shall promptly pay to the treasurer of state the amounts withheld. (2) For purposes of division (L)(1) of this section, "obligations," "state university or college," "bond service charges," and "bond proceedings" have the same meanings as in section 3345.12 of the Revised Code. (M) Unless expressly authorized by the laws of this state, the treasurer of state shall not do either of the following: (1) Make an investment decision with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy; (2) Permit any person or entity to which the treasurer of state delegates the management of the investment of state money to make investment decisions with state money with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy. Sec. 135.22. (A) For purposes of this section: (1) "Treasurer" has the same meaning as in section 135.01 of the Revised Code, but does not include a county treasurer or the treasurer of state. "Treasurer" includes any person whose duties include making investment decisions with respect to the investment or deposit of interim moneys. (2) "Subdivision" has the same meaning as in section 135.01 of the Revised Code. (B) To enhance the background and working knowledge of treasurers in investments, cash management, the collection of taxes, ethics, and in any other subject area that the treasurer of state determines is reasonably related to the duties of a treasurer, the treasurer of state shall provide annual continuing education programs for treasurers. A treasurer annually shall complete the continuing education programs requirements described in this section, unless the treasurer annually provides a notice of qualifies for the exemption described in division (E) of this section. (C) The treasurer of state shall determine adopt rules governing the manner, content, and length of the continuing education programs requirements after consultation with appropriate statewide organizations of local government officials. (D) Upon successful completion of a any continuing education program credit hours required by this section, the treasurer of state a subdivision shall issue a certificate indicating that the treasurer has successfully completed the continuing education program prescribed by the treasurer of stateretain proof of attendance. The treasurer of state shall forward to the auditor of state any certificates issued pursuant to this division by the treasurer of state. The auditor of state shall maintain in the auditor's records any certificates forwarded by the treasurer of state pursuant to this division. As part of the auditor of state's audit of the subdivision conducted in accordance with section 117.11 of the Revised Code, the auditor of state shall report whether the treasurer is in compliance with this section of the Revised Code. (E) Division (B) of this section does not apply to any treasurer of a subdivision who annually provides a notice of exemption to the auditor of state. The notice shall be certified by the treasurer of state and shall provide that the treasurer is not subject to the continuing education requirements set forth in division (B) of this section, because the treasurer exclusively utilizes active deposits or who invests or deposits public moneys in the following investments only: (1) Interim deposits pursuant to division (B)(3) of section 135.14 or section 135.145 113.07 of the Revised Code; (2) No-load money market mutual funds pursuant to division (B)(5) of section 135.14 of the Revised Code; (3) The Ohio subdivision's fund pursuant to division (B)(6) of section 135.14 of the Revised Code. (F) In carrying out the duties required by this section, the treasurer of state may charge the subdivision served by the treasurer a registration or annual fee that will meet actual and necessary expenses in connection with the training of the treasurer, including instruction fees, site acquisition costs, and the cost of course materials, and other costs of administering the continuing education program. Any necessary personal expenses of a treasurer incurred as a result of attending the continuing education courses shall be borne by the subdivision represented by the treasurer. (G) The treasurer of state may allow any other interested person to attend any of the continuing education programs that are held pursuant to this section, provided that before attending any such continuing education program, the interested person has paid to the treasurer of state the full registration or annual fee set for the continuing education program. (H) All funds collected pursuant to this section shall be paid into the county treasurer education fund created pursuant to section 321.46 of the Revised Code, and the actual and necessary expenses of the treasurer of state in conducting the continuing education programs required by this section shall be paid from this fund. (I) The treasurer of state may shall adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section for the implementation of this section. Sec. 135.35. (A) The investing authority shall deposit or invest any part or all of the county's inactive moneys and shall invest all of the money in the county public library fund when required by section 135.352 of the Revised Code. The following classifications of securities and obligations are eligible for such deposit or investment: (1) United States treasury bills, notes, bonds, or any other obligation or security issued by the United States treasury, any other obligation guaranteed as to principal or interest by the United States, or any book entry, zero-coupon United States treasury security that is a direct obligation of the United States. Nothing in the classification of eligible securities and obligations set forth in divisions (A)(2) to (10) of this section shall be construed to authorize any investment in stripped principal or interest obligations of such eligible securities and obligations. (2) Bonds, notes, debentures, or any other obligations or securities issued by any federal government agency or instrumentality, including, but not limited to, the federal national mortgage association, federal home loan bank, federal farm credit bank, federal home loan mortgage corporation, and government national mortgage association. All federal agency securities shall be direct issuances of federal government agencies or instrumentalities. (3) Time certificates of deposit or savings or deposit accounts, including, but not limited to, passbook accounts, in any eligible institution mentioned in section 135.32 of the Revised Code; (4) Bonds and other obligations of this state or the political subdivisions of this state, provided the bonds or other obligations of political subdivisions mature within ten years from the date of settlement; (5) No-load money market mutual funds rated in the highest category at the time of purchase by at least one nationally recognized statistical rating organization or consisting exclusively of obligations described in division (A)(1), (2), or (6) of section 135.143 of the Revised Code and repurchase agreements secured by such obligations, provided that investments in securities described in this division are made only through eligible institutions mentioned in section 135.32 of the Revised Code; (6) The Ohio subdivision's fund as provided in section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code; (7) Securities lending agreements with any eligible institution mentioned in section 135.32 of the Revised Code that is a member of the federal reserve system or federal home loan bank or with any recognized United States government securities dealer meeting the description in division (J)(1) of this section, under the terms of which agreements the investing authority lends securities and the eligible institution or dealer agrees to simultaneously exchange similar securities or cash, equal value for equal value. Securities and cash received as collateral for a securities lending agreement are not inactive moneys of the county or moneys of a county public library fund. The investment of cash collateral received pursuant to a securities lending agreement may be invested only in instruments specified by the investing authority in the written investment policy described in division (K) of this section. (8) Up to forty per cent of the county's total average portfolio in either of the following investments: (a) Commercial paper notes issued by an entity that is defined in division (K) of section 1706.01 of the Revised Code and that has assets exceeding five hundred million dollars, to which notes all of the following apply: (i) The notes are rated at the time of purchase in the highest classification established by at least two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations. (ii) The aggregate value of the notes does not exceed ten per cent of the aggregate value of the outstanding commercial paper of the issuing corporation. (iii) The notes mature not later than two hundred seventy days after purchase. (iv) The investment in commercial paper notes of a single issuer shall not exceed in the aggregate five per cent of interim moneys available for investment at the time of purchase. (b) Bankers acceptances of banks that are insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation and that mature not later than one hundred eighty days after purchase. No investment shall be made pursuant to division (A)(8) of this section unless the investing authority has completed additional training for making the investments authorized by division (A)(8) of this section. The type and amount of additional training shall be approved by the treasurer of state and may be conducted by or provided under the supervision of the treasurer of state. (9) Up to fifteen per cent of the county's total average portfolio in notes issued by corporations that are incorporated under the laws of the United States and that are operating within the United States, or by depository institutions that are doing business under authority granted by the United States or any state and that are operating within the United States, provided both of the following apply: (a) The notes are rated in the three highest categories by at least two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations at the time of purchase. (b) The notes mature not later than three years after purchase. (10) Debt interests rated at the time of purchase in the three highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations and issued by foreign nations diplomatically recognized by the United States government. All interest and principal shall be denominated and payable in United States funds. The investments made under division (A)(10) of this section shall not exceed in the aggregate two per cent of a county's total average portfolio. The investing authority shall invest under division (A)(10) of this section in a debt interest issued by a foreign nation only if the debt interest is backed by the full faith and credit of that foreign nation, there is no prior history of default, and the debt interest matures not later than five years after purchase. For purposes of division (A)(10) of this section, a debt interest is rated in the three highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations if either the debt interest itself or the issuer of the debt interest is rated, or is implicitly rated, at the time of purchase in the three highest categories by two nationally recognized statistical rating organizations. (11) A current unpaid or delinquent tax line of credit authorized under division (G) of section 135.341 of the Revised Code, provided that all of the conditions for entering into such a line of credit under that division are satisfied, or bonds and other obligations of a county land reutilization corporation organized under Chapter 1724. of the Revised Code, if the county land reutilization corporation is located wholly or partly within the same county as the investing authority. (B) Nothing in the classifications of eligible obligations and securities set forth in divisions (A)(1) to (10) of this section shall be construed to authorize investment in a derivative, and no investing authority shall invest any county inactive moneys or any moneys in a county public library fund in a derivative. For purposes of this division, "derivative" means a financial instrument or contract or obligation whose value or return is based upon or linked to another asset or index, or both, separate from the financial instrument, contract, or obligation itself. Any security, obligation, trust account, or other instrument that is created from an issue of the United States treasury or is created from an obligation of a federal agency or instrumentality or is created from both is considered a derivative instrument. An eligible investment described in this section with a variable interest rate payment, based upon a single interest payment or single index comprised of other eligible investments provided for in division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, is not a derivative, provided that such variable rate investment has a maximum maturity of two years. A treasury inflation-protected security shall not be considered a derivative, provided the security matures not later than five years after purchase. (C) Except as provided in division (A)(4) or (D) of this section, any investment made pursuant to this section must mature within five years from the date of settlement, unless the investment is matched to a specific obligation or debt of the county or to a specific obligation or debt of a political subdivision of this state, and the investment is specifically approved by the investment advisory committee. (D) The investing authority may also enter into a written repurchase agreement with any eligible institution mentioned in section 135.32 of the Revised Code or any eligible securities dealer pursuant to division (J) of this section, under the terms of which agreement the investing authority purchases and the eligible institution or dealer agrees unconditionally to repurchase any of the securities listed in divisions (D)(1) to (5), except letters of credit described in division (D)(2), of section 135.18 of the Revised Code. The market value of securities subject to an overnight written repurchase agreement must exceed the principal value of the overnight written repurchase agreement by at least two per cent. A written repurchase agreement must exceed the principal value of the overnight written repurchase agreement, by at least two per cent. A written repurchase agreement shall not exceed thirty days, and the market value of securities subject to a written repurchase agreement must exceed the principal value of the written repurchase agreement by at least two per cent and be marked to market daily. All securities purchased pursuant to this division shall be delivered into the custody of the investing authority or the qualified custodian of the investing authority or an agent designated by the investing authority. A written repurchase agreement with an eligible securities dealer shall be transacted on a delivery versus payment basis. The agreement shall contain the requirement that for each transaction pursuant to the agreement the participating institution shall provide all of the following information: (1) The par value of the securities; (2) The type, rate, and maturity date of the securities; (3) A numerical identifier generally accepted in the securities industry that designates the securities. No investing authority shall enter into a written repurchase agreement under the terms of which the investing authority agrees to sell securities owned by the county to a purchaser and agrees with that purchaser to unconditionally repurchase those securities. (E) No investing authority shall make an investment under this section, unless the investing authority, at the time of making the investment, reasonably expects that the investment can be held until its maturity. The investing authority's written investment policy shall specify the conditions under which an investment may be redeemed or sold prior to maturity. (F) No investing authority shall pay a county's inactive moneys or moneys of a county public library fund into a fund established by another subdivision, treasurer, governing board, or investing authority, if that fund was established by the subdivision, treasurer, governing board, or investing authority for the purpose of investing or depositing the public moneys of other subdivisions. This division does not apply to the payment of public moneys into either of the following: (1) The Ohio subdivision's fund pursuant to division (A)(6) of this section; (2) A fund created solely for the purpose of acquiring, constructing, owning, leasing, or operating municipal utilities pursuant to the authority provided under section 715.02 of the Revised Code or Section 4 of Article XVIII, Ohio Constitution. For purposes of division (F) of this section, "subdivision" includes a county. (G) The use of leverage, in which the county uses its current investment assets as collateral for the purpose of purchasing other assets, is prohibited. The issuance of taxable notes for the purpose of arbitrage is prohibited. Contracting to sell securities not owned by the county, for the purpose of purchasing such securities on the speculation that bond prices will decline, is prohibited. (H) Any securities, certificates of deposit, deposit accounts, or any other documents evidencing deposits or investments made under authority of this section shall be issued in the name of the county with the county treasurer or investing authority as the designated payee. If any such deposits or investments are registrable either as to principal or interest, or both, they shall be registered in the name of the treasurer. (I) The investing authority shall be responsible for the safekeeping of all documents evidencing a deposit or investment acquired under this section, including, but not limited to, safekeeping receipts evidencing securities deposited with a qualified trustee, as provided in section 135.37 of the Revised Code, and documents confirming the purchase of securities under any repurchase agreement under this section shall be deposited with a qualified trustee, provided, however, that the qualified trustee shall be required to report to the investing authority, auditor of state, or an authorized outside auditor at any time upon request as to the identity, market value, and location of the document evidencing each security, and that if the participating institution is a designated depository of the county for the current period of designation, the securities that are the subject of the repurchase agreement may be delivered to the treasurer or held in trust by the participating institution on behalf of the investing authority. Upon the expiration of the term of office of an investing authority or in the event of a vacancy in the office for any reason, the officer or the officer's legal representative shall transfer and deliver to the officer's successor all documents mentioned in this division for which the officer has been responsible for safekeeping. For all such documents transferred and delivered, the officer shall be credited with, and the officer's successor shall be charged with, the amount of moneys evidenced by such documents. (J)(1) All investments, except for investments in securities described in divisions (A)(5), (6), and (11) of this section, shall be made only through a member of the financial industry regulatory authority (FINRA), through a bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association regulated by the superintendent of financial institutions, or through an institution regulated by the comptroller of the currency, federal deposit insurance corporation, or board of governors of the federal reserve system. (2) Payment for investments shall be made only upon the delivery of securities representing such investments to the treasurer, investing authority, or qualified trustee. If the securities transferred are not represented by a certificate, payment shall be made only upon receipt of confirmation of transfer from the custodian by the treasurer, governing board, or qualified trustee. (K)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (K)(2) of this section, no investing authority shall make an investment or deposit under this section, unless there is on file with the auditor of state a written investment policy approved by the investing authority. The policy shall require that all entities conducting investment business with the investing authority shall sign the investment policy of that investing authority. All brokers, dealers, and financial institutions, described in division (J)(1) of this section, initiating transactions with the investing authority by giving advice or making investment recommendations shall sign the investing authority's investment policy thereby acknowledging their agreement to abide by the policy's contents. All brokers, dealers, and financial institutions, described in division (J)(1) of this section, executing transactions initiated by the investing authority, having read the policy's contents, shall sign the investment policy thereby acknowledging their comprehension and receipt. (2) If a written investment policy described in division (K)(1) of this section is not filed on behalf of the county with the auditor of state, the investing authority of that county shall invest the county's inactive moneys and moneys of the county public library fund only in time certificates of deposits or savings or deposit accounts pursuant to division (A)(3) of this section, no-load money market mutual funds pursuant to division (A)(5) of this section, or the Ohio subdivision's fund pursuant to division (A)(6) of this section. (L)(1) The investing authority shall establish and maintain an inventory of all obligations and securities acquired by the investing authority pursuant to this section. The inventory shall include a description of each obligation or security, including type, cost, par value, maturity date, settlement date, and any coupon rate. (2) The investing authority shall also keep a complete record of all purchases and sales of the obligations and securities made pursuant to this section. (3) The investing authority shall maintain a monthly portfolio report and issue a copy of the monthly portfolio report describing such investments to the county investment advisory committee, detailing the current inventory of all obligations and securities, all transactions during the month that affected the inventory, any income received from the obligations and securities, and any investment expenses paid, and stating the names of any persons effecting transactions on behalf of the investing authority. (4) The monthly portfolio report shall be a public record and available for inspection under section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (5) The inventory and the monthly portfolio report shall be filed with the board of county commissioners. The monthly portfolio report also shall be filed with the treasurer of state. (M) An investing authority may enter into a written investment or deposit agreement that includes a provision under which the parties agree to submit to nonbinding arbitration to settle any controversy that may arise out of the agreement, including any controversy pertaining to losses of public moneys resulting from investment or deposit. The arbitration provision shall be set forth entirely in the agreement, and the agreement shall include a conspicuous notice to the parties that any party to the arbitration may apply to the court of common pleas of the county in which the arbitration was held for an order to vacate, modify, or correct the award. Any such party may also apply to the court for an order to change venue to a court of common pleas located more than one hundred miles from the county in which the investing authority is located. For purposes of this division, "investment or deposit agreement" means any agreement between an investing authority and a person, under which agreement the person agrees to invest, deposit, or otherwise manage, on behalf of the investing authority, a county's inactive moneys or moneys in a county public library fund, or agrees to provide investment advice to the investing authority. (N)(1) An investment held in the county portfolio on September 27, 1996, that was a legal investment under the law as it existed before September 27, 1996, may be held until maturity. (2) An investment held in the county portfolio on September 10, 2012, that was a legal investment under the law as it existed before September 10, 2012, may be held until maturity. (O) Unless expressly authorized by the laws of this state, an investing authority shall not do either of the following: (1) Make an investment decision with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy; (2) Permit any person or entity to which the investing authority delegates the management of the investment of public money to make investment decisions with public money with the primary purpose of influencing any environmental, social, personal, or ideological policy. Sec. 135.451. The Ohio history connection and the capitol square review and advisory board shall be eligible to pay any of their moneys into the Ohio subdivision's fund, to be invested by the treasurer of state in the same manner and subject to the same terms and conditions as public moneys of subdivisions paid into the fund under section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code. Sec. 151.01. (A) As used in sections 151.01 to 151.11 and 151.40 of the Revised Code and in the applicable bond proceedings unless otherwise provided: (1) "Bond proceedings" means the resolutions, orders, agreements, and credit enhancement facilities, and amendments and supplements to them, or any one or more or combination of them, authorizing, awarding, or providing for the terms and conditions applicable to or providing for the security or liquidity of, the particular obligations, and the provisions contained in those obligations. (2) "Bond service fund" means the respective bond service fund created by section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, 151.11, or 151.40 of the Revised Code, and any accounts in that fund, including all moneys and investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited to that fund and accounts as and to the extent provided in the applicable bond proceedings. (3) "Capital facilities" means capital facilities or projects as referred to in section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, 151.11, or 151.40 of the Revised Code. (4) "Costs of capital facilities" means the costs of acquiring, constructing, reconstructing, rehabilitating, remodeling, renovating, enlarging, improving, equipping, or furnishing capital facilities, and of the financing of those costs. "Costs of capital facilities" includes, without limitation, and in addition to costs referred to in section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, 151.11, or 151.40 of the Revised Code, the cost of clearance and preparation of the site and of any land to be used in connection with capital facilities, the cost of any indemnity and surety bonds and premiums on insurance, all related direct administrative expenses and allocable portions of direct costs of the issuing authority, costs of engineering and architectural services, designs, plans, specifications, surveys, and estimates of cost, financing costs, interest on obligations, including but not limited to, interest from the date of their issuance to the time when interest is to be paid from sources other than proceeds of obligations, amounts necessary to establish any reserves as required by the bond proceedings, the reimbursement of all moneys advanced or applied by or borrowed from any person or governmental agency or entity for the payment of any item of costs of capital facilities, and all other expenses necessary or incident to planning or determining feasibility or practicability with respect to capital facilities, and such other expenses as may be necessary or incident to the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, rehabilitation, remodeling, renovation, enlargement, improvement, equipment, and furnishing of capital facilities, the financing of those costs, and the placing of the capital facilities in use and operation, including any one, part of, or combination of those classes of costs and expenses. For purposes of sections 122.085 to 122.0820 of the Revised Code, "costs of capital facilities" includes "allowable costs" as defined in section 122.085 of the Revised Code. (5) "Credit enhancement facilities," "financing costs," and "interest" or "interest equivalent" have the same meanings as in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (6) "Debt service" means principal, including any mandatory sinking fund or redemption requirements for retirement of obligations, interest and other accreted amounts, interest equivalent, and any redemption premium, payable on obligations. If not prohibited by the applicable bond proceedings, debt service may include costs relating to credit enhancement facilities that are related to and represent, or are intended to provide a source of payment of or limitation on, other debt service. (7) "Issuing authority" means the Ohio public facilities commission created in section 151.02 of the Revised Code for obligations issued under section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, or 151.11 of the Revised Code, or the treasurer of state, or the officer who by law performs the functions of that office, for obligations issued under section 151.06 or 151.40 of the Revised Code. (8) "Net proceeds" means amounts received from the sale of obligations, excluding amounts used to refund or retire outstanding obligations, amounts required to be deposited into special funds pursuant to the applicable bond proceedings, and amounts to be used to pay financing costs. (9) "Obligations" means bonds, notes, or other evidences of obligation of the state, including any appertaining interest coupons, issued under Section 2k, 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, or 15 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and pursuant to sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code or other general assembly authorization. (10) "Principal amount" means the aggregate of the amount as stated or provided for in the applicable bond proceedings as the amount on which interest or interest equivalent on particular obligations is initially calculated. Principal amount does not include any premium paid to the state by the initial purchaser of the obligations. "Principal amount" of a capital appreciation bond, as defined in division (C) of section 3334.01 of the Revised Code, means its face amount, and "principal amount" of a zero coupon bond, as defined in division (J) of section 3334.01 of the Revised Code, means the discounted offering price at which the bond is initially sold to the public, disregarding any purchase price discount to the original purchaser, if provided for pursuant to the bond proceedings. (11) "Special funds" or "funds," unless the context indicates otherwise, means the bond service fund, and any other funds, including any reserve funds, created under the bond proceedings and stated to be special funds in those proceedings, including moneys and investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited to the particular fund. Special funds do not include the school building program assistance fund created by section 3318.25 of the Revised Code, the higher education improvement fund created by division (F) of section 154.21 of the Revised Code, the higher education improvement taxable fund created by division (G) of section 154.21 of the Revised Code, the highway capital improvement bond fund created by section 5528.53 of the Revised Code, the state parks and natural resources fund created by section 1557.02 of the Revised Code, the coal research and development fund created by section 1555.15 of the Revised Code, the clean Ohio conservation fund created by section 164.27 of the Revised Code, the job ready site development fund created by section 122.0820 of the Revised Code, the third frontier research and development fund created by section 184.19 of the Revised Code, the third frontier research and development taxable bond fund created by section 184.191 of the Revised Code, or other funds created by the bond proceedings that are not stated by those proceedings to be special funds. (B) Subject to Section 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, or 15, and Section 17, of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, the state, by the issuing authority, is authorized to issue and sell, as provided in sections 151.03 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, and in respective aggregate principal amounts as from time to time provided or authorized by the general assembly, general obligations of this state for the purpose of paying costs of capital facilities or projects identified by or pursuant to general assembly action. (C) Each issue of obligations shall be authorized by resolution or order of the issuing authority. The bond proceedings shall provide for or authorize the manner for determining the principal amount or maximum principal amount of obligations of an issue, the principal maturity or maturities, the interest rate or rates, the date of and the dates of payment of interest on the obligations, their denominations, and the place or places of payment of debt service which may be within or outside the state. Unless otherwise provided by law, the latest principal maturity may not be later than the earlier of the thirty-first day of December of the twenty-fifth calendar year after the year of issuance of the particular obligations or of the twenty-fifth calendar year after the year in which the original obligation to pay was issued or entered into. Sections 9.96, 9.98, 9.981, 9.982, and 9.983 of the Revised Code apply to obligations. The purpose of the obligations may be stated in the bond proceedings in general terms, such as, as applicable, "financing or assisting in the financing of projects as provided in Section 2l of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "financing or assisting in the financing of highway capital improvement projects as provided in Section 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of capital facilities for a system of common schools throughout the state as authorized by Section 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of capital facilities for state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education as authorized by Section 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of coal research and development as authorized by Section 15 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "financing or assisting in the financing of local subdivision capital improvement projects as authorized by Section 2m, 2p, and 2s of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of conservation projects as authorized by Sections 2o and 2q of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of revitalization projects as authorized by Sections 2o and 2q of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," "paying costs of preparing sites for industry, commerce, distribution, or research and development as authorized by Section 2p of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution," or "paying costs of research and development as authorized by Section 2p of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution." (D) The issuing authority may appoint or provide for the appointment of paying agents, bond registrars, securities depositories, clearing corporations, and transfer agents, and may without need for any other approval retain or contract for the services of underwriters, investment bankers, financial advisers, accounting experts, marketing, remarketing, indexing, and administrative agents, other consultants, and independent contractors, including printing services, as are necessary in the judgment of the issuing authority to carry out the issuing authority's functions under this chapter. When the issuing authority is the Ohio public facilities commission, the issuing authority also may without need for any other approval retain or contract for the services of attorneys and other professionals for that purpose. Financing costs are payable, as may be provided in the bond proceedings, from the proceeds of the obligations, from special funds, or from other moneys available for the purpose. (E) The bond proceedings may contain additional provisions customary or appropriate to the financing or to the obligations or to particular obligations including, but not limited to, provisions for: (1) The redemption of obligations prior to maturity at the option of the state or of the holder or upon the occurrence of certain conditions, and at particular price or prices and under particular terms and conditions; (2) The form of and other terms of the obligations; (3) The establishment, deposit, investment, and application of special funds, and the safeguarding of moneys on hand or on deposit, in lieu of the applicability of provisions of Chapter 131. or 135. of the Revised Code, but subject to any special provisions of sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code with respect to the application of particular funds or moneys. Any financial institution that acts as a depository of any moneys in special funds or other funds under the bond proceedings may furnish indemnifying bonds or pledge securities as required by the issuing authority. (4) Any or every provision of the bond proceedings being binding upon the issuing authority and upon such governmental agency or entity, officer, board, commission, authority, agency, department, institution, district, or other person or body as may from time to time be authorized to take actions as may be necessary to perform all or any part of the duty required by the provision; (5) The maintenance of each pledge or instrument comprising part of the bond proceedings until the state has fully paid or provided for the payment of the debt service on the obligations or met other stated conditions; (6) In the event of default in any payments required to be made by the bond proceedings, or by any other agreement of the issuing authority made as part of a contract under which the obligations were issued or secured, including a credit enhancement facility, the enforcement of those payments by mandamus, a suit in equity, an action at law, or any combination of those remedial actions; (7) The rights and remedies of the holders or owners of obligations or of book-entry interests in them, and of third parties under any credit enhancement facility, and provisions for protecting and enforcing those rights and remedies, including limitations on rights of individual holders or owners; (8) The replacement of mutilated, destroyed, lost, or stolen obligations; (9) The funding, refunding, or advance refunding, or other provision for payment, of obligations that will then no longer be outstanding for purposes of this section or of the applicable bond proceedings; (10) Amendment of the bond proceedings; (11) Any other or additional agreements with the owners of obligations, and such other provisions as the issuing authority determines, including limitations, conditions, or qualifications, relating to any of the foregoing. (F) The great seal of the state or a facsimile of it may be affixed to or printed on the obligations. The obligations requiring execution by or for the issuing authority shall be signed as provided in the bond proceedings. Any obligations may be signed by the individual who on the date of execution is the authorized signer although on the date of these obligations that individual is not an authorized signer. In case the individual whose signature or facsimile signature appears on any obligation ceases to be an authorized signer before delivery of the obligation, that signature or facsimile is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if that individual had remained the authorized signer until delivery. (G) Obligations are investment securities under Chapter 1308. of the Revised Code. Obligations may be issued in bearer or in registered form, registrable as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest, or both, or in certificated or uncertificated form, as the issuing authority determines. Provision may be made for the exchange, conversion, or transfer of obligations and for reasonable charges for registration, exchange, conversion, and transfer. Pending preparation of final obligations, the issuing authority may provide for the issuance of interim instruments to be exchanged for the final obligations. (H) Obligations may be sold at public sale or at private sale, in such manner, and at such price at, above or below par, all as determined by and provided by the issuing authority in the bond proceedings. (I) Except to the extent that rights are restricted by the bond proceedings, any owner of obligations or provider of a credit enhancement facility may by any suitable form of legal proceedings protect and enforce any rights relating to obligations or that facility under the laws of this state or granted by the bond proceedings. Those rights include the right to compel the performance of all applicable duties of the issuing authority and the state. Each duty of the issuing authority and that authority's officers, staff, and employees, and of each state entity or agency, or using district or using institution, and its officers, members, staff, or employees, undertaken pursuant to the bond proceedings, is hereby established as a duty of the entity or individual having authority to perform that duty, specifically enjoined by law and resulting from an office, trust, or station within the meaning of section 2731.01 of the Revised Code. The individuals who are from time to time the issuing authority, members or officers of the issuing authority, or those members' designees acting pursuant to section 151.02 of the Revised Code, or the issuing authority's officers, staff, or employees, are not liable in their personal capacities on any obligations or otherwise under the bond proceedings. (J)(1) Subject to Section 2k, 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, or 15, and Section 17, of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution and sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, the issuing authority may, in addition to the authority referred to in division (B) of this section, authorize and provide for the issuance of: (a) Obligations in the form of bond anticipation notes, and may provide for the renewal of those notes from time to time by the issuance of new notes. The holders of notes or appertaining interest coupons have the right to have debt service on those notes paid solely from the moneys and special funds that are or may be pledged to that payment, including the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or both, as the issuing authority provides in the bond proceedings authorizing the notes. Notes may be additionally secured by covenants of the issuing authority to the effect that the issuing authority and the state will do all things necessary for the issuance of bonds or renewal notes in such principal amount and upon such terms as may be necessary to provide moneys to pay when due the debt service on the notes, and apply their proceeds to the extent necessary, to make full and timely payment of debt service on the notes as provided in the applicable bond proceedings. In the bond proceedings authorizing the issuance of bond anticipation notes the issuing authority shall set forth for the bonds anticipated an estimated schedule of annual principal payments the latest of which shall be no later than provided in division (C) of this section. While the notes are outstanding there shall be deposited, as shall be provided in the bond proceedings for those notes, from the sources authorized for payment of debt service on the bonds, amounts sufficient to pay the principal of the bonds anticipated as set forth in that estimated schedule during the time the notes are outstanding, which amounts shall be used solely to pay the principal of those notes or of the bonds anticipated. (b) Obligations for the refunding, including funding and retirement, and advance refunding with or without payment or redemption prior to maturity, of any obligations previously issued. Refunding obligations may be issued in amounts sufficient to pay or to provide for repayment of the principal amount, including principal amounts maturing prior to the redemption of the remaining prior obligations, any redemption premium, and interest accrued or to accrue to the maturity or redemption date or dates, payable on the prior obligations, and related financing costs and any expenses incurred or to be incurred in connection with that issuance and refunding. Subject to the applicable bond proceedings, the portion of the proceeds of the sale of refunding obligations issued under division (J)(1)(b) of this section to be applied to debt service on the prior obligations shall be credited to an appropriate separate account in the bond service fund and held in trust for the purpose by the issuing authority or by a corporate trustee. Obligations authorized under this division shall be considered to be issued for those purposes for which the prior obligations were issued. (2) Except as otherwise provided in sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, bonds or notes authorized pursuant to division (J) of this section are subject to the provisions of those sections pertaining to obligations generally. (3) The principal amount of refunding or renewal obligations issued pursuant to division (J) of this section shall be in addition to the amount authorized by the general assembly as referred to in division (B) of the following sections: section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, 151.11, or 151.40 of the Revised Code. (K) Obligations are lawful investments for banks, savings and loan associations, credit union share guaranty corporations, trust companies, trustees, fiduciaries, insurance companies, including domestic for life and domestic not for life, trustees or other officers having charge of sinking and bond retirement or other special funds of the state and political subdivisions and taxing districts of this state, the sinking fund, the administrator of workers' compensation subject to the approval of the workers' compensation board, the state teachers retirement system, the public employees retirement system, the school employees retirement system, and the Ohio police and fire pension fund, notwithstanding any other provisions of the Revised Code or rules adopted pursuant to those provisions by any state agency with respect to investments by them, and are also acceptable as security for the repayment of the deposit of public moneys. The exemptions from taxation in Ohio as provided for in particular sections of the Ohio Constitution and section 5709.76 of the Revised Code apply to the obligations. (L)(1) Unless otherwise provided or provided for in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in a special fund shall be disbursed on the order of the issuing authority. No such order is required for the payment, from the bond service fund or other special fund, when due of debt service or required payments under credit enhancement facilities. (2) Payments received by the state under interest rate hedges entered into as credit enhancement facilities under this chapter shall be deposited to the credit of the bond service fund for the obligations to which those credit enhancement facilities relate. (M) The full faith and credit, revenue, and taxing power of the state are and shall be pledged to the timely payment of debt service on outstanding obligations as it comes due, all in accordance with Section 2k, 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, or 15 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and section 151.03, 151.04, 151.05, 151.06, 151.07, 151.08, 151.09, 151.10, or 151.11 of the Revised Code. Moneys referred to in Section 5a of Article XII, Ohio Constitution, may not be pledged or used for the payment of debt service except on obligations referred to in section 151.06 of the Revised Code. Net state lottery proceeds, as provided for and referred to in section 3770.06 of the Revised Code, may not be pledged or used for the payment of debt service except on obligations referred to in section 151.03 of the Revised Code. The state covenants, and that covenant shall be controlling notwithstanding any other provision of law, that the state and the applicable officers and agencies of the state, including the general assembly, shall, so long as any obligations are outstanding in accordance with their terms, maintain statutory authority for and cause to be levied, collected and applied sufficient pledged excises, taxes, and revenues of the state so that the revenues shall be sufficient in amounts to pay debt service when due, to establish and maintain any reserves and other requirements, and to pay financing costs, including costs of or relating to credit enhancement facilities, all as provided for in the bond proceedings. Those excises, taxes, and revenues are and shall be deemed to be levied and collected, in addition to the purposes otherwise provided for by law, to provide for the payment of debt service and financing costs in accordance with sections 151.01 to 151.11 of the Revised Code and the bond proceedings. (N) The general assembly may from time to time repeal or reduce any excise, tax, or other source of revenue pledged to the payment of the debt service pursuant to Section 2k, 2l, 2m, 2n, 2o, 2p, 2q, 2s, or 15 of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, and may levy, collect and apply any new or increased excise, tax, or revenue to meet the pledge, to the payment of debt service on outstanding obligations, of the state's full faith and credit, revenue and taxing power, or of designated revenues and receipts, except fees, excises or taxes referred to in Section 5a of Article XII, Ohio Constitution, for other than obligations referred to in section 151.06 of the Revised Code and except net state lottery proceeds for other than obligations referred to in section 151.03 of the Revised Code. Nothing in division (N) of this section authorizes any impairment of the obligation of this state to levy and collect sufficient excises, taxes, and revenues to pay debt service on obligations outstanding in accordance with their terms. (O) Each bond service fund is a trust fund and is hereby pledged to the payment of debt service on the applicable obligations. Payment of that debt service shall be made or provided for by the issuing authority in accordance with the bond proceedings without necessity for any act of appropriation. The bond proceedings may provide for the establishment of separate accounts in the bond service fund and for the application of those accounts only to debt service on specific obligations, and for other accounts in the bond service fund within the general purposes of that fund. (P) Subject to the bond proceedings pertaining to any obligations then outstanding in accordance with their terms, the issuing authority may in the bond proceedings pledge all, or such portion as the issuing authority determines, of the moneys in the bond service fund to the payment of debt service on particular obligations, and for the establishment and maintenance of any reserves for payment of particular debt service. (Q) The issuing authority shall by the fifteenth day of July of each fiscal year, certify or cause to be certified to the office of budget and management the total amount of moneys required during the current fiscal year to meet in full all debt service on the respective obligations and any related financing costs payable from the applicable bond service fund and not from the proceeds of refunding or renewal obligations. The issuing authority shall make or cause to be made supplemental certifications to the office of budget and management for each debt service payment date and at such other times during each fiscal year as may be provided in the bond proceedings or requested by that office. Debt service, costs of credit enhancement facilities, and other financing costs shall be set forth separately in each certification. If and so long as the moneys to the credit of the bond service fund, together with any other moneys available for the purpose, are insufficient to meet in full all payments when due of the amount required as stated in the certificate or otherwise, the office of budget and management shall at the times as provided in the bond proceedings, and consistent with any particular provisions in sections 151.03 to 151.11 and 151.40 of the Revised Code, transfer a sufficient amount to the bond service fund from the pledged revenues in the case of obligations issued pursuant to section 151.40 of the Revised Code, and in the case of other obligations from the revenues derived from excises, taxes, and other revenues, including net state lottery proceeds in the case of obligations referred to in section 151.03 of the Revised Code. (R) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of special funds may be invested by or on behalf of the state only in one or more of the following: (1) Notes, bonds, or other direct obligations of the United States or of any agency or instrumentality of the United States, or in no-front-end-load money market mutual funds consisting exclusively of those obligations, or in repurchase agreements, including those issued by any fiduciary, secured by those obligations, or in collective investment funds consisting exclusively of those obligations; (2) Obligations of this state or any political subdivision of this state; (3) Certificates of deposit of any national bank located in this state and any bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code, subject to inspection by the superintendent of financial institutions; (4) The treasurer of state's pooled investment program under section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code. The income from investments referred to in division (R) of this section shall, unless otherwise provided in sections 151.01 to 151.11 or 151.40 of the Revised Code, be credited to special funds or otherwise as the issuing authority determines in the bond proceedings. Those investments may be sold or exchanged at times as the issuing authority determines, provides for, or authorizes. (S) The treasurer of state shall have responsibility for keeping records, making reports, and making payments, relating to any arbitrage rebate requirements under the applicable bond proceedings. Sec. 164.09. (A) The issuer is authorized to issue and sell, as provided in this section and in amounts from time to time authorized by the general assembly, general obligations of this state for the purpose of financing or assisting in the financing of the costs of public infrastructure capital improvements for local subdivisions. The full faith and credit, revenues, and taxing power of the state are and shall be pledged to the timely payment of bond service charges on outstanding obligations, all in accordance with Section 2k or 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution and sections 164.09 to 164.12 of the Revised Code, excluding from that pledge fees, excises, or taxes relating to the registration, operation, or use of vehicles on the public highways, or to fuels used for propelling those vehicles, and so long as such obligations are outstanding there shall be levied and collected excises and taxes, excluding those excepted above, in amounts sufficient to pay the bond service charges on such obligations and costs relating to credit facilities. (B)(1) The total principal amount of obligations issued pursuant to Section 2k of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution shall not exceed one billion two hundred million dollars, and not more than one hundred twenty million dollars in principal amount of obligations may be issued in any calendar year, all determined as provided in sections 164.09 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. (2) The total principal amount of obligations issued for the purposes of this section pursuant to Section 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, shall not exceed one billion two hundred million dollars. Not more than one hundred twenty million dollars in principal amount of such obligations, plus the principal amount of such obligations that in any prior fiscal years could have been but were not issued within the one-hundred-twenty-million-dollar fiscal year limit, may be issued in any fiscal year. No obligations shall be issued for the purposes of this section pursuant to Section 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, until at least one billion one hundred ninety-nine million five hundred thousand dollars aggregate principal amount of obligations have been issued pursuant to Section 2k of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. The amounts specified under division (B)(2) of this section shall be determined as provided in sections 164.09 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. (C) Each issue of obligations shall be authorized by order of the issuer. The bond proceedings shall provide for the principal amount or maximum principal amount of obligations of an issue, and shall provide for or authorize the manner or agency for determining the principal maturity or maturities, not exceeding the earlier of thirty years from the date of issuance of the particular obligations or thirty years from the date the debt represented by the particular obligations was originally contracted, the interest rate or rates, the date of and the dates of payment of interest on the obligations, their denominations, and the establishment within or without the state of a place or places of payment of bond service charges. Sections 9.96 and 9.98 to 9.983 of the Revised Code are applicable to the obligations. The purpose of the obligations may be stated in the bond proceedings as "financing or assisting in the financing of local subdivisions capital improvement projects." (D) The proceeds of the obligations, except for any portion to be deposited in special funds, or in escrow funds for the purpose of refunding outstanding obligations, all as may be provided in the bond proceedings, shall be deposited to the state capital improvements fund established by section 164.08 of the Revised Code. (E) The issuer may appoint paying agents, bond registrars, securities depositories, and transfer agents, and may retain the services of financial advisers and accounting experts, and retain or contract for the services of marketing, remarketing, indexing, and administrative agents, other consultants, and independent contractors, including printing services, as are necessary in the issuer's judgment to carry out sections 164.01 to 164.12 of the Revised Code. Financing costs are payable, as provided in the bond proceedings, from the proceeds of the obligations, from special funds, or from other moneys available for the purpose. (F) The bond proceedings, including any trust agreement, may contain additional provisions customary or appropriate to the financing or to the obligations or to particular obligations, including but not limited to: (1) The redemption of obligations prior to maturity at the option of the state or of the holder or upon the occurrence of certain conditions at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as are provided in the bond proceedings; (2) The form of and other terms of the obligations; (3) The establishment, deposit, investment, and application of special funds, and the safeguarding of moneys on hand or on deposit, without regard to Chapter 131. or 135. of the Revised Code, but subject to any special provisions of this section with respect to particular funds or moneys, and provided that any bank or trust company that acts as a depository of any moneys in special funds may furnish such indemnifying bonds or may pledge such securities as required by the issuer; (4) Any or every provision of the bond proceedings binding upon the issuer and such state agency or local subdivision, officer, board, commission, authority, agency, department, or other person or body as may from time to time have the authority under law to take such actions as may be necessary to perform all or any part of the duty required by such provision; (5) The maintenance of each pledge, any trust agreement, or other instrument comprising part of the bond proceedings until the state has fully paid or provided for the payment of the bond service charges on the obligations or met other stated conditions; (6) In the event of default in any payments required to be made by the bond proceedings, or any other agreement of the issuer made as a part of a contract under which the obligations were issued or secured, the enforcement of such payments or agreements by mandamus, suit in equity, action at law, or any combination of the foregoing; (7) The rights and remedies of the holders of obligations and of the trustee under any trust agreement, and provisions for protecting and enforcing them, including limitations on rights of individual holders of obligations; (8) The replacement of any obligations that become mutilated or are destroyed, lost, or stolen; (9) Provision for the funding, refunding, or advance refunding or other provision for payment of obligations which will then no longer be outstanding for purposes of this section or of the bond proceedings; (10) Any provision that may be made in bond proceedings or a trust agreement, including provision for amendment of the bond proceedings; (11) Such other provisions as the issuer determines, including limitations, conditions, or qualifications relating to any of the foregoing; (12) Any other or additional agreements with the holders of the obligations relating to the obligations or the security for the obligations. (G) The great seal of the state or a facsimile of that seal may be affixed to or printed on the obligations. The obligations requiring signature by the issuer shall be signed by or bear the facsimile signature of the issuer as provided in the bond proceedings. Any obligations may be signed by the person who, on the date of execution, is the authorized signer although on the date of such obligations such person was not the issuer. In case the person whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any obligation ceases to be the issuer before delivery of the obligation, such signature or facsimile is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if the person had remained the member until such delivery, and in case the seal to be affixed to or printed on obligations has been changed after the seal has been affixed to or a facsimile of the seal has been printed on the obligations, that seal or facsimile seal shall continue to be sufficient as to those obligations and obligations issued in substitution or exchange therefor. (H) The obligations are negotiable instruments and securities under Chapter 1308. of the Revised Code, subject to the provisions of the bond proceedings as to registration. Obligations may be issued in coupon or in fully registered form, or both, as the issuer determines. Provision may be made for the registration of any obligations with coupons attached as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest, their exchange for obligations so registered, and for the conversion or reconversion into obligations with coupons attached of any obligations registered as to both principal and interest, and for reasonable charges for such registration, exchange, conversion, and reconversion. Pending preparation of definitive obligations, the issuer may issue interim receipts or certificates which shall be exchanged for such definitive obligations. (I) Obligations may be sold at public sale or at private sale, and at such price at, above, or below par, as determined by the issuer in the bond proceedings. (J) In the discretion of the issuer, obligations may be secured additionally by a trust agreement between the state and a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having a place of business within the state. Any trust agreement may contain the order authorizing the issuance of the obligations, any provisions that may be contained in the bond proceedings, and other provisions that are customary or appropriate in an agreement of the type. (K) Except to the extent that their rights are restricted by the bond proceedings, any holder of obligations, or a trustee under the bond proceedings, may by any suitable form of legal proceedings protect and enforce any rights under the laws of this state or granted by the bond proceedings. Such rights include the right to compel the performance of all duties of the issuer and the state. Each duty of the issuer and the issuer's employees, and of each state agency and local public entity and its officers, members, or employees, undertaken pursuant to the bond proceedings, is hereby established as a duty of the issuer, and of each such agency, local subdivision, officer, member, or employee having authority to perform such duty, specifically enjoined by the law and resulting from an office, trust, or station within the meaning of section 2731.01 of the Revised Code. The persons who are at the time the issuer, or the issuer's employees, are not liable in their personal capacities on any obligations or any agreements of or with the issuer relating to obligations or under the bond proceedings. (L) Obligations are lawful investments for banks, societies for savings, savings and loan associations, deposit guarantee associations, trust companies, trustees, fiduciaries, insurance companies, including domestic for life and domestic not for life, trustees or other officers having charge of sinking and bond retirement or other special funds of political subdivisions and taxing districts of this state, the commissioners of the sinking fund, the administrator of workers' compensation, the state teachers retirement system, the public employees retirement system, the school employees retirement system, and the Ohio police and fire pension fund, notwithstanding any other provisions of the Revised Code or rules adopted pursuant thereto by any state agency with respect to investments by them, and are also acceptable as security for the deposit of public moneys. (M) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in the special funds established by or pursuant to this section may be invested by or on behalf of the issuer only in notes, bonds, or other direct obligations of the United States or of any agency or instrumentality of the United States, in obligations of this state or any political subdivision of this state, in certificates of deposit of any national bank located in this state and any bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code, subject to inspection by the superintendent of financial institutions, in the Ohio subdivision's fund established pursuant to section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code, in no-front-end-load money market mutual funds consisting exclusively of direct obligations of the United States or of an agency or instrumentality of the United States, and in repurchase agreements, including those issued by any fiduciary, secured by direct obligations of the United States or an agency or instrumentality of the United States, and in collective investment funds established in accordance with section 1111.14 of the Revised Code and consisting exclusively of direct obligations of the United States or of an agency or instrumentality of the United States, notwithstanding division (A)(1)(c) of that section. The income from investments shall be credited to such special funds or otherwise as the issuer determines in the bond proceedings, and the investments may be sold or exchanged at such times as the issuer determines or authorizes. (N) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in a special fund shall be disbursed on the order of the issuer, provided that no such order is required for the payment from the bond service fund or other special fund when due of bond service charges or required payments under credit facilities. (O) The issuer may covenant in the bond proceedings, and any such covenants shall be controlling notwithstanding any other provision of law, that the state and the applicable officers and agencies of the state, including the general assembly, so long as any obligations are outstanding in accordance with their terms, shall maintain statutory authority for and cause to be charged and collected taxes, excises, and other receipts of the state so that the receipts to the bond service fund shall be sufficient in amounts to meet bond service charges and for the establishment and maintenance of any reserves and other requirements, including payment of financing costs, provided for in the bond proceedings. (P) The obligations, and the transfer of, and the interest and other income from, including any profit made on the sale, transfer, or other disposition of, the obligations shall at all times be free from taxation, direct or indirect, within the state. (Q) Unless a judicial action or proceeding challenging the validity of obligations is commenced by personal service on the treasurer of state prior to the initial delivery of an issue of the obligations, the obligations of that issue and the bond proceedings pertaining to that issue are incontestable and those obligations shall be conclusively considered to be and to have been issued, secured, payable, sold, executed, and delivered, and the bond proceedings relating to them taken, in conformity with law if all of the following apply to the obligations: (1) They state that they are issued under the provisions of this section and comply on their face with those provisions; (2) They are issued within the limitations prescribed by this section; (3) Their purchase price has been paid in full; (4) They state that all the bond proceedings were held in compliance with law, which statement creates a conclusive presumption that the bond proceedings were held in compliance with all laws, including section 121.22 of the Revised Code, where applicable, and rules. (R) This section applies only with respect to obligations issued and delivered before September 30, 2000. Sec. 183.51. (A) As used in this section and in the applicable bond proceedings unless otherwise provided: (1) "Bond proceedings" means the resolutions, orders, indentures, purchase and sale and trust and other agreements including any amendments or supplements to them, and credit enhancement facilities, and amendments and supplements to them, or any one or more or combination of them, authorizing, awarding, or providing for the terms and conditions applicable to or providing for the security or liquidity of, the particular obligations, and the provisions contained in those obligations. (2) "Bond service fund" means the bond service fund created in the bond proceedings for the obligations. (3) "Capital facilities" means, as applicable, capital facilities or projects as referred to in section 151.03 or 151.04 of the Revised Code. (4) "Consent decree" means the consent decree and final judgment entered November 25, 1998, in the court of common pleas of Franklin county, Ohio, as the same may be amended or supplemented from time to time. (5) "Cost of capital facilities" has the same meaning as in section 151.01 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (6) "Credit enhancement facilities," "financing costs," and "interest" or "interest equivalent" have the same meanings as in section 133.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Debt service" means principal, including any mandatory sinking fund or redemption requirements for retirement of obligations, interest and other accreted amounts, interest equivalent, and any redemption premium, payable on obligations. If not prohibited by the applicable bond proceedings, "debt service" may include costs relating to credit enhancement facilities that are related to and represent, or are intended to provide a source of payment of or limitation on, other debt service. (8) "Improvement fund" means, as applicable, the school building program assistance fund created in section 3318.25 of the Revised Code and the higher education improvement fund created in section 154.21 of the Revised Code. (9) "Issuing authority" means the buckeye tobacco settlement financing authority created in section 183.52 of the Revised Code. (10) "Net proceeds" means amounts received from the sale of obligations, excluding amounts used to refund or retire outstanding obligations, amounts required to be deposited into special funds pursuant to the applicable bond proceedings, and amounts to be used to pay financing costs. (11) "Obligations" means bonds, notes, or other evidences of obligation of the issuing authority, including any appertaining interest coupons, issued by the issuing authority under this section and Section 2i of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, for the purpose of providing funds to the state, in exchange for the assignment and sale described in division (B) of this section, for the purpose of paying costs of capital facilities for: (a) housing branches and agencies of state government limited to facilities for a system of common schools throughout the state and (b) state-supported or state-assisted institutions of higher education. (12) "Pledged receipts" means, as and to the extent provided for in the applicable bond proceedings: (a) Pledged tobacco settlement receipts; (b) Accrued interest received from the sale of obligations; (c) Income from the investment of the special funds; (d) Additional or any other specific revenues or receipts lawfully available to be pledged, and pledged, pursuant to the bond proceedings, including but not limited to amounts received under credit enhancement facilities, to the payment of debt service. (13) "Pledged tobacco settlement receipts" means all amounts received by the issuing authority pursuant to division (B) of this section. (14) "Principal amount" means the aggregate of the amount as stated or provided for in the applicable bond proceedings as the amount on which interest or interest equivalent on particular obligations is initially calculated. "Principal amount" does not include any premium paid to the issuing authority by the initial purchaser of the obligations. "Principal amount" of a capital appreciation bond, as defined in division (C) of section 3334.01 of the Revised Code, means its original face amount and not its accreted value, and "principal amount" of a zero coupon bond, as defined in division (J) of section 3334.01 of the Revised Code, means the discounted offering price at which the bond is initially sold to the public, disregarding any purchase price discount to the original purchaser, if provided in or for pursuant to the bond proceedings. (15) "Special funds" or "funds," unless the context indicates otherwise, means the bond service fund, and any other funds, including any reserve funds, created under the bond proceedings and stated to be special funds in those proceedings, including moneys and investments, and earnings from investments, credited and to be credited to the particular fund. "Special funds" does not include any improvement fund or investment earnings on amounts in any improvement fund, or other funds created by the bond proceedings that are not stated by those proceedings to be special funds. (B) The state may assign and sell to the issuing authority, and the issuing authority may accept and purchase, all or a portion of the amounts to be received by the state under the tobacco master settlement agreement for a purchase price payable by the issuing authority to the state consisting of the net proceeds of obligations and any residual interest, if any. Any such assignment and sale shall be irrevocable in accordance with its terms during the period any obligations secured by amounts so assigned and sold are outstanding under the applicable bond proceedings, and shall constitute a contractual obligation to the holders or owners of those obligations. Any such assignment and sale shall also be treated as an absolute transfer and true sale for all purposes, and not as a pledge or other security interest. The characterization of any such assignment and sale as a true sale and absolute transfer shall not be negated or adversely affected by only a portion of the amounts to be received under the tobacco master settlement agreement being transferred, the acquisition or retention by the state of a residual interest, the participation of any state officer or employee as a member or officer of, or providing staff support to, the issuing authority, any responsibility of an officer or employee of the state for collecting the amounts to be received under the tobacco master settlement agreement or otherwise enforcing that agreement or retaining any legal title to or interest in any portion of the amounts to be received under that agreement for the purpose of these collection activities, any characterization of the issuing authority or its obligations for purposes of accounting, taxation, or securities regulation, or by any other factors whatsoever. A true sale shall exist under this section regardless of whether the issuing authority has any recourse against the state or any other term of the bond proceedings or the treatment or characterization of the transfer as a financing for any purpose. Upon and following the assignment and sale, the state shall not have any right, title, or interest in the portion of the receipts under the tobacco master settlement agreement so assigned and sold, other than any residual interest that may be described in the applicable bond proceedings for those obligations, and that portion, if any, shall be the property of the issuing authority and not of the state, and shall be paid directly to the issuing authority, and shall be owned, received, held, and disbursed by the issuing authority and not by the state. The state may covenant, pledge, and agree in the bond proceedings, with and for the benefit of the issuing authority, the holders and owners of obligations, and providers of any credit enhancement facilities, that it shall: (1) maintain statutory authority for, and cause to be collected and paid directly to the issuing authority or its assignee, the pledged receipts, (2) enforce the rights of the issuing authority to receive the receipts under the tobacco master settlement agreement assigned and sold to the issuing authority, (3) not materially impair the rights of the issuing authority to fulfill the terms of its agreements with the holders or owners of outstanding obligations under the bond proceedings, (4) not materially impair the rights and remedies of the holders or owners of outstanding obligations or materially impair the security for those outstanding obligations, and (5) enforce Chapter 1346. of the Revised Code, the tobacco master settlement agreement, and the consent decree to effectuate the collection of the pledged tobacco settlement receipts. The bond proceedings may provide or authorize the manner for determining material impairment of the security for any outstanding obligations, including by assessing and evaluating the pledged receipts in the aggregate. As further provided for in division (H) of this section, the bond proceedings may also include such other covenants, pledges, and agreements by the state to protect and safeguard the security and rights of the holders and owners of the obligations, and of the providers of any credit enhancement facilities, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, any covenant, pledge, or agreement customary in transactions involving the issuance of securities the debt service on which is payable from or secured by amounts received under the tobacco master settlement agreement. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any covenant, pledge, and agreement of the state, if and when made in the bond proceedings, shall be controlling and binding upon, and enforceable against the state in accordance with its terms for so long as any obligations are outstanding under the applicable bond proceedings. The bond proceedings may also include limitations on the remedies available to the issuing authority, the holders and owners of the obligations, and the providers of any credit enhancement facilities, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, a provision that those remedies may be limited to injunctive relief in circumstances where there has been no prior determination by a court of competent jurisdiction that the state has not enforced Chapter 1346. of the Revised Code, the tobacco master settlement agreement, or the consent decree as may have been covenanted or agreed in the bond proceedings under division (B)(5) of this section. Nothing in this section or the bond proceedings shall preclude or limit, or be construed to preclude or limit, the state from regulating or authorizing or permitting the regulation of smoking or from taxing and regulating the sale of cigarettes or other tobacco products, or from defending or prosecuting cases or other actions relating to the sale or use of cigarettes or other tobacco products. Except as otherwise may be agreed in writing by the attorney general, nothing in this section or the bond proceedings shall modify or limit, or be construed to modify or limit, the responsibility, power, judgment, and discretion of the attorney general to protect and discharge the duties, rights, and obligations of the state under the tobacco master settlement agreement, the consent decree, or Chapter 1346. of the Revised Code. The governor and the director of budget and management, in consultation with the attorney general, on behalf of the state, and any member or officer of the issuing authority as authorized by that issuing authority, on behalf of the issuing authority, may take any action and execute any documents, including any purchase and sale agreements, necessary to effect the assignment and sale and the acceptance of the assignment and title to the receipts including, providing irrevocable direction to the escrow agent acting under the tobacco master settlement agreement to transfer directly to the issuing authority the amounts to be received under that agreement that are subject to such assignment and sale. Any purchase and sale agreement or other bond proceedings may contain the terms and conditions established by the state and the issuing authority to carry out and effectuate the purposes of this section, including, without limitation, covenants binding the state in favor of the issuing authority and its assignees and the owners of the obligations. Any such purchase and sale agreement shall be sufficient to effectuate such purchase and sale without regard to any other laws governing other property sales or financial transactions by the state. Not later than two years following the date on which there are no longer any obligations outstanding under the bond proceedings, all assets of the issuing authority shall vest in the state, the issuing authority shall execute any necessary assignments or instruments, including any assignment of any right, title, or ownership to the state for receipt of amounts under the tobacco master settlement agreement, and the issuing authority shall be dissolved. (C) The issuing authority is authorized to issue and to sell obligations as provided in this section. The aggregate principal amount of obligations issued under this section shall not exceed six billion dollars, exclusive of obligations issued under division (M)(1) of this section to refund, renew, or advance refund other obligations issued or incurred. At least seventy-five per cent of the aggregate net proceeds of the obligations issued under the authority of this section, exclusive of obligations issued to refund, renew, or advance refund other obligations, shall be paid to the state for deposit into the school building program assistance fund created in section 3318.25 of the Revised Code. (D) Each issue of obligations shall be authorized by resolution or order of the issuing authority. The bond proceedings shall provide for or authorize the manner for determining the principal amount or maximum principal amount of obligations of an issue, the principal maturity or maturities, the interest rate or rates, the date of and the dates of payment of interest on the obligations, their denominations, and the place or places of payment of debt service which may be within or outside the state. Unless otherwise provided by law, the latest principal maturity may not be later than the earlier of the thirty-first day of December of the fiftieth calendar year after the year of issuance of the particular obligations or of the fiftieth calendar year after the year in which the original obligation to pay was issued or entered into. Sections 9.96, 9.98, 9.981, 9.982, and 9.983 of the Revised Code apply to the obligations. The purpose of the obligations may be stated in the bond proceedings in general terms, such as, as applicable, "paying costs of capital facilities for a system of common schools" and "paying costs of facilities for state-supported and state-assisted institutions of higher education." Unless otherwise provided in the bond proceedings or in division (C) of this section, the net proceeds from the issuance of the obligations shall be paid to the state for deposit into the applicable improvement fund. In addition to the investments authorized in Chapter 135. of the Revised Code, the net proceeds held in an improvement fund may be invested by the treasurer of state in guaranteed investment contracts with providers rated at the time of any investment in the three highest rating categories by two nationally recognized rating agencies, all subject to the terms and conditions set forth in those agreements or the bond proceedings. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Chapter 3318. of the Revised Code, net proceeds of obligations deposited into the school building program assistance fund created in section 3318.25 of the Revised Code may be used to pay basic project costs under that chapter at the times determined by the Ohio facilities construction commission without regard to whether those expenditures are in proportion to the state's and the school district's respective shares of that basic project cost; provided that this shall not result in any change in the state or school district shares of the basic project costs as determined under that chapter. As used in the preceding sentence, "Ohio facilities construction commission" and "basic project costs" have the same meanings as in section 3318.01 of the Revised Code. (E) The issuing authority may, without need for any other approval, appoint or provide for the appointment of paying agents, bond registrars, securities depositories, credit enhancement providers or counterparties, clearing corporations, and transfer agents, and retain or contract for the services of underwriters, investment bankers, financial advisers, accounting experts, marketing, remarketing, indexing, and administrative agents, other consultants, and independent contractors, including printing services, as are necessary in the judgment of the issuing authority to carry out the issuing authority's functions under this section and section 183.52 of the Revised Code. The attorney general as counsel to the issuing authority shall represent the authority in the execution of its powers and duties, and shall institute and prosecute all actions on its behalf. The issuing authority, in consultation with the attorney general, shall select counsel, and the attorney general shall appoint the counsel selected, for the purposes of carrying out the functions under this section and related sections of the Revised Code. Financing costs are payable, as may be provided in the bond proceedings, from the proceeds of the obligations, from special funds, or from other moneys available for the purpose, including as to future financing costs, from the pledged receipts. (F) The issuing authority may irrevocably pledge and assign all, or such portion as the issuing authority determines, of the pledged receipts to the payment of the debt service charges on obligations issued under this section, and for the establishment and maintenance of any reserves, as provided in the bond proceedings, and make other provisions in the bond proceedings with respect to pledged receipts as authorized by this section, which provisions are controlling notwithstanding any other provisions of law pertaining to them. Any and all pledged receipts received by the issuing authority and required by the bond proceedings, consistent with this section, to be deposited, transferred, or credited to the bond service fund, and all other money transferred or allocated to or received for the purposes of that fund, shall be deposited and credited to the bond service fund created in the bond proceedings for the obligations, subject to any applicable provisions of those bond proceedings, but without necessity for any act of appropriation. Those pledged receipts shall immediately be subject to the lien of that pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and shall not be subject to other court judgments. The lien of the pledge of those pledged receipts shall be valid and binding against all parties having claims of any kind against the issuing authority, irrespective of whether those parties have notice thereof. The pledge shall create a perfected security interest for all purposes of Chapter 1309. of the Revised Code and a perfected lien for purposes of any other interest, all without the necessity for separation or delivery of funds or for the filing or recording of the applicable bond proceedings by which that pledge is created or any certificate, statement, or other document with respect thereto. The pledge of the pledged receipts shall be effective and the money therefrom and thereof may be applied to the purposes for which pledged. (G) Obligations may be further secured, as determined by the issuing authority, by an indenture or a trust agreement between the issuing authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having a place of business within the state. Any indenture or trust agreement may contain the resolution or order authorizing the issuance of the obligations, any provisions that may be contained in any bond proceedings, and other provisions that are customary or appropriate in an agreement of that type, including, but not limited to: (1) Maintenance of each pledge, indenture, trust agreement, or other instrument comprising part of the bond proceedings until the issuing authority has fully paid or provided for the payment of debt service on the obligations secured by it; (2) In the event of default in any payments required to be made by the bond proceedings, enforcement of those payments or agreements by mandamus, the appointment of a receiver, suit in equity, action at law, or any combination of them; (3) The rights and remedies of the holders or owners of obligations and of the trustee and provisions for protecting and enforcing them, including limitations on rights of individual holders and owners. (H) The bond proceedings may contain additional provisions customary or appropriate to the financing or to the obligations or to particular obligations including, but not limited to, provisions for: (1) The redemption of obligations prior to maturity at the option of the issuing authority or of the holder or upon the occurrence of certain conditions, and at a particular price or prices and under particular terms and conditions; (2) The form of and other terms of the obligations; (3) The establishment, deposit, investment, and application of special funds, and the safeguarding of moneys on hand or on deposit, in lieu of the applicability of provisions of Chapter 131. or 135. of the Revised Code, but subject to any special provisions of this section with respect to the application of particular funds or moneys. Any financial institution that acts as a depository of any moneys in special funds or other funds under the bond proceedings may furnish indemnifying bonds or pledge securities as required by the issuing authority. (4) Any or every provision of the bond proceedings being binding upon the issuing authority and upon such governmental agency or entity, officer, board, authority, agency, department, institution, district, or other person or body as may from time to time be authorized to take actions as may be necessary to perform all or any part of the duty required by the provision; (5) The maintenance of each pledge or instrument comprising part of the bond proceedings until the issuing authority has fully paid or provided for the payment of the debt service on the obligations or met other stated conditions; (6) In the event of default in any payments required to be made by the bond proceedings, or by any other agreement of the issuing authority made as part of a contract under which the obligations were issued or secured, including a credit enhancement facility, the enforcement of those payments by mandamus, a suit in equity, an action at law, or any combination of those remedial actions; (7) The rights and remedies of the holders or owners of obligations or of book-entry interests in them, and of third parties under any credit enhancement facility, and provisions for protecting and enforcing those rights and remedies, including limitations on rights of individual holders or owners; (8) The replacement of mutilated, destroyed, lost, or stolen obligations; (9) The funding, refunding, or advance refunding, or other provision for payment, of obligations that will then no longer be outstanding for purposes of this section or of the applicable bond proceedings; (10) Amendment of the bond proceedings; (11) Any other or additional agreements with the owners of obligations, and such other provisions as the issuing authority determines, including limitations, conditions, or qualifications, relating to any of the foregoing or the activities of the issuing authority in connection therewith. The bond proceedings shall make provision for the payment of the expenses of the enforcement activity of the attorney general referred to in division (B) of this section from the amounts from the tobacco master settlement agreement assigned and sold to the issuing authority under that division or from the proceeds of obligations, or a combination thereof, which may include provision for both annual payments and a special fund providing reserve amounts for the payment of those expenses. The issuing authority shall not, and shall covenant in the bond proceedings that it shall not, be authorized to and shall not file a voluntary petition under the United States Bankruptcy Code, 11 U.S.C. 101 et seq., as amended, or voluntarily commence any similar bankruptcy proceeding under state law including, without limitation, consenting to the appointment of a receiver or trustee or making a general or specific assignment for the benefit of creditors, and neither any public officer or any organization, entity, or other person shall authorize the issuing authority to be or become a debtor under the United States Bankruptcy Code or take any of those actions under the United States Bankruptcy Code or state law. The state hereby covenants, and the issuing authority shall covenant, with the holders or owners of the obligations, that the state shall not permit the issuing authority to file a voluntary petition under the United States Bankruptcy Code or take any of those actions under the United States Bankruptcy Code or state law during the period obligations are outstanding and for any additional period for which the issuing authority covenants in the bond proceedings, which additional period may, but need not, be a period of three hundred sixty-seven days or more. (I) The obligations requiring execution by or for the issuing authority shall be signed as provided in the bond proceedings, and may bear the official seal of the issuing authority or a facsimile thereof. Any obligation may be signed by the individual who, on the date of execution, is the authorized signer even though, on the date of the obligations, that individual is not an authorized signer. In case the individual whose signature or facsimile signature appears on any obligation ceases to be an authorized signer before delivery of the obligation, that signature or facsimile is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if that individual had remained the authorized signer until delivery. (J) Obligations are investment securities under Chapter 1308. of the Revised Code. Obligations may be issued in bearer or in registered form, registrable as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest, or both, or in certificated or uncertificated form, as the issuing authority determines. Provision may be made for the exchange, conversion, or transfer of obligations and for reasonable charges for registration, exchange, conversion, and transfer. Pending preparation of final obligations, the issuing authority may provide for the issuance of interim instruments to be exchanged for the final obligations. (K) Obligations may be sold at public sale or at private sale, in such manner, and at such price at, above, or below par, all as determined by and provided by the issuing authority in the bond proceedings. (L) Except to the extent that rights are restricted by the bond proceedings, any owner of obligations or provider of or counterparty to a credit enhancement facility may by any suitable form of legal proceedings protect and enforce any rights relating to obligations or that facility under the laws of this state or granted by the bond proceedings. Those rights include the right to compel the performance of all applicable duties of the issuing authority and the state. Each duty of the issuing authority and that issuing authority's officers, staff, and employees, and of each state entity or agency, or using district or using institution, and its officers, members, staff, or employees, undertaken pursuant to the bond proceedings, is hereby established as a duty of the entity or individual having authority to perform that duty, specifically enjoined by law and resulting from an office, trust, or station within the meaning of section 2731.01 of the Revised Code. The individuals who are from time to time members of the issuing authority, or their designees acting pursuant to section 183.52 of the Revised Code, or the issuing authority's officers, staff, agents, or employees, when acting within the scope of their employment or agency, shall not be liable in their personal capacities on any obligations or otherwise under the bond proceedings, or for otherwise exercising or carrying out any purposes or powers of the issuing authority. (M)(1) Subject to any applicable limitations in division (C) of this section, the issuing authority may also authorize and provide for the issuance of: (a) Obligations in the form of bond anticipation notes, and may authorize and provide for the renewal of those notes from time to time by the issuance of new notes. The holders of notes or appertaining interest coupons have the right to have debt service on those notes paid solely from the moneys and special funds, and all or any portion of the pledged receipts, that are or may be pledged to that payment, including the proceeds of bonds or renewal notes or both, as the issuing authority provides in the bond proceedings authorizing the notes. Notes may be additionally secured by covenants of the issuing authority to the effect that the issuing authority will do all things necessary for the issuance of bonds or renewal notes in such principal amount and upon such terms as may be necessary to provide moneys to pay when due the debt service on the notes, and apply their proceeds to the extent necessary, to make full and timely payment of debt service on the notes as provided in the applicable bond proceedings. In the bond proceedings authorizing the issuance of bond anticipation notes the issuing authority shall set forth for the bonds anticipated an estimated schedule of annual principal payments the latest of which shall be no later than provided in division (D) of this section. While the notes are outstanding there shall be deposited, as shall be provided in the bond proceedings for those notes, from the sources authorized for payment of debt service on the bonds, amounts sufficient to pay the principal of the bonds anticipated as set forth in that estimated schedule during the time the notes are outstanding, which amounts shall be used solely to pay the principal of those notes or of the bonds anticipated. (b) Obligations for the refunding, including funding and retirement, and advance refunding, with or without payment or redemption prior to maturity, of any obligations previously issued under this section and any bonds or notes previously issued for the purpose of paying costs of capital facilities for: (i) state-supported or state-assisted institutions of higher education as authorized by sections 151.01 and 151.04 of the Revised Code, pursuant to Sections 2i and 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and (ii) housing branches and agencies of state government limited to facilities for a system of common schools throughout the state as authorized by sections 151.01 and 151.03 of the Revised Code, pursuant to Sections 2i and 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. Refunding obligations may be issued in amounts sufficient to pay or to provide for repayment of the principal amount, including principal amounts maturing prior to the redemption of the remaining prior obligations or bonds or notes, any redemption premium, and interest accrued or to accrue to the maturity or redemption date or dates, payable on the prior obligations or bonds or notes, and related financing costs and any expenses incurred or to be incurred in connection with that issuance and refunding. Subject to the applicable bond proceedings, the portion of the proceeds of the sale of refunding obligations issued under division (M)(1)(b) of this section to be applied to debt service on the prior obligations or bonds or notes shall be credited to an appropriate separate account in the bond service fund and held in trust for the purpose by the issuing authority or by a corporate trustee, and may be invested as provided in the bond proceedings. Obligations authorized under this division shall be considered to be issued for those purposes for which the prior obligations or bonds or notes were issued. (2) The principal amount of refunding, advance refunding, or renewal obligations issued pursuant to division (M) of this section shall be in addition to the amount authorized in division (C) of this section. (N) Obligations are lawful investments for banks, savings and loan associations, credit union share guaranty corporations, trust companies, trustees, fiduciaries, insurance companies, including domestic for life and domestic not for life, trustees or other officers having charge of sinking and bond retirement or other special funds of the state and political subdivisions and taxing districts of this state, notwithstanding any other provisions of the Revised Code or rules adopted pursuant to those provisions by any state agency with respect to investments by them, and are also acceptable as security for the repayment of the deposit of public moneys. The exemptions from taxation in Ohio as provided for in particular sections of the Ohio Constitution and section 5709.76 of the Revised Code apply to the obligations. (O)(1) Unless otherwise provided or provided for in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in a special fund shall be disbursed on the order of the issuing authority. No such order is required for the payment, from the bond service fund or other special fund, when due of debt service or required payments under credit enhancement facilities. (2) Payments received by the issuing authority under interest rate hedges entered into as credit enhancement facilities under this section shall be deposited as provided in the applicable bond proceedings. (P) The obligations shall not be general obligations of the state and the full faith and credit, revenue, and taxing power of the state shall not be pledged to the payment of debt service on them or to any guarantee of the payment of that debt service. The holders or owners of the obligations shall have no right to have any moneys obligated or pledged for the payment of debt service except as provided in this section and in the applicable bond proceedings. The rights of the holders and owners to payment of debt service are limited to all or that portion of the pledged receipts, and those special funds, pledged to the payment of debt service pursuant to the bond proceedings in accordance with this section, and each obligation shall bear on its face a statement to that effect. (Q) Each bond service fund is a trust fund and is hereby pledged to the payment of debt service on the applicable obligations. Payment of that debt service shall be made or provided for by the issuing authority in accordance with the bond proceedings without necessity for any act of appropriation. The bond proceedings may provide for the establishment of separate accounts in the bond service fund and for the application of those accounts only to debt service on specific obligations, and for other accounts in the bond service fund within the general purposes of that fund. (R) Subject to the bond proceedings pertaining to any obligations then outstanding in accordance with their terms, the issuing authority may in the bond proceedings pledge all, or such portion as the issuing authority determines, of the moneys in the bond service fund to the payment of debt service on particular obligations, and for the establishment and maintenance of any reserves for payment of particular debt service. (S)(1) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of special funds may be invested by or on behalf of the issuing authority only in one or more of the following: (a) Notes, bonds, or other direct obligations of the United States or of any agency or instrumentality of the United States, or in no-front-end-load money market mutual funds consisting exclusively of those obligations, or in repurchase agreements, including those issued by any fiduciary, secured by those obligations, or in collective investment funds consisting exclusively of those obligations; (b) Obligations of this state or any political subdivision of this state; (c) Certificates of deposit of any national bank located in this state and any bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code, subject to inspection by the superintendent of financial institutions; (d) The treasurer of state's pooled investment program under section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code; (e) Other investment agreements or repurchase agreements that are consistent with the ratings on the obligations. (2) The income from investments referred to in division (S)(1) of this section shall be credited to special funds or otherwise as the issuing authority determines in the bond proceedings. Those investments may be sold or exchanged at times as the issuing authority determines, provides for, or authorizes. (T) The treasurer of state shall have responsibility for keeping records, making reports, and making payments, relating to any arbitrage rebate requirements under the applicable bond proceedings. (U) The issuing authority shall make quarterly reports to the general assembly of the amounts in, and activities of, each improvement fund, including amounts and activities on the subfund level. Each report shall include a detailed description and analysis of the amount of proceeds remaining in each fund from the sale of obligations pursuant to this section, and any other deposits, credits, interest earnings, disbursements, expenses, transfers, or activities of each fund. (V) The costs of the annual audit of the authority conducted pursuant to section 117.112 of the Revised Code are payable, as may be provided in the bond proceedings, from the proceeds of the obligations, from special funds, or from other moneys available for the purpose, including as to future financing costs, from the pledged receipts. Sec. 317.36. (A) The county recorder shall collect the low- and moderate-income housing trust fund fee as specified in sections 317.114, 317.32, 1563.42, 1702.59, 2505.13, 4141.23, 4509.60, 5164.56, 5310.15, 5703.93, 5719.07, 5727.56, 5733.22, 6101.09, and 6115.09 of the Revised Code. The amount of any housing trust fund fee the recorder is authorized to collect is equal to the amount of any base fee the recorder is authorized to collect for services. The housing trust fund fee shall be collected in addition to the base fee. (B) The recorder shall certify the amounts collected as housing trust fund fees pursuant to division (A) of this section into the county treasury as housing trust fund fees to be paid to the treasurer of state department of development pursuant to section 319.63 of the Revised Code. (C) The document preservation surcharge collected under section 317.32 of the Revised Code is not a base fee under this section. Sec. 319.63. (A) During the first thirty days of each calendar quarter, the county auditor shall pay to the treasurer of state department of development all amounts that the county recorder collected as housing trust fund fees pursuant to section 317.36 of the Revised Code during the previous calendar quarter. If payment is made to the treasurer of state department of development within the first thirty days of the quarter, the county auditor may retain an administrative fee of one per cent of the amount of the trust fund fees collected during the previous calendar quarter. (B) The treasurer of state department of development shall deposit the housing trust fund fees received each year pursuant to this section into the low- and moderate-income housing trust fund created under section 174.02 of the Revised Code. (C) The county auditor shall deposit the administrative fee that the auditor is permitted to retain pursuant to division (A) of this section into the county general fund for the county recorder to use in administering the trust fund fee. Sec. 321.46. (A) To enhance the background and working knowledge of county treasurers in governmental accounting, portfolio reporting and compliance, investments, cybersecurity, and cash management, the auditor of state and the treasurer of state shall conduct education programs for persons elected for the first time to the office of county treasurer and shall hold biennial annual continuing education courses programs for persons who continue to hold the office of county treasurer. Initial education programs for newly (B)(1)(a) Newly elected or appointed county treasurers shall be held between the first day of December and the first Monday of September next following that person's election to the complete at least thirteen hours of initial education within one hundred twenty days of taking the oath of office of county treasurer. Similar initial Initial education programs may also be provided to any county treasurer who is appointed to fill a vacancy or who is elected at a special election hours earned under division (B)(1)(a) of this section may be completed up to one year prior to taking the oath of office. (B)(1) The auditor of state shall determine the manner and content of the initial education programs in the subject areas of governmental accounting and portfolio reporting and compliance. In those areas, newly elected (b) A county treasurers shall take at least treasurer that accumulates more than thirteen hours of initial education before taking officemay credit up to five education hours in excess of the thirteen hours to the next calendar year for application to continuing education requirements described in division (B)(3)(a) of this section. (c) A county treasurer who participates in a training program or seminar established under section 109.43 of the Revised Code may apply up to three hours of training to initial education requirements. (2) The treasurer of state shall determine adopt rules consistent with this section governing the implementation of this section including the manner and content of the initial education programs in the subject areas of investments and cash management. In those areas, newly elected county treasurers shall take at least thirteen hours of education before taking office. The treasurer of state shall determine specific subject areas for content that are reasonably related to the duties of the office of county treasurer. (3)(a) After completing one year in office, a A county treasurer shall take not less than twenty-four complete at least ten hours of continuing education during each biennial cyclecalendar year that begins more than one hundred twenty days after the county treasurer takes the oath of office. For purposes of division (B)(3)(a) of this section, a biennial cycle for continuing education shall be every two calendar years after the treasurer's first year in office. The treasurer of state shall determine the manner and content of the continuing education courses in the subject areas of investments, cash management, the collection of taxes, ethics, and any other subject area that the treasurer of state determines is reasonably related to the duties of the office of the county treasurer. The auditor of state shall determine the manner and content of the continuing education courses in the subject areas of governmental accounting, portfolio reporting and compliance, office management, cybersecurity, and any other subject area that the auditor of state determines is reasonably related to the duties of the office of the county treasurer requirements of this section do not apply to county treasurers who provide a notice of exemption under division (A) of section 321.47 of the Revised Code. (b) A county treasurer who accumulates more than twenty-four ten hours of continuing education in a biennial cycle described calendar year in division (B)(3)(a) of this section may credit the up to five education hours in excess of twenty-four ten continuing education hours to the next biennial cycle. However, regardless of the total number of hours earned, no more than six hours in continuing education determined by the treasurer of state pursuant to calendar year requirements outlined in division (B)(3)(a) of this section and six hours in continuing education determined by the auditor of state pursuant to that division shall be carried over to the next biennial cycle. (c) A county treasurer who participates in a training program or seminar established under section 109.43 of the Revised Code may apply the three up to one and one-half hours of training to the twenty-four ten hours of continuing education required in a biennial cycle under division (B)(3)(a) of this sectioncalendar year. (C) The auditor of state and the treasurer of state may each charge counties a registration or annual fee that will meet actual and necessary expenses of the training of county treasurers, including instructor fees, site acquisition costs, and the cost of course materials, and any other expense directly related to the training provided pursuant to this section. The necessary personal expenses of county treasurers as a result of attending the initial education programs and continuing education courses shall be borne by the counties the treasurers represent. (D) The auditor of state and the treasurer of state may allow any other interested person to attend any of the initial education programs or continuing education courses held pursuant to this section, provided that before attending any such program or course, the interested person shall pay to either the auditor of state or the treasurer of state, as appropriate, the full registration fee set for the program or course. An interested person shall not be charged a registration fee if the person has paid the annual fee pursuant to section 135.22 of the Revised Code for the calendar year in which the program or course is offered. (E)(1) If a county treasurer fails to complete the initial education programs required by this section before within one hundred twenty days after taking the oath of office, the treasurer's authority to invest county funds and to manage the county portfolio immediately is suspended, and this authority is transferred to the county's investment advisory committee until full compliance with the initial education programs is determined by the treasurer of state. (2) If a county treasurer fails to complete continuing education as required by this section, the county treasurer is subject to divisions (B) to (E) of section 321.47 of the Revised Code, including possible suspension of the treasurer's authority to invest county funds and to manage the county portfolio and transfer of this authority to the county's investment advisory committee. (F)(1) Notwithstanding divisions (B) and (E) of this section, a county treasurer who fails to complete the initial education programs or continuing education required by this section shall invest only in the Ohio subdivisions fund pursuant to division (A)(6) of section 135.35 of the Revised Code, in no load money market mutual funds pursuant to division (A)(5) of section 135.35 of the Revised Code, or in time certificates of deposit or savings or deposit accounts pursuant to division (A)(3) of section 135.35 of the Revised Code. (2) A county treasurer who has failed to complete the initial education programs required by this section and invests in other than the investments permitted by division (F)(1) of this section immediately shall have the county treasurer's authority to invest county funds and to manage the county portfolio suspended, and this authority shall be transferred to the county's investment advisory committee until full compliance with the initial education programs is determined by the treasurer of state. (3) If a county treasurer fails to complete continuing education required by this section and invests in other than the investments permitted by division (F)(1) of this section, the county treasurer is subject to divisions (B) to (E) of section 321.47 of the Revised Code, including possible suspension of the treasurer's authority to invest county funds and to manage the county portfolio and transfer of this authority to the county's investment advisory committee. (G)(1)(G) There is hereby created in the state treasury the county treasurer education fund, to be used by the treasurer of state for actual and necessary expenses of initial education programs and continuing education held pursuant to this section and section 135.22 of the Revised Code. All registration fees collected by the treasurer of state under this section and section 135.22 of the Revised Code shall be paid into that fund. (2) All registration fees collected by the auditor of state under this section shall be paid into the auditor of state training program fund established under section 117.44 of the Revised Code. (H) The treasurer of state, with the advice and consent of the auditor of state, may adopt reasonable rules not inconsistent with this section for the implementation of this section. Sec. 321.47. (A) By the fifteenth thirty-first day of January following completion of each biennial cycle described in division (B)(3)(a) of section 321.46 of the Revised Code, each county treasurer shall submit to the auditor treasurer of state shall notify the treasurer of state a complete listing of the continuing education hours completed under the auditor of state's supervision by each county treasurer for that biennial cycle the preceding calendar year pursuant to section 321.46 of the Revised Code. If the county treasurer makes no investments or invests only in those investments permitted by division (F)(2) of section 321.46 of the Revised Code, the county treasurer is not subject to the continuing education requirements and shall provide a notice of exemption to the treasurer of state. (B) By the thirty-first day of January following completion of each biennial cycle described in division (B)(3)(a) of section 321.46 of the Revised Code, the The treasurer of state shall determine whether any county treasurer has failed to comply with the county treasurer's continuing education requirements pursuant to section 321.46 of the Revised Code and, by certified mail, shall notify any county treasurer who has not complied with the requirements. The notice shall contain all of the following: (1) Notification that the county treasurer is deficient in continuing education hours; (2) Notification that if the county treasurer believes the treasurer of state's records are in error, the county treasurer has one month to submit proof to the treasurer of state that the county treasurer is in compliance with the continuing education requirements; (3) Notification that completion of the continuing education requirements also may be obtained by attending courses approved by the auditor of state or the treasurer of state, but that the county treasurer must comply fully with the continuing education requirements and that the treasurer of state must have proof of full compliance by the last day of April following completion of each biennial cycle; (4) Notification that if the county treasurer has failed to comply fully with the continuing education requirements by the last day of April following completion of each biennial cycle, the treasurer of state will notify the prosecuting attorney of that treasurer's county of that fact immediately. (C)(1) Upon receipt of the notice described in division (B)(4) of this section, the prosecuting attorney shall petition the court of common pleas of that county for an order suspending the county treasurer's authority to invest county funds and to manage the county investment portfolio. The petition shall contain a brief statement of the facts and shall show that the county treasurer has failed to comply with the continuing education requirements of section 321.46 of the Revised Code. Before or simultaneously with the filing of the petition, the prosecuting attorney shall serve a copy of the petition upon the county treasurer personally or by certified mail, together with a copy of this section. Upon the filing of the petition, the court, on the motion of the prosecuting attorney, shall enter an order fixing a date for hearing not later than two weeks after the date of filing and shall require that a copy of the order be given to the county treasurer in the manner in which a summons is required to be served or substituted service is required to be made in other cases. (2) On the date fixed for the hearing described in division (C)(1) of this section, or any adjournment of it, the court shall determine from the petition and evidence submitted by either party whether the county treasurer has met the continuing education requirements of section 321.46 of the Revised Code for the preceding biennial cycle described in division (B)(3)(a) of section 321.46 of the Revised Codecalendar year. If the court finds that the county treasurer has failed to meet these continuing education requirements, it shall enter an order transferring the county treasurer's authority to invest county funds and to manage the county portfolio to the county's investment advisory committee until such time as the county treasurer complies fully with the continuing education requirements. (3) The costs of the proceeding shall be assessed or apportioned as the court considers equitable. (D) Upon receiving proof of completion of continuing education requirements for the preceding biennial cycle described in division (B)(3)(a) of section 321.46 of the Revised Codecalendar year, the treasurer of state shall notify the prosecuting attorney that the county treasurer has complied fully with the continuing education requirements. The prosecuting attorney shall submit this information to the court, and the court shall enter an order terminating the authority of the county's investment advisory committee to invest county funds and to manage the county portfolio and restoring such authority to the county treasurer. (E) The proceedings described in divisions (C) and (D) of this section are special proceedings, and final orders in the proceedings may be reviewed and affirmed, modified, or reversed on appeal pursuant to the Rules of Appellate Procedure and, to the extent not in conflict with those rules, pursuant to Chapter 2505. of the Revised Code. Sec. 323.611. (A) At the request of the county treasurer, a board of county commissioners may enter into a contract with any financial institution under which the financial institution, in accordance with the terms of the contract, receives real property and manufactured home tax payments at a post office box, opens the mail delivered to that box, processes the checks and other payments received in such mail and deposits them into the treasurer's account, and provides the county treasurer daily receipt information with respect to such payments. The contract shall not be entered into unless: (1) The contract is awarded in accordance with sections 307.86 to 307.92 of the Revised Code; (2) The treasurer's surety bond includes within its coverage any loss that might occur as the result of the contract; (3) The provisions of the contract do not conflict with accounting and reporting requirements prescribed by the auditor of state. (B) The records of the financial institution are subject to examination by the auditor of state to the same extent as if the services that the financial institution has agreed to perform were being performed by the county treasurer of state. Sec. 956.13. (A) The director of agriculture, after providing an opportunity for an adjudication hearing under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, may assess a civil penalty against a person who has violated or is violating sections 956.01 to 956.18 of the Revised Code or rules adopted under section 956.03 of the Revised Code. (B) A person who is assessed a civil penalty under this section is liable for a civil penalty of not more than two thousand five hundred dollars for a first violation, not more than five thousand dollars for a second violation, and not more than ten thousand dollars for a third or subsequent violation. Each day that a violation continues constitutes a separate violation. (C) Any person assessed a civil penalty under this section shall pay the amount prescribed to the department of agriculture. The department shall remit all money collected under this section to the treasurer of state for deposit in the commercial dog breeding fund created under section 956.18 of the Revised Code. Sec. 1557.03. (A)(1) The commissioners of the sinking fund are authorized to issue and sell, as provided in this section and in amounts from time to time authorized by the general assembly, general obligations of this state for the purpose of financing or assisting in the financing of the costs of projects. The full faith and credit, revenues, and taxing power of the state are and shall be pledged to the timely payment of debt charges on outstanding obligations, all in accordance with Section 2l of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and Chapter 1557. of the Revised Code, excluding from that pledge fees, excises, or taxes relating to the registration, operation, or use of vehicles on the public highways, or to fuels used for propelling those vehicles, and so long as such obligations are outstanding there shall be levied and collected excises and taxes, excluding those excepted above, in amount sufficient to pay the debt charges on such obligations and financing costs relating to credit enhancement facilities. (2) For meetings of the commissioners of the sinking fund pertaining to the obligations under this chapter, each of the commissioners may designate an employee or officer of that commissioner's office to attend meetings when that commissioner is absent for any reason, and such designee, when present, shall be counted in determining whether a quorum is present at any meeting and may vote and participate in all proceedings and actions of the commissioners at that meeting pertaining to the obligations, provided, that such designee shall not execute or cause a facsimile of the designee's signature to be placed on any obligation, or execute any trust agreement or indenture of the commissioners. Such designation shall be in writing, executed by the designating member, and shall be filed with the secretary of the commissioners and such designation may be changed from time to time by a similar written designation. (B) The total principal amount of obligations outstanding at any one time shall not exceed two hundred million dollars, and not more than fifty million dollars in principal amount of obligations to pay costs of projects may be issued in any fiscal year, all determined as provided in Chapter 1557. of the Revised Code. (C) The state may participate by grants or contributions in financing projects under this section made by local government entities. Of the proceeds of the first two hundred million dollars principal amount in obligations issued under this section to pay costs of projects, at least twenty per cent shall be allocated in accordance with section 1557.06 of the Revised Code to grants or contributions to local government entities. The director of budget and management shall establish and maintain records in such manner as to show that the proceeds credited to the Ohio parks and natural resources fund have been expended for the purposes and in accordance with the limitations set forth herein. (D) Each issue of obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the commissioners of the sinking fund. The bond proceedings shall provide for the principal amount or maximum principal amount of obligations of an issue, and shall provide for or authorize the manner or agency for determining the principal maturity or maturities, not exceeding the earlier of twenty-five years from the date the debt represented by the particular obligations was originally contracted, the interest rate or rates, the date of and the dates of payment of interest on the obligations, their denominations, and the establishment within or without the state of a place or places of payment of debt charges. Sections 9.96 and 9.98 to 9.983 of the Revised Code are applicable to the obligations. The purpose of the obligations may be stated in the bond proceedings as "financing or assisting in the financing of projects as provided in Section 2l of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution." (E) The proceeds of the obligations, except for any portion to be deposited in special funds, or in escrow funds for the purpose of refunding outstanding obligations, all as may be provided in the bond proceedings, shall be deposited in the Ohio parks and natural resources fund established by section 1557.02 of the Revised Code. (F) The commissioners of the sinking fund may appoint paying agents, bond registrars, securities depositories, and transfer agents, and may retain the services of financial advisers and accounting experts, and retain or contract for the services of marketing, remarketing, indexing, and administrative agents, other consultants, and independent contractors, including printing services, as are necessary in the judgment of the commissioners to carry out this chapter of the Revised Code. Financing costs are payable, as provided in the bond proceedings, from the proceeds of the obligations, from special funds, or from other moneys available for the purpose. (G) The bond proceedings, including any trust agreement, may contain additional provisions customary or appropriate to the financing or to the obligations or to particular obligations, including, but not limited to: (1) The redemption of obligations prior to maturity at the option of the state or of the holder or upon the occurrence of certain conditions at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as are provided in the bond proceedings; (2) The form of and other terms of the obligations; (3) The establishment, deposit, investment, and application of special funds, and the safeguarding of moneys on hand or on deposit, without regard to Chapter 131. or 135. of the Revised Code, provided that any bank or trust company that acts as a depository of any moneys in special funds may furnish such indemnifying bonds or may pledge such securities as required by the commissioners of the sinking fund; (4) Any or every provision of the bond proceedings binding upon the commissioners of the sinking fund and such state agency or local government entities, officer, board, commission, authority, agency, department, or other person or body as may from time to time have the authority under law to take such actions as may be necessary to perform all or any part of the duty required by such provision; (5) The maintenance of each pledge, any trust agreement, or other instrument composing part of the bond proceedings until the state has fully paid or provided for the payment of the debt charges on the obligations or met other stated conditions; (6) In the event of default in any payments required to be made by the bond proceedings, or any other agreement of the commissioners of the sinking fund made as part of a contract under which the obligations were issued or secured, the enforcement of such payments or agreements by mandamus, suit in equity, action at law, or any combination of the foregoing; (7) The rights and remedies of the holders of obligations and of the trustee under any trust agreement, and provisions for protecting and enforcing them, including limitations on rights of individual holders of obligations; (8) The replacement of any obligations that become mutilated or are destroyed, lost, or stolen; (9) Provision for the funding, refunding, or advance refunding or other provision for payment of obligations which will then no longer be or be deemed to be outstanding for purposes of this section or of the bond proceedings; (10) Any provision that may be made in bond proceedings or a trust agreement, including provision for amendment of the bond proceedings; (11) Such other provisions as the commissioners of the sinking fund determine, including limitations, conditions, or qualifications relating to any of the foregoing; (12) Any other or additional agreements with the holders of the obligations relating to the obligations or the security for the obligations. (H) The great seal of the state or a facsimile of that seal may be affixed to or printed on the obligations. The obligations shall be signed by or bear the facsimile signatures of two or more of the commissioners of the sinking fund as provided in the bond proceedings. Any obligations may be signed by the person who, on the date of execution, is the authorized signer although on the date of such obligations such person was not a commissioner. In case the individual whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any obligation ceases to be a commissioner before delivery of the obligation, such signature or facsimile is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if the individual had remained the member until such delivery, and in case the seal to be affixed to or printed on obligations has been changed after the seal has been affixed to or a facsimile of the seal has been printed on the obligations, that seal or facsimile seal shall continue to be sufficient as to those obligations and obligations issued in substitution or exchange therefor. (I) Obligations may be issued in coupon or in fully registered form, or both, as the commissioners of the sinking fund determine. Provision may be made for the registration of any obligations with coupons attached as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest, their exchange for obligations so registered, and for the conversion or reconversion into obligations with coupons attached of any obligations registered as to both principal and interest, and for reasonable charges for such registration, exchange, conversion, and reconversion. Pending preparation of definitive obligations, the commissioners of the sinking fund may issue interim receipts or certificates which shall be exchanged for such definitive obligations. (J) Obligations may be sold at public sale or at private sale, and at such price at, above, or below par, as determined by the commissioners of the sinking fund in the bond proceedings. (K) In the discretion of the commissioners of the sinking fund, obligations may be secured additionally by a trust agreement between the state and a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having a place of business within the state. Any trust agreement may contain the resolution authorizing the issuance of the obligations, any provisions that may be contained in the bond proceedings, and other provisions that are customary or appropriate in an agreement of the type. (L) Except to the extent that their rights are restricted by the bond proceedings, any holder of obligations, or a trustee under the bond proceedings, may by any suitable form of legal proceedings protect and enforce any rights under the laws of this state or granted by the bond proceedings. Such rights include the right to compel the performance of all duties of the commissioners and the state. Each duty of the commissioners and employees of the commissioners, and of each state agency and local public entity and its officers, members, or employees, undertaken pursuant to the bond proceedings, is hereby established as a duty of the commissioners, and of each such agency, local government entity, officer, member, or employee having authority to perform such duty, specifically enjoined by the law and resulting from an office, trust, or station within the meaning of section 2731.01 of the Revised Code. The persons who are at the time the commissioners, or employees of the commissioners, are not liable in their personal capacities on any obligations or any agreements of or with the commissioners relating to obligations or under the bond proceedings. (M) Obligations are lawful investments for banks, societies for savings, savings and loan associations, deposit guarantee associations, trust companies, trustees, fiduciaries, insurance companies, including domestic for life and domestic not for life, trustees or other officers having charge of sinking and bond retirement or other special funds of political subdivisions and taxing districts of this state, the commissioners of the sinking fund, the administrator of workers' compensation, the state teachers retirement system, the public employees retirement system, the school employees retirement system, and the Ohio police and fire pension fund, notwithstanding any other provisions of the Revised Code or rules adopted pursuant thereto by any state agency with respect to investments by them, and are also acceptable as security for the deposit of public moneys. (N) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in the special funds established by or pursuant to this section may be invested by or on behalf of the commissioners of the sinking fund only in notes, bonds, or other direct obligations of the United States or of any agency or instrumentality of the United States, in obligations of this state or any political subdivision of this state, in certificates of deposit of any national bank located in this state and any bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code, subject to inspection by the superintendent of financial institutions, in the Ohio subdivision's fund established pursuant to section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code, in no-front-end-load money market mutual funds consisting exclusively of direct obligations of the United States or of an agency or instrumentality of the United States, and in repurchase agreements, including those issued by any fiduciary, secured by direct obligations of the United States or an agency or instrumentality of the United States, and in collective investment funds established in accordance with section 1111.14 of the Revised Code and consisting exclusively of direct obligations of the United States or of an agency or instrumentality of the United States, notwithstanding division (A)(1)(c) of that section. The income from investments shall be credited to such special funds or otherwise as the commissioners of the sinking fund determine in the bond proceedings, and the investments may be sold or exchanged at such times as the commissioners determine or authorize. (O) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in a special fund shall be disbursed on the order of the commissioners of the sinking fund, provided that no such order is required for the payment from the bond service fund or other special fund when due of debt charges or required payments under credit enhancement facilities. (P) The commissioners of the sinking fund may covenant in the bond proceedings, and any such covenants shall be controlling notwithstanding any other provision of law, that the state and the applicable officers and agencies of the state, including the general assembly, so long as any obligations are outstanding in accordance with their terms, shall maintain statutory authority for and cause to be charged and collected taxes, excises, and other receipts of the state so that the receipts to the bond service fund shall be sufficient in amounts to meet debt charges and for the establishment and maintenance of any reserves and other requirements, including payment of the costs of credit enhancement facilities, provided for in the bond proceedings. (Q) The obligations, the transfer thereof, and the interest, other accreted amounts, and other income therefrom, including any profit made on the sale thereof, at all times shall be free from taxation, direct or indirect, within the state. (R) This section applies only with respect to obligations issued and delivered before September 30, 2000. Sec. 3307.12. The treasurer of state shall be the custodian of the funds of the state teachers retirement system funds created under section 3307.14 of the Revised Code, and all disbursements therefrom shall be paid by him the treasurer of state only upon instruments duly authorized by the state teachers retirement board and bearing the signatures of the chairman chairperson and secretary of the board. Such signatures may be affixed through the use of a mechanical check signing device. The treasurer of state shall give a separate and additional bond in such amount as is fixed by the governor and with sureties selected by the board and approved by the governor, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of the treasurer of state as custodian of the funds of the system. Such bond shall be deposited with the secretary of state and kept in his the secretary of state's office. The governor may require the treasurer of state to give additional bonds, as the funds of the system increase, in such amounts and at such times as are fixed by the governor, which additional bonds shall be conditioned, filed, and obtained as is provided for the original bond of the treasurer of state covering the funds of the system. The premium on all bonds shall be paid by the board. The money held in the depository accounts of any entity established directly or indirectly to facilitate the investment of funds pursuant to section 3307.15 of the Revised Code are not public moneys or public deposits for the purposes of Chapters 113. and 135. of the Revised Code and shall not be considered to be in the custody of the treasurer of state shall deposit any portion of the funds of the . The state teachers retirement system not needed for immediate use in the same manner as state funds are deposited, and subject to all law with respect to the deposit of state funds, by the treasurer of state, and all interest earned by such portion of the retirement funds as is deposited by the treasurer of state shall be collected by himand placed to the credit of the boardshall have sole responsibility for such depository accounts. Sec. 3333.374. (A) The chancellor of higher education, with the approval of the treasurer of state, shall adopt rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, establishing policy guidelines for the implementation of the scholarship and fellowship programs. (B) Nothing in this section shall prevent the chancellor, with the approval of the treasurer of state, from amending or rescinding rules adopted pursuant to division (A) of this section, or from adopting new rules, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, from time to time as are necessary to further the purposes of sections 3333.37 to 3333.375 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3334.08. (A) Subject to division (B) of this section, in addition to any other powers conferred by this chapter, the Ohio tuition trust authority may do any of the following: (1) Impose reasonable residency requirements for beneficiaries of tuition units; (2) Impose reasonable limits on the number of tuition unit participants; (3) Impose and collect administrative fees and charges in connection with any transaction under this chapter; (4) Purchase insurance from insurers licensed to do business in this state providing for coverage against any loss in connection with the authority's property, assets, or activities or to further ensure the value of tuition units; (5) Indemnify or purchase policies of insurance on behalf of members, officers, and employees of the authority from insurers licensed to do business in this state providing for coverage for any liability incurred in connection with any civil action, demand, or claim against a director, officer, or employee by reason of an act or omission by the director, officer, or employee that was not manifestly outside the scope of the employment or official duties of the director, officer, or employee or with malicious purpose, in bad faith, or in a wanton or reckless manner; (6) Make, execute, and deliver contracts, conveyances, and other instruments necessary to the exercise and discharge of the powers and duties of the authority; (7) Promote, advertise, and publicize the Ohio college savings program and the variable college savings program; (8) Adopt rules under section 111.15 of the Revised Code for the implementation of the Ohio college savings program; (9) Contract, for the provision of all or part of the services necessary for the management and operation of the Ohio college savings program and the variable college savings program, with a bank, trust company, savings and loan association, insurance company, or licensed dealer in securities if the bank, company, association, or dealer is authorized to do business in this state and information about the contract is filed with the controlling board pursuant to division (D)(6) of section 127.16 of the Revised Code; provided, however, that any funds of the Ohio college savings program and the variable college savings program that are not needed for immediate use shall be deposited by the treasurer of state in the same manner provided under Chapter 135. of the Revised Code for public moneys of the state. All interest earned on those deposits shall be credited to the Ohio college savings program or the variable college savings program, as applicable. (10) Contract for other services, or for goods, needed by the authority in the conduct of its business, including but not limited to credit card services; (11) Employ an executive director and other personnel as necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter, and fix the compensation of these persons. All employees of the authority shall be in the unclassified civil service and shall be eligible for membership in the public employees retirement system. In the hiring of the executive director, the Ohio tuition trust authority shall obtain the advice and consent of the Ohio tuition trust investment board created in section 3334.03 of the Revised Code, provided that the executive director shall not be hired unless a majority of the board votes in favor of the hiring. In addition, the board may remove the executive director at any time subject to the advice and consent of the chancellor of higher education. (12) Contract with financial consultants, actuaries, auditors, and other consultants as necessary to carry out its responsibilities under this chapter; (13) Enter into agreements with any agency of the state or its political subdivisions or with private employers under which an employee may agree to have a designated amount deducted in each payroll period from the wages or salary due the employee for the purpose of purchasing tuition units pursuant to a tuition payment contract or making contributions pursuant to a variable college savings program contract; (14) Enter into an agreement with the treasurer of state under which the treasurer of state will receive, and credit to the Ohio tuition trust fund or variable college savings program fund, from any bank or savings and loan association authorized to do business in this state, amounts that a depositor of the bank or association authorizes the bank or association to withdraw periodically from the depositor's account for the purpose of purchasing tuition units pursuant to a tuition payment contract or making contributions pursuant to a variable college savings program contract; (15) Solicit and accept gifts, grants, and loans from any person or governmental agency and participate in any governmental program; (16)(15) Impose limits on the number of units which may be purchased on behalf of or assigned or awarded to any beneficiary and on the total amount of contributions that may be made on behalf of a beneficiary; (17)(16) Impose restrictions on the substitution of another individual for the original beneficiary under the Ohio college savings program; (18)(17) Impose a limit on the age of a beneficiary, above which tuition units may not be purchased on behalf of that beneficiary; (19) Enter into a cooperative agreement with the treasurer of state to provide for the direct disbursement of payments under tuition payment or variable college savings program contracts; (20)(18) Terminate any tuition payment or variable college savings program contract if no purchases or contributions are made for a period of three years or more and there are fewer than a total of five tuition units or less than a dollar amount set by rule on account, provided that notice of a possible termination shall be provided in advance, explaining any options to prevent termination, and a reasonable amount of time shall be provided within which to act to prevent a termination; (21)(19) Maintain a separate account for each tuition payment or variable college savings program contract; (22)(20) Perform all acts necessary and proper to carry out the duties and responsibilities of the authority pursuant to this chapter. (B) The authority shall adopt rules under section 111.15 of the Revised Code for the implementation and administration of the variable college savings program. The rules shall provide taxpayers with the maximum tax advantages and flexibility consistent with section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code and regulations adopted thereunder with regard to disposition of contributions and earnings, designation of beneficiaries, and rollover of account assets to other programs. (C) Except as otherwise specified in this chapter, the provisions of Chapters 123. and 4117. of the Revised Code shall not apply to the authority and Chapter 125. of the Revised Code shall not apply to contracts approved under the powers of the Ohio tuition trust authority investment board under section 3334.03 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3334.11. (A) The assets of the Ohio tuition trust authority reserved for payment of the obligations of the authority pursuant to tuition payment contracts shall be placed in a fund, which is hereby created and shall be known as the Ohio tuition trust fund. The fund shall be in the custody of the treasurer of state, but shall not be part of the state treasury. That portion of payments received by the authority or the treasurer of state from persons purchasing tuition units under tuition payment contracts that the authority determines is actuarially necessary for the payment of obligations of the authority pursuant to tuition payment contracts, all interest and investment income earned by the fund, and all other receipts of the authority from any other source that the authority determines appropriate, shall be deposited in the fund. No purchaser or beneficiary of tuition units shall have any claim against the funds of any state institution of higher education. All investment fees and other costs incurred in connection with the exercise of the investment powers of the authority pursuant to divisions (D) and (E) of this section shall be paid from the assets of the fund. (B) Unless otherwise provided by the authority, the assets of the Ohio tuition trust fund shall be expended in the following order: (1) To make payments to beneficiaries, or institutions of higher education on behalf of beneficiaries, under division (B) of section 3334.09 of the Revised Code; (2) To make refunds as provided in divisions (A) and (C) of section 3334.10 of the Revised Code; (3) To pay the investment fees and other costs of administering the fund. (C)(1) Except as may be provided in an agreement under division (A)(19) of section 3334.08 of the Revised Code, all All disbursements from the Ohio tuition trust fund shall be made by the treasurer of state on order of a designee of the authority. (2) The treasurer of state shall deposit any portion of the Ohio tuition trust fund not needed for immediate use in the same manner as state funds are deposited. (D) The authority is the trustee of the Ohio tuition trust fund. The authority shall have full power to invest the assets of the fund and in exercising this power shall be subject to the limitations and requirements contained in divisions (K) to (M) of this section and sections 145.112 and 145.113 of the Revised Code. The evidences of title of all investments shall be delivered to the treasurer of state or to a qualified trustee designated by the treasurer of state as provided in section 135.18 of the Revised Code. Assets of the fund shall be administered by the authority in a manner designed to be actuarially sound so that the assets of the fund will be sufficient to satisfy the obligations of the authority pursuant to tuition payment contracts and defray the reasonable expenses of administering the fund. (E) The authority may enter into an agreement with any business, entity, or governmental agency to perform the investment duties of the authority as set forth in division (D) of this section. The investment powers shall be exercised by the business, entity, or governmental agency that entered into an agreement with the authority in a manner agreed upon by the authority that maximizes the return on investment and minimizes the administrative expenses. (F)(1) The authority shall maintain a separate account for each tuition payment contract entered into pursuant to division (A) of section 3334.09 of the Revised Code for the purchase of tuition units on behalf of a beneficiary or beneficiaries showing the beneficiary or beneficiaries of that contract and the number of tuition units purchased pursuant to that contract. Upon request of any beneficiary or person who has entered into a tuition payment contract, the authority shall provide a statement indicating, in the case of a beneficiary, the number of tuition units purchased on behalf of the beneficiary, or in the case of a person who has entered into a tuition payment contract, the number of tuition units purchased, used, or refunded pursuant to that contract. A beneficiary and person that have entered into a tuition payment contract each may file only one request under this division in any year. (2) The authority shall maintain an account for each scholarship program showing the number of tuition units that have been purchased for or donated to the program and the number of tuition units that have been used. Upon the request of the entity that established the scholarship program, the authority shall provide a statement indicating these numbers. (G)(1) In addition to the Ohio tuition trust fund, there is hereby established a reserve fund that shall be in the custody of the treasurer of state but shall not be part of the state treasury, and shall be known as the Ohio tuition trust reserve fund, and an operating fund that shall be part of the state treasury, and shall be known as the Ohio tuition trust operating fund. That portion of payments received by the authority or the treasurer of state from persons purchasing tuition units under tuition payment contracts that the authority determines is not actuarially necessary for the payment of obligations of the authority pursuant to tuition payment contracts, any interest and investment income earned by the reserve fund, any administrative charges and fees imposed by the authority on transactions under this chapter or on purchasers or beneficiaries of tuition units, and all other receipts from any other source that the authority determines appropriate, shall be deposited in the reserve fund to pay the operating expenses of the authority and the costs of administering the program. The assets of the reserve fund may be invested in the same manner and subject to the same limitations set forth in divisions (D), (E), and (K) to (M) of this section and sections 145.112 and 145.113 of the Revised Code. All investment fees and other costs incurred in connection with the exercise of the investment powers shall be paid from the assets of the reserve fund. Except as otherwise provided for in this chapter, all operating expenses of the authority and costs of administering the program shall be paid from the operating fund. (2) The treasurer of state shall, upon request of the authority, transfer funds from the reserve fund to the operating fund as the authority determines appropriate to pay those current operating expenses of the authority and costs of administering the program as the authority designates. Any interest or investment income earned on the assets of the operating fund shall be deposited in the operating fund. (3) The treasurer of state shall, upon request by the chancellor of higher education and approval by the director of budget and management, transfer funds from the reserve fund to the strategic square footage reduction fund created under section 3333.96 of the Revised Code. (H) In January of each year the authority shall report to each person who received any payments or refunds from the authority during the preceding year information relative to the value of the payments or refunds to assist in determining that person's tax liability. (I) The authority shall report to the tax commissioner any information, and at the times, as the tax commissioner requires to determine any tax liability that a person may have incurred during the preceding year as a result of having received any payments or refunds from the authority. (J) All records of the authority indicating the identity of purchasers and beneficiaries of tuition units or college savings bonds, the number of tuition units purchased, used, or refunded under a tuition payment contract, and the number of college savings bonds purchased, held, or redeemed are not public records within the meaning of section 149.43 of the Revised Code. (K)(1) The authority and other fiduciaries shall discharge their duties with respect to the funds with care, skill, prudence, and diligence under the circumstances then prevailing that a prudent person acting in a like capacity and familiar with such matters would use in the conduct of an enterprise of a like character and with like aims; and by diversifying the investments of the assets of the funds so as to minimize the risk of large losses, unless under the circumstances it is clearly prudent not to do so. (2) To facilitate investment of the funds, the authority may establish a partnership, trust, limited liability company, corporation, including a corporation exempt from taxation under the Internal Revenue Code, 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C. 1, as amended, or any other legal entity authorized to transact business in this state. (L) In exercising its fiduciary responsibility with respect to the investment of the assets of the funds, it shall be the intent of the authority to give consideration to investments that enhance the general welfare of the state and its citizens where the investments offer quality, return, and safety comparable to other investments currently available to the authority. In fulfilling this intent, equal consideration shall also be given to investments otherwise qualifying under this section that involve minority owned and controlled firms and firms owned and controlled by women, either alone or in joint venture with other firms. The authority shall adopt, in regular meeting, policies, objectives, or criteria for the operation of the investment program that include asset allocation targets and ranges, risk factors, asset class benchmarks, time horizons, total return objectives, and performance evaluation guidelines. In adopting policies and criteria for the selection of agents with whom the authority may contract for the administration of the assets of the funds, the authority shall give equal consideration to minority owned and controlled firms, firms owned and controlled by women, and ventures involving minority owned and controlled firms and firms owned and controlled by women that otherwise meet the policies and criteria established by the authority. Amendments and additions to the policies and criteria shall be adopted in regular meeting. The authority shall publish its policies, objectives, and criteria under this provision no less often than annually and shall make copies available to interested parties. When reporting on the performance of investments, the authority shall comply with the performance presentation standards established by the association for investment management and research. (M) All investments shall be purchased at current market prices and the evidences of title of the investments shall be placed in the hands of the treasurer of state, who is hereby designated as custodian thereof, or in the hands of the treasurer of state's authorized agent. The treasurer of state or the agent shall collect the principal, dividends, distributions, and interest thereon as they become due and payable and place them when so collected into the custodial funds. The treasurer of state shall pay for investments purchased by the authority on receipt of written or electronic instructions from the authority or the authority's designated agent authorizing the purchase and pending receipt of the evidence of title of the investment by the treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's authorized agent. The authority may sell investments held by the authority, and the treasurer of state or the treasurer of state's authorized agent shall accept payment from the purchaser and deliver evidence of title of the investment to the purchaser on receipt of written or electronic instructions from the authority or the authority's designated agent authorizing the sale, and pending receipt of the moneys for the investments. The amount received shall be placed in the custodial funds. The authority and the treasurer of state may enter into agreements to establish procedures for the purchase and sale of investments under this division and the custody of the investments. No purchase or sale of any investment shall be made under this section except as authorized by the authority. Any statement of financial position distributed by the authority shall include fair value, as of the statement date, of all investments held by the authority under this section. Sec. 3705.242. (A)(1) The director of health, a person authorized by the director, a local commissioner of health, or a local registrar of vital statistics shall charge and collect a fee of one dollar and fifty cents for each certified copy of a birth record, each certification of birth, and each copy of a death record. The fee is in addition to the fee imposed by section 3705.24 or any other section of the Revised Code. A local commissioner of health or local registrar of vital statistics may retain an amount of each additional fee collected, not to exceed three per cent of the amount of the additional fee, to be used for costs directly related to the collection of the fee and the forwarding of the fee to the department of health. The additional fees collected by the director of health or a person authorized by the director and the additional fees collected but not retained by a local commissioner of health or a local registrar of vital statistics shall be forwarded to the department of health not later than thirty days following the end of each quarter. Not later than two days after the fees are forwarded to the department each quarter, the department shall pay deposit the collected fees to into the treasurer of state in accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state under section 113.08 of the Revised Codetreasury to the credit of the family violence prevention fund. (2) On the filing of a divorce decree under section 3105.10 or a decree of dissolution under section 3105.65 of the Revised Code, a court of common pleas shall charge and collect a fee of five dollars and fifty cents. The fee is in addition to any other court costs or fees. The county clerk of courts may retain an amount of each additional fee collected, not to exceed three per cent of the amount of the additional fee, to be used for costs directly related to the collection of the fee and the forwarding of the fee to the treasurer of state. The additional fees collected, but not retained, under division (A)(2) of this section shall be forwarded to the treasurer of state not later than twenty days following the end of each month. The treasurer of state shall deposit the fees paid or forwarded under this section in the state treasury to the credit of the family violence prevention fund, which is hereby created. (B) The treasurer of state shall deposit the fees paid or forwarded under this section in the state treasury to the credit of the family violence prevention fund, which is hereby created. A person or government entity that fails to pay or forward the fees in the manner described in this section, shall send to the department of public safety a penalty equal to ten per cent of the fees. The department of public safety shall forward deposit all collected late fees to the treasurer of state for deposit into the family violence prevention fund in accordance with rules adopted by the treasurer of state under section 113.08 of the Revised Code. The treasurer of state shall invest the moneys in the fund. All earnings resulting from investment of the fund shall be credited to the fund, except that actual administration costs incurred by the treasurer of state in administering the fund may be deducted from the earnings resulting from investments. The amount that may be deducted shall not exceed three per cent of the total amount of fees credited to the fund in each fiscal year. The balance of the investment earnings shall be credited to the fund. (C) The director of public safety shall use money credited to the fund to provide grants to family violence shelters in Ohio and to operate the division of criminal justice services. Sec. 3737.945. Moneys in the funds of the petroleum underground storage tank release compensation board, except as otherwise provided in any resolution authorizing the issuance of its revenue bonds or in any trust agreement securing the same, in excess of current needs, may be invested by the board in notes, bonds, or other obligations of the United States, or of any agency or instrumentality thereof, or in obligations of this state or any political subdivision thereof, or the treasurer of state's investment pool authorized under section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code. Income from all such investments of moneys in any fund shall be credited to such funds as the board determines, subject to the provisions of any resolution or trust agreement, and the investments may be sold as the board determines. Sec. 3953.231. (A)(1) Each title insurance agent or title insurance company shall establish and maintain an interest-bearing trust account for the deposit of all non-directed escrow funds that meet the requirements of sections 1349.20 to 1349.22 of the Revised Code. (2) The account shall be established and maintained in any federally insured bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or savings bank that is authorized to transact business in this state. (3) The account shall be in the name of the title insurance agent or company, and shall be identified as an "interest on trust account" or "IOTA." The name of the account may contain additional identifying information to distinguish it from other accounts. (4) The title insurance agent or company establishing the account shall submit, in writing, to the superintendent of insurance the name, account number, and location of the bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or savings bank in which the trust account is maintained. (B) Each title insurance agent or company shall deposit all non-directed escrow funds that are nominal in amount or are to be held for a short period of time into the account established under division (A) of this section no later than the next business day after receipt. (C) Each account established under division (A) of this section shall comply with all of the following: (1) All funds in the account shall be subject to withdrawal or transfer upon request and without delay, or as soon as permitted by law; (2) The rate of interest payable on the account shall not be less than the rate paid by the bank, savings and loan, credit union, or savings bank to its regular depositors. The rate may be higher if there is no impairment of the right to the immediate withdrawal or transfer of the principal; (3) All interest earned on the account, net of service charges and other related charges, shall be transmitted to the treasurer of state public defender for deposit in the legal aid fund established under section 120.52 of the Revised Code. No part of the interest earned shall be paid to the title insurance agent or company. (D) The title insurance agent or company establishing an account under division (A) of this section shall direct the bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or savings bank to do both of the following: (1) Remit interest or dividends on the average monthly balance in the account, or as otherwise computed in accordance with the standard accounting practice of the bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or savings bank, less reasonable service charges and other related charges, to the treasurer of state public defender at least quarterly for deposit in the legal aid fund established under section 120.52 of the Revised Code; (2) At the time of each remittance, transmit to the treasurer of state public defender, and if requested, to the Ohio access to justice foundation, and the title insurance agent or company, a statement showing the name of the title insurance agent or company for whom the remittance is sent, the rate of interest applied, the accounting period, the net amount remitted to the treasurer of state public defender for each account, the total remitted, the average account balance for each month of the period for which the report is made, and the amount deducted for service charges and other related charges. (E) The statements and reports submitted by the bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or savings bank under this section, are not public records subject to section 149.43 of the Revised Code and shall be used only to administer the legal aid fund. (F) No funds belonging to a title insurance agent or company shall be deposited into an account established under division (A) of this section except funds necessary to pay service charges and other related charges of the bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or savings bank that are in excess of earnings on the account. (G) No liability arising out of any negligent act or omission of any title insurance agent or company with respect to any account established under division (A) of this section shall be imputed to the bank, savings and loan association, credit union, or savings bank. (H) No liability or responsibility arising out of any negligent act or omission of any title insurance agent with respect to any account established under division (A) of this section shall be imputed to a title insurance company. (I) The superintendent may adopt, in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, rules that pertain to the use of accounts established under division (A) of this section and to the enforcement of this section. Sec. 4511.19. (A)(1) No person shall operate any vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley within this state, if, at the time of the operation, any of the following apply: (a) The person is under the influence of alcohol, a drug of abuse, or a combination of them. (b) The person has a concentration of eight-hundredths of one per cent or more but less than seventeen-hundredths of one per cent by weight per unit volume of alcohol in the person's whole blood. (c) The person has a concentration of ninety-six-thousandths of one per cent or more but less than two hundred four-thousandths of one per cent by weight per unit volume of alcohol in the person's blood serum or plasma. (d) The person has a concentration of eight-hundredths of one gram or more but less than seventeen-hundredths of one gram by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of the person's breath. (e) The person has a concentration of eleven-hundredths of one gram or more but less than two hundred thirty-eight-thousandths of one gram by weight of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of the person's urine. (f) The person has a concentration of seventeen-hundredths of one per cent or more by weight per unit volume of alcohol in the person's whole blood. (g) The person has a concentration of two hundred four-thousandths of one per cent or more by weight per unit volume of alcohol in the person's blood serum or plasma. (h) The person has a concentration of seventeen-hundredths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of the person's breath. (i) The person has a concentration of two hundred thirty-eight-thousandths of one gram or more by weight of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of the person's urine. (j) Except as provided in division (K) of this section, the person has a concentration of any of the following controlled substances or metabolites of a controlled substance in the person's whole blood, blood serum or plasma, or urine that equals or exceeds any of the following: (i) The person has a concentration of amphetamine in the person's urine of at least five hundred nanograms of amphetamine per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of amphetamine in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least one hundred nanograms of amphetamine per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (ii) The person has a concentration of cocaine in the person's urine of at least one hundred fifty nanograms of cocaine per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of cocaine in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least fifty nanograms of cocaine per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (iii) The person has a concentration of cocaine metabolite in the person's urine of at least one hundred fifty nanograms of cocaine metabolite per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of cocaine metabolite in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least fifty nanograms of cocaine metabolite per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (iv) The person has a concentration of heroin in the person's urine of at least two thousand nanograms of heroin per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of heroin in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least fifty nanograms of heroin per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (v) The person has a concentration of heroin metabolite (6-monoacetyl morphine) in the person's urine of at least ten nanograms of heroin metabolite (6-monoacetyl morphine) per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of heroin metabolite (6-monoacetyl morphine) in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least ten nanograms of heroin metabolite (6-monoacetyl morphine) per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (vi) The person has a concentration of L.S.D. in the person's urine of at least twenty-five nanograms of L.S.D. per milliliter of the person's urine or a concentration of L.S.D. in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least ten nanograms of L.S.D. per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (vii) The person has a concentration of marihuana in the person's urine of at least ten nanograms of marihuana per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of marihuana in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least two nanograms of marihuana per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (viii) Either of the following applies: (I) The person is under the influence of alcohol, a drug of abuse, or a combination of them, and the person has a concentration of marihuana metabolite in the person's urine of at least fifteen nanograms of marihuana metabolite per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of marihuana metabolite in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least five nanograms of marihuana metabolite per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (II) The person has a concentration of marihuana metabolite in the person's urine of at least thirty-five nanograms of marihuana metabolite per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of marihuana metabolite in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least fifty nanograms of marihuana metabolite per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (ix) The person has a concentration of methamphetamine in the person's urine of at least five hundred nanograms of methamphetamine per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of methamphetamine in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least one hundred nanograms of methamphetamine per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (x) The person has a concentration of phencyclidine in the person's urine of at least twenty-five nanograms of phencyclidine per milliliter of the person's urine or has a concentration of phencyclidine in the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma of at least ten nanograms of phencyclidine per milliliter of the person's whole blood or blood serum or plasma. (xi) The state board of pharmacy has adopted a rule pursuant to section 4729.041 of the Revised Code that specifies the amount of salvia divinorum and the amount of salvinorin A that constitute concentrations of salvia divinorum and salvinorin A in a person's urine, in a person's whole blood, or in a person's blood serum or plasma at or above which the person is impaired for purposes of operating any vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley within this state, the rule is in effect, and the person has a concentration of salvia divinorum or salvinorin A of at least that amount so specified by rule in the person's urine, in the person's whole blood, or in the person's blood serum or plasma. (2) No person who, within twenty years of the conduct described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section, previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this division, a violation of division (A)(1) of this section, or any other equivalent offense shall do both of the following: (a) Operate any vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley within this state while under the influence of alcohol, a drug of abuse, or a combination of them; (b) Subsequent to being arrested for operating the vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley as described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section, being asked by a law enforcement officer to submit to a chemical test or tests under section 4511.191 of the Revised Code, and being advised by the officer in accordance with section 4511.192 of the Revised Code of the consequences of the person's refusal or submission to the test or tests, refuse to submit to the test or tests. (B) No person under twenty-one years of age shall operate any vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley within this state, if, at the time of the operation, any of the following apply: (1) The person has a concentration of at least two-hundredths of one per cent but less than eight-hundredths of one per cent by weight per unit volume of alcohol in the person's whole blood. (2) The person has a concentration of at least three-hundredths of one per cent but less than ninety-six-thousandths of one per cent by weight per unit volume of alcohol in the person's blood serum or plasma. (3) The person has a concentration of at least two-hundredths of one gram but less than eight-hundredths of one gram by weight of alcohol per two hundred ten liters of the person's breath. (4) The person has a concentration of at least twenty-eight one-thousandths of one gram but less than eleven-hundredths of one gram by weight of alcohol per one hundred milliliters of the person's urine. (C) In any proceeding arising out of one incident, a person may be charged with a violation of division (A)(1)(a) or (A)(2) and a violation of division (B)(1), (2), or (3) of this section, but the person may not be convicted of more than one violation of these divisions. (D)(1)(a) In any criminal prosecution or juvenile court proceeding for a violation of division (A)(1)(a) of this section or for an equivalent offense that is vehicle-related, the result of any test of any blood, oral fluid, or urine withdrawn and analyzed at any health care provider, as defined in section 2317.02 of the Revised Code, may be admitted with expert testimony to be considered with any other relevant and competent evidence in determining the guilt or innocence of the defendant. (b) In any criminal prosecution or juvenile court proceeding for a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section or for an equivalent offense that is vehicle-related, the court may admit evidence on the presence and concentration of alcohol, drugs of abuse, controlled substances, metabolites of a controlled substance, or a combination of them in the defendant's whole blood, blood serum or plasma, breath, urine, oral fluid, or other bodily substance at the time of the alleged violation as shown by chemical analysis of the substance withdrawn within three hours of the time of the alleged violation. The three-hour time limit specified in this division regarding the admission of evidence does not extend or affect the two-hour time limit specified in division (A) of section 4511.192 of the Revised Code as the maximum period of time during which a person may consent to a chemical test or tests as described in that section. The court may admit evidence on the presence and concentration of alcohol, drugs of abuse, or a combination of them as described in this division when a person submits to a blood, breath, urine, oral fluid, or other bodily substance test at the request of a law enforcement officer under section 4511.191 of the Revised Code or a blood or urine sample is obtained pursuant to a search warrant. Only a physician, a registered nurse, an emergency medical technician-intermediate, an emergency medical technician-paramedic, or a qualified technician, chemist, or phlebotomist shall withdraw a blood sample for the purpose of determining the alcohol, drug, controlled substance, metabolite of a controlled substance, or combination content of the whole blood, blood serum, or blood plasma. This limitation does not apply to the taking of breath, oral fluid, or urine specimens. A person authorized to withdraw blood under this division may refuse to withdraw blood under this division, if in that person's opinion, the physical welfare of the person would be endangered by the withdrawing of blood. The bodily substance withdrawn under division (D)(1)(b) of this section shall be analyzed in accordance with methods approved by the director of health by an individual possessing a valid permit issued by the director pursuant to section 3701.143 of the Revised Code. (c) As used in division (D)(1)(b) of this section, "emergency medical technician-intermediate" and "emergency medical technician-paramedic" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (2) In a criminal prosecution or juvenile court proceeding for a violation of division (A) of this section or for an equivalent offense that is vehicle-related, if there was at the time the bodily substance was withdrawn a concentration of less than the applicable concentration of alcohol specified in divisions (A)(1)(b), (c), (d), and (e) of this section or less than the applicable concentration of a listed controlled substance or a listed metabolite of a controlled substance specified for a violation of division (A)(1)(j) of this section, that fact may be considered with other competent evidence in determining the guilt or innocence of the defendant. This division does not limit or affect a criminal prosecution or juvenile court proceeding for a violation of division (B) of this section or for an equivalent offense that is substantially equivalent to that division. (3) Upon the request of the person who was tested, the results of the chemical test shall be made available to the person or the person's attorney, immediately upon the completion of the chemical test analysis. If the chemical test was obtained pursuant to division (D)(1)(b) of this section, the person tested may have a physician, a registered nurse, or a qualified technician, chemist, or phlebotomist of the person's own choosing administer a chemical test or tests, at the person's expense, in addition to any administered at the request of a law enforcement officer. If the person was under arrest as described in division (A)(5) of section 4511.191 of the Revised Code, the arresting officer shall advise the person at the time of the arrest that the person may have an independent chemical test taken at the person's own expense. If the person was under arrest other than described in division (A)(5) of section 4511.191 of the Revised Code, the form to be read to the person to be tested, as required under section 4511.192 of the Revised Code, shall state that the person may have an independent test performed at the person's expense. The failure or inability to obtain an additional chemical test by a person shall not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the chemical test or tests taken at the request of a law enforcement officer. (4)(a) As used in divisions (D)(4)(b) and (c) of this section, "national highway traffic safety administration" means the national highway traffic safety administration established as an administration of the United States department of transportation under 96 Stat. 2415 (1983), 49 U.S.C.A. 105. (b) In any criminal prosecution or juvenile court proceeding for a violation of division (A) or (B) of this section, of a municipal ordinance relating to operating a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, a drug of abuse, or alcohol and a drug of abuse, or of a municipal ordinance relating to operating a vehicle with a prohibited concentration of alcohol, a controlled substance, or a metabolite of a controlled substance in the whole blood, blood serum or plasma, breath, oral fluid, or urine, if a law enforcement officer has administered a field sobriety test to the operator of the vehicle involved in the violation and if it is shown by clear and convincing evidence that the officer administered the test in substantial compliance with the testing standards for any reliable, credible, and generally accepted field sobriety tests that were in effect at the time the tests were administered, including, but not limited to, any testing standards then in effect that were set by the national highway traffic safety administration, all of the following apply: (i) The officer may testify concerning the results of the field sobriety test so administered. (ii) The prosecution may introduce the results of the field sobriety test so administered as evidence in any proceedings in the criminal prosecution or juvenile court proceeding. (iii) If testimony is presented or evidence is introduced under division (D)(4)(b)(i) or (ii) of this section and if the testimony or evidence is admissible under the Rules of Evidence, the court shall admit the testimony or evidence and the trier of fact shall give it whatever weight the trier of fact considers to be appropriate. (c) Division (D)(4)(b) of this section does not limit or preclude a court, in its determination of whether the arrest of a person was supported by probable cause or its determination of any other matter in a criminal prosecution or juvenile court proceeding of a type described in that division, from considering evidence or testimony that is not otherwise disallowed by division (D)(4)(b) of this section. (E)(1) Subject to division (E)(3) of this section, in any criminal prosecution or juvenile court proceeding for a violation of division (A)(1)(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), (g), (h), (i), or (j) or (B)(1), (2), (3), or (4) of this section or for an equivalent offense that is substantially equivalent to any of those divisions, a laboratory report from any laboratory personnel issued a permit by the department of health authorizing an analysis as described in this division that contains an analysis of the whole blood, blood serum or plasma, breath, urine, or other bodily substance tested and that contains all of the information specified in this division shall be admitted as prima-facie evidence of the information and statements that the report contains. The laboratory report shall contain all of the following: (a) The signature, under oath, of any person who performed the analysis; (b) Any findings as to the identity and quantity of alcohol, a drug of abuse, a controlled substance, a metabolite of a controlled substance, or a combination of them that was found; (c) A copy of a notarized statement by the laboratory director or a designee of the director that contains the name of each certified analyst or test performer involved with the report, the analyst's or test performer's employment relationship with the laboratory that issued the report, and a notation that performing an analysis of the type involved is part of the analyst's or test performer's regular duties; (d) An outline of the analyst's or test performer's education, training, and experience in performing the type of analysis involved and a certification that the laboratory satisfies appropriate quality control standards in general and, in this particular analysis, under rules of the department of health. (2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law regarding the admission of evidence, a report of the type described in division (E)(1) of this section is not admissible against the defendant to whom it pertains in any proceeding, other than a preliminary hearing or a grand jury proceeding, unless the prosecutor has served a copy of the report on the defendant's attorney or, if the defendant has no attorney, on the defendant. (3) A report of the type described in division (E)(1) of this section shall not be prima-facie evidence of the contents, identity, or amount of any substance if, within seven days after the defendant to whom the report pertains or the defendant's attorney receives a copy of the report, the defendant or the defendant's attorney demands the testimony of the person who signed the report. The judge in the case may extend the seven-day time limit in the interest of justice. (F) Except as otherwise provided in this division, any physician, registered nurse, emergency medical technician-intermediate, emergency medical technician-paramedic, or qualified technician, chemist, or phlebotomist who withdraws blood from a person pursuant to this section or section 4511.191 or 4511.192 of the Revised Code, and any hospital, first-aid station, or clinic at which blood is withdrawn from a person pursuant to this section or section 4511.191 or 4511.192 of the Revised Code, is immune from criminal liability and civil liability based upon a claim of assault and battery or any other claim that is not a claim of malpractice, for any act performed in withdrawing blood from the person. The immunity provided in this division also extends to an emergency medical service organization that employs an emergency medical technician-intermediate or emergency medical technician-paramedic who withdraws blood under this section. The immunity provided in this division is not available to a person who withdraws blood if the person engages in willful or wanton misconduct. As used in this division, "emergency medical technician-intermediate" and "emergency medical technician-paramedic" have the same meanings as in section 4765.01 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) Whoever violates any provision of divisions (A)(1)(a) to (i) or (A)(2) of this section is guilty of operating a vehicle under the influence of alcohol, a drug of abuse, or a combination of them. Whoever violates division (A)(1)(j) of this section is guilty of operating a vehicle while under the influence of a listed controlled substance or a listed metabolite of a controlled substance. The court shall sentence the offender for either offense under Chapter 2929. of the Revised Code, except as otherwise authorized or required by divisions (G)(1)(a) to (e) of this section: (a) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(1)(b), (c), (d), or (e) of this section, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree, and the court shall sentence the offender to all of the following: (i) If the sentence is being imposed for a violation of division (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (j) of this section, a mandatory jail term of three consecutive days. As used in this division, three consecutive days means seventy-two consecutive hours. The court may sentence an offender to both an intervention program and a jail term. The court may impose a jail term in addition to the three-day mandatory jail term or intervention program. However, in no case shall the cumulative jail term imposed for the offense exceed six months. The court may suspend the execution of the three-day jail term under this division if the court, in lieu of that suspended term, places the offender under a community control sanction pursuant to section 2929.25 of the Revised Code and requires the offender to attend, for three consecutive days, a drivers' intervention program certified under section 5119.38 of the Revised Code. The court also may suspend the execution of any part of the three-day jail term under this division if it places the offender under a community control sanction pursuant to section 2929.25 of the Revised Code for part of the three days, requires the offender to attend for the suspended part of the term a drivers' intervention program so certified, and sentences the offender to a jail term equal to the remainder of the three consecutive days that the offender does not spend attending the program. The court may require the offender, as a condition of community control and in addition to the required attendance at a drivers' intervention program, to attend and satisfactorily complete any treatment or education programs that comply with the minimum standards adopted pursuant to Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code by the director of mental health and addiction services that the operators of the drivers' intervention program determine that the offender should attend and to report periodically to the court on the offender's progress in the programs. The court also may impose on the offender any other conditions of community control that it considers necessary. If the court grants unlimited driving privileges to a first-time offender under section 4510.022 of the Revised Code, all penalties imposed upon the offender by the court under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of this section for the offense apply, except that the court shall suspend any mandatory or additional jail term imposed by the court under division (G)(1)(a)(i) of this section upon granting unlimited driving privileges in accordance with section 4510.022 of the Revised Code. (ii) If the sentence is being imposed for a violation of division (A)(1)(f), (g), (h), or (i) or division (A)(2) of this section, except as otherwise provided in this division, a mandatory jail term of at least three consecutive days and a requirement that the offender attend, for three consecutive days, a drivers' intervention program that is certified pursuant to section 5119.38 of the Revised Code. As used in this division, three consecutive days means seventy-two consecutive hours. If the court determines that the offender is not conducive to treatment in a drivers' intervention program, if the offender refuses to attend a drivers' intervention program, or if the jail at which the offender is to serve the jail term imposed can provide a driver's intervention program, the court shall sentence the offender to a mandatory jail term of at least six consecutive days. If the court grants unlimited driving privileges to a first-time offender under section 4510.022 of the Revised Code, all penalties imposed upon the offender by the court under division (G)(1)(a)(ii) of this section for the offense apply, except that the court shall suspend any mandatory or additional jail term imposed by the court under division (G)(1)(a)(ii) of this section upon granting unlimited driving privileges in accordance with section 4510.022 of the Revised Code. The court may require the offender, under a community control sanction imposed under section 2929.25 of the Revised Code, to attend and satisfactorily complete any treatment or education programs that comply with the minimum standards adopted pursuant to Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code by the director of mental health and addiction services, in addition to the required attendance at drivers' intervention program, that the operators of the drivers' intervention program determine that the offender should attend and to report periodically to the court on the offender's progress in the programs. The court also may impose any other conditions of community control on the offender that it considers necessary. (iii) In all cases, a fine of not less than five hundred sixty-five and not more than one thousand seventy-five dollars; (iv) In all cases, a suspension of the offender's driver's or commercial driver's license or permit or nonresident operating privilege for a definite period of one to three years. The court may grant limited driving privileges relative to the suspension under sections 4510.021 and 4510.13 of the Revised Code. The court may grant unlimited driving privileges with an ignition interlock device relative to the suspension and may reduce the period of suspension as authorized under section 4510.022 of the Revised Code. (b) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(1)(e) of this section, an offender who, within ten years of the offense, previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one violation of division (A) of this section or one other equivalent offense is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree. The court shall sentence the offender to all of the following: (i) If the sentence is being imposed for a violation of division (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (j) of this section, a mandatory jail term of ten consecutive days. The court shall impose the ten-day mandatory jail term under this division unless, subject to division (G)(3) of this section, it instead imposes a sentence under that division consisting of both a jail term and a term of house arrest with electronic monitoring, with continuous alcohol monitoring, or with both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring. The court may impose a jail term in addition to the ten-day mandatory jail term. The cumulative jail term imposed for the offense shall not exceed six months. In addition to the jail term or the term of house arrest with electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring or both types of monitoring and jail term, the court shall require the offender to be assessed by a community addiction services provider that is authorized by section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, subject to division (I) of this section, and shall order the offender to follow the treatment recommendations of the services provider. The purpose of the assessment is to determine the degree of the offender's alcohol usage and to determine whether or not treatment is warranted. Upon the request of the court, the services provider shall submit the results of the assessment to the court, including all treatment recommendations and clinical diagnoses related to alcohol use. (ii) If the sentence is being imposed for a violation of division (A)(1)(f), (g), (h), or (i) or division (A)(2) of this section, except as otherwise provided in this division, a mandatory jail term of twenty consecutive days. The court shall impose the twenty-day mandatory jail term under this division unless, subject to division (G)(3) of this section, it instead imposes a sentence under that division consisting of both a jail term and a term of house arrest with electronic monitoring, with continuous alcohol monitoring, or with both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring. The court may impose a jail term in addition to the twenty-day mandatory jail term. The cumulative jail term imposed for the offense shall not exceed six months. In addition to the jail term or the term of house arrest with electronic monitoring or continuous alcohol monitoring or both types of monitoring and jail term, the court shall require the offender to be assessed by a community addiction service provider that is authorized by section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, subject to division (I) of this section, and shall order the offender to follow the treatment recommendations of the services provider. The purpose of the assessment is to determine the degree of the offender's alcohol usage and to determine whether or not treatment is warranted. Upon the request of the court, the services provider shall submit the results of the assessment to the court, including all treatment recommendations and clinical diagnoses related to alcohol use. (iii) In all cases, notwithstanding the fines set forth in Chapter 2929. of the Revised Code, a fine of not less than seven hundred fifteen and not more than one thousand six hundred twenty-five dollars; (iv) In all cases, a suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege for a definite period of one to seven years. The court may grant limited driving privileges relative to the suspension under sections 4510.021 and 4510.13 of the Revised Code. (v) In all cases, if the vehicle is registered in the offender's name, immobilization of the vehicle involved in the offense for ninety days in accordance with section 4503.233 of the Revised Code and impoundment of the license plates of that vehicle for ninety days. (c) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(1)(e) of this section, an offender who, within ten years of the offense, previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to two violations of division (A) of this section or other equivalent offenses is guilty of a misdemeanor. The court shall sentence the offender to all of the following: (i) If the sentence is being imposed for a violation of division (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (j) of this section, a mandatory jail term of thirty consecutive days. The court shall impose the thirty-day mandatory jail term under this division unless, subject to division (G)(3) of this section, it instead imposes a sentence under that division consisting of both a jail term and a term of house arrest with electronic monitoring, with continuous alcohol monitoring, or with both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring. The court may impose a jail term in addition to the thirty-day mandatory jail term. Notwithstanding the jail terms set forth in sections 2929.21 to 2929.28 of the Revised Code, the additional jail term shall not exceed one year, and the cumulative jail term imposed for the offense shall not exceed one year. (ii) If the sentence is being imposed for a violation of division (A)(1)(f), (g), (h), or (i) or division (A)(2) of this section, a mandatory jail term of sixty consecutive days. The court shall impose the sixty-day mandatory jail term under this division unless, subject to division (G)(3) of this section, it instead imposes a sentence under that division consisting of both a jail term and a term of house arrest with electronic monitoring, with continuous alcohol monitoring, or with both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring. The court may impose a jail term in addition to the sixty-day mandatory jail term. Notwithstanding the jail terms set forth in sections 2929.21 to 2929.28 of the Revised Code, the additional jail term shall not exceed one year, and the cumulative jail term imposed for the offense shall not exceed one year. (iii) In all cases, notwithstanding the fines set forth in Chapter 2929. of the Revised Code, a fine of not less than one thousand forty and not more than two thousand seven hundred fifty dollars; (iv) In all cases, a suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege for a definite period of two to twelve years. The court may grant limited driving privileges relative to the suspension under sections 4510.021 and 4510.13 of the Revised Code. (v) In all cases, if the vehicle is registered in the offender's name, criminal forfeiture of the vehicle involved in the offense in accordance with section 4503.234 of the Revised Code. Division (G)(6) of this section applies regarding any vehicle that is subject to an order of criminal forfeiture under this division. (vi) In all cases, the court shall order the offender to participate with a community addiction services provider authorized by section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, subject to division (I) of this section, and shall order the offender to follow the treatment recommendations of the services provider. The operator of the services provider shall determine and assess the degree of the offender's alcohol dependency and shall make recommendations for treatment. Upon the request of the court, the services provider shall submit the results of the assessment to the court, including all treatment recommendations and clinical diagnoses related to alcohol use. (d) Except as otherwise provided in division (G)(1)(e) of this section, an offender who, within ten years of the offense, previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to three or four violations of division (A) of this section or other equivalent offenses, an offender who, within twenty years of the offense, previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to five or more violations of that nature, or an offender who previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1413 of the Revised Code, is guilty of a felony of the fourth degree. The court shall sentence the offender to all of the following: (i) If the sentence is being imposed for a violation of division (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (j) of this section, a mandatory prison term of one, two, three, four, or five years as required by and in accordance with division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code if the offender also is convicted of or also pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1413 of the Revised Code or, in the discretion of the court, either a mandatory term of local incarceration of sixty consecutive days in accordance with division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code or a mandatory prison term of sixty consecutive days in accordance with division (G)(2) of that section if the offender is not convicted of and does not plead guilty to a specification of that type. If the court imposes a mandatory term of local incarceration, it may impose a jail term in addition to the sixty-day mandatory term, the cumulative total of the mandatory term and the jail term for the offense shall not exceed one year, and, except as provided in division (A)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, no prison term is authorized for the offense. If the court imposes a mandatory prison term, notwithstanding division (A)(4) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, it also may sentence the offender to a definite prison term that shall be not less than six months and not more than thirty months and the prison terms shall be imposed as described in division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code. If the court imposes a mandatory prison term or mandatory prison term and additional prison term, in addition to the term or terms so imposed, the court also may sentence the offender to a community control sanction for the offense, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. (ii) If the sentence is being imposed for a violation of division (A)(1)(f), (g), (h), or (i) or division (A)(2) of this section, a mandatory prison term of one, two, three, four, or five years as required by and in accordance with division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code if the offender also is convicted of or also pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1413 of the Revised Code or, in the discretion of the court, either a mandatory term of local incarceration of one hundred twenty consecutive days in accordance with division (G)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code or a mandatory prison term of one hundred twenty consecutive days in accordance with division (G)(2) of that section if the offender is not convicted of and does not plead guilty to a specification of that type. If the court imposes a mandatory term of local incarceration, it may impose a jail term in addition to the one hundred twenty-day mandatory term, the cumulative total of the mandatory term and the jail term for the offense shall not exceed one year, and, except as provided in division (A)(1) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code, no prison term is authorized for the offense. If the court imposes a mandatory prison term, notwithstanding division (A)(4) of section 2929.14 of the Revised Code, it also may sentence the offender to a definite prison term that shall be not less than six months and not more than thirty months and the prison terms shall be imposed as described in division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code. If the court imposes a mandatory prison term or mandatory prison term and additional prison term, in addition to the term or terms so imposed, the court also may sentence the offender to a community control sanction for the offense, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. (iii) In all cases, notwithstanding section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred forty nor more than ten thousand five hundred dollars; (iv) In all cases, a class two license suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(2) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. The court may grant limited driving privileges relative to the suspension under sections 4510.021 and 4510.13 of the Revised Code. (v) In all cases, if the vehicle is registered in the offender's name, criminal forfeiture of the vehicle involved in the offense in accordance with section 4503.234 of the Revised Code. Division (G)(6) of this section applies regarding any vehicle that is subject to an order of criminal forfeiture under this division. (vi) In all cases, the court shall order the offender to participate with a community addiction services provider authorized by section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, subject to division (I) of this section, and shall order the offender to follow the treatment recommendations of the services provider. The operator of the services provider shall determine and assess the degree of the offender's alcohol dependency and shall make recommendations for treatment. Upon the request of the court, the services provider shall submit the results of the assessment to the court, including all treatment recommendations and clinical diagnoses related to alcohol use. (vii) In all cases, if the court sentences the offender to a mandatory term of local incarceration, in addition to the mandatory term, the court, pursuant to section 2929.17 of the Revised Code, may impose a term of house arrest with electronic monitoring. The term shall not commence until after the offender has served the mandatory term of local incarceration. (e) An offender who previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of division (A) of this section that was a felony, regardless of when the violation and the conviction or guilty plea occurred, is guilty of a felony of the third degree. The court shall sentence the offender to all of the following: (i) If the offender is being sentenced for a violation of division (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (j) of this section, a mandatory prison term of one, two, three, four, or five years as required by and in accordance with division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code if the offender also is convicted of or also pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1413 of the Revised Code or a mandatory prison term of sixty consecutive days in accordance with division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code if the offender is not convicted of and does not plead guilty to a specification of that type. The court may impose a prison term in addition to the mandatory prison term. The cumulative total of a sixty-day mandatory prison term and the additional prison term for the offense shall not exceed five years. In addition to the mandatory prison term or mandatory prison term and additional prison term the court imposes, the court also may sentence the offender to a community control sanction for the offense, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. (ii) If the sentence is being imposed for a violation of division (A)(1)(f), (g), (h), or (i) or division (A)(2) of this section, a mandatory prison term of one, two, three, four, or five years as required by and in accordance with division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code if the offender also is convicted of or also pleads guilty to a specification of the type described in section 2941.1413 of the Revised Code or a mandatory prison term of one hundred twenty consecutive days in accordance with division (G)(2) of section 2929.13 of the Revised Code if the offender is not convicted of and does not plead guilty to a specification of that type. The court may impose a prison term in addition to the mandatory prison term. The cumulative total of a one hundred twenty-day mandatory prison term and the additional prison term for the offense shall not exceed five years. In addition to the mandatory prison term or mandatory prison term and additional prison term the court imposes, the court also may sentence the offender to a community control sanction for the offense, but the offender shall serve all of the prison terms so imposed prior to serving the community control sanction. (iii) In all cases, notwithstanding section 2929.18 of the Revised Code, a fine of not less than one thousand five hundred forty nor more than ten thousand five hundred dollars; (iv) In all cases, a class two license suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(2) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. The court may grant limited driving privileges relative to the suspension under sections 4510.021 and 4510.13 of the Revised Code. (v) In all cases, if the vehicle is registered in the offender's name, criminal forfeiture of the vehicle involved in the offense in accordance with section 4503.234 of the Revised Code. Division (G)(6) of this section applies regarding any vehicle that is subject to an order of criminal forfeiture under this division. (vi) In all cases, the court shall order the offender to participate with a community addiction services provider authorized by section 5119.21 of the Revised Code, subject to division (I) of this section, and shall order the offender to follow the treatment recommendations of the services provider. The operator of the services provider shall determine and assess the degree of the offender's alcohol dependency and shall make recommendations for treatment. Upon the request of the court, the services provider shall submit the results of the assessment to the court, including all treatment recommendations and clinical diagnoses related to alcohol use. (2) An offender who is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A) of this section and who subsequently seeks reinstatement of the driver's or occupational driver's license or permit or nonresident operating privilege suspended under this section as a result of the conviction or guilty plea shall pay a reinstatement fee as provided in division (F)(2) of section 4511.191 of the Revised Code. (3) If an offender is sentenced to a jail term under division (G)(1)(b)(i) or (ii) or (G)(1)(c)(i) or (ii) of this section and if, within sixty days of sentencing of the offender, the court issues a written finding on the record that, due to the unavailability of space at the jail where the offender is required to serve the term, the offender will not be able to begin serving that term within the sixty-day period following the date of sentencing, the court may impose an alternative sentence under this division that includes a term of house arrest with electronic monitoring, with continuous alcohol monitoring, or with both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring. As an alternative to a mandatory jail term of ten consecutive days required by division (G)(1)(b)(i) of this section, the court, under this division, may sentence the offender to five consecutive days in jail and not less than eighteen consecutive days of house arrest with electronic monitoring, with continuous alcohol monitoring, or with both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring. The cumulative total of the five consecutive days in jail and the period of house arrest with electronic monitoring, continuous alcohol monitoring, or both types of monitoring shall not exceed six months. The five consecutive days in jail do not have to be served prior to or consecutively to the period of house arrest. As an alternative to the mandatory jail term of twenty consecutive days required by division (G)(1)(b)(ii) of this section, the court, under this division, may sentence the offender to ten consecutive days in jail and not less than thirty-six consecutive days of house arrest with electronic monitoring, with continuous alcohol monitoring, or with both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring. The cumulative total of the ten consecutive days in jail and the period of house arrest with electronic monitoring, continuous alcohol monitoring, or both types of monitoring shall not exceed six months. The ten consecutive days in jail do not have to be served prior to or consecutively to the period of house arrest. As an alternative to a mandatory jail term of thirty consecutive days required by division (G)(1)(c)(i) of this section, the court, under this division, may sentence the offender to fifteen consecutive days in jail and not less than fifty-five consecutive days of house arrest with electronic monitoring, with continuous alcohol monitoring, or with both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring. The cumulative total of the fifteen consecutive days in jail and the period of house arrest with electronic monitoring, continuous alcohol monitoring, or both types of monitoring shall not exceed one year. The fifteen consecutive days in jail do not have to be served prior to or consecutively to the period of house arrest. As an alternative to the mandatory jail term of sixty consecutive days required by division (G)(1)(c)(ii) of this section, the court, under this division, may sentence the offender to thirty consecutive days in jail and not less than one hundred ten consecutive days of house arrest with electronic monitoring, with continuous alcohol monitoring, or with both electronic monitoring and continuous alcohol monitoring. The cumulative total of the thirty consecutive days in jail and the period of house arrest with electronic monitoring, continuous alcohol monitoring, or both types of monitoring shall not exceed one year. The thirty consecutive days in jail do not have to be served prior to or consecutively to the period of house arrest. (4) If an offender's driver's or occupational driver's license or permit or nonresident operating privilege is suspended under division (G) of this section and if section 4510.13 of the Revised Code permits the court to grant limited driving privileges, the court may grant the limited driving privileges in accordance with that section. If division (A)(7) of that section requires that the court impose as a condition of the privileges that the offender must display on the vehicle that is driven subject to the privileges restricted license plates that are issued under section 4503.231 of the Revised Code, except as provided in division (B) of that section, the court shall impose that condition as one of the conditions of the limited driving privileges granted to the offender, except as provided in division (B) of section 4503.231 of the Revised Code. (5) Fines imposed under this section for a violation of division (A) of this section shall be distributed as follows: (a) Twenty-five dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(a)(iii), thirty-five dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(b)(iii), one hundred twenty-three dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(c)(iii), and two hundred ten dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(d)(iii) or (e)(iii) of this section shall be paid to an enforcement and education fund established by the legislative authority of the law enforcement agency in this state that primarily was responsible for the arrest of the offender, as determined by the court that imposes the fine. The agency shall use this share to pay only those costs it incurs in enforcing this section or a municipal OVI ordinance and in informing the public of the laws governing the operation of a vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, the dangers of the operation of a vehicle under the influence of alcohol, and other information relating to the operation of a vehicle under the influence of alcohol and the consumption of alcoholic beverages. (b) Fifty dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(a)(iii) of this section shall be paid to the political subdivision that pays the cost of housing the offender during the offender's term of incarceration. If the offender is being sentenced for a violation of division (A)(1)(a), (b), (c), (d), (e), or (j) of this section and was confined as a result of the offense prior to being sentenced for the offense but is not sentenced to a term of incarceration, the fifty dollars shall be paid to the political subdivision that paid the cost of housing the offender during that period of confinement. The political subdivision shall use the share under this division to pay or reimburse incarceration or treatment costs it incurs in housing or providing drug and alcohol treatment to persons who violate this section or a municipal OVI ordinance, costs of any immobilizing or disabling device used on the offender's vehicle, and costs of electronic house arrest equipment needed for persons who violate this section. (c) Twenty-five dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(a)(iii) and fifty dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(b)(iii) of this section shall be deposited into the county or municipal indigent drivers' alcohol treatment fund under the control of that court, as created by the county or municipal corporation under division (H) of section 4511.191 of the Revised Code. (d) One hundred fifteen dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(b)(iii), two hundred seventy-seven dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(c)(iii), and four hundred forty dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(d)(iii) or (e)(iii) of this section shall be paid to the political subdivision that pays the cost of housing the offender during the offender's term of incarceration. The political subdivision shall use this share to pay or reimburse incarceration or treatment costs it incurs in housing or providing drug and alcohol treatment to persons who violate this section or a municipal OVI ordinance, costs for any immobilizing or disabling device used on the offender's vehicle, and costs of electronic house arrest equipment needed for persons who violate this section. (e) One hundred twenty-five dollars of the fine imposed under divisions (G)(1)(a)(iii), (G)(1)(b)(iii), (G)(1)(c)(iii), (G)(1)(d)(iii), and (G)(1)(e)(iii) of this section shall be deposited into the special projects fund of the court in which the offender was convicted and that is established under division (E)(1) of section 2303.201, division (B)(1) of section 1901.26, or division (B)(1) of section 1907.24 of the Revised Code, to be used exclusively to cover the cost of immobilizing or disabling devices, including certified ignition interlock devices, and remote alcohol monitoring devices for indigent offenders who are required by a judge to use either of these devices. If the court in which the offender was convicted does not have a special projects fund that is established under division (E)(1) of section 2303.201, division (B)(1) of section 1901.26, or division (B)(1) of section 1907.24 of the Revised Code, the one hundred twenty-five dollars shall be deposited transmitted to the treasurer of state for deposit into the indigent drivers interlock and alcohol monitoring fund under division (I) of section 4511.191 of the Revised Code. (f) Seventy-five dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(a)(iii), one hundred twenty-five dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(b)(iii), two hundred fifty dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(c)(iii), and five hundred dollars of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(d)(iii) or (e)(iii) of this section shall be transmitted to the treasurer of state for deposit into the indigent defense support fund established under section 120.08 of the Revised Code. (g) One hundred fifteen dollars shall be credited transmitted to the treasurer of state for deposit into the statewide treatment and prevention fund created by section 4301.30 of the Revised Code. Money credited to the fund under this section shall be used for purposes identified under section 5119.22 of the Revised Code. (h) The balance of the fine imposed under division (G)(1)(a)(iii), (b)(iii), (c)(iii), (d)(iii), or (e)(iii) of this section shall be disbursed as otherwise provided by law. (6) If title to a motor vehicle that is subject to an order of criminal forfeiture under division (G)(1)(c), (d), or (e) of this section is assigned or transferred and division (B)(2) or (3) of section 4503.234 of the Revised Code applies, in addition to or independent of any other penalty established by law, the court may fine the offender the value of the vehicle as determined by publications of the national automobile dealers association. The proceeds of any fine so imposed shall be distributed in accordance with division (C)(2) of that section. (7) In all cases in which an offender is sentenced under division (G) of this section, the offender shall provide the court with proof of financial responsibility as defined in section 4509.01 of the Revised Code. If the offender fails to provide that proof of financial responsibility, the court, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, may order restitution pursuant to section 2929.18 or 2929.28 of the Revised Code in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars for any economic loss arising from an accident or collision that was the direct and proximate result of the offender's operation of the vehicle before, during, or after committing the offense for which the offender is sentenced under division (G) of this section. (8) A court may order an offender to reimburse a law enforcement agency for any costs incurred by the agency with respect to a chemical test or tests administered to the offender if all of the following apply: (a) The offender is convicted of or pleads guilty to a violation of division (A) of this section. (b) The test or tests were of the offender's whole blood, blood serum or plasma, oral fluid, or urine. (c) The test or tests indicated that the offender had one of the following at the time of the offense: (i) A prohibited concentration of a controlled substance or a metabolite of a controlled substance in the offender's whole blood, blood serum or plasma, or urine; (ii) A drug of abuse or a metabolite of a drug of abuse in the offender's oral fluid. (9) A court may warn any person who is convicted of or who pleads guilty to a violation of division (A) of this section or an equivalent offense that a subsequent violation of this section or an equivalent offense that results in the death of another or the unlawful termination of another's pregnancy may result in the person being guilty of aggravated vehicular homicide under section 2903.06 of the Revised Code. The court may warn the person of the applicable penalties for that violation under sections 2903.06 and 2929.142 of the Revised Code. (10) As used in division (G) of this section, "electronic monitoring," "mandatory prison term," and "mandatory term of local incarceration" have the same meanings as in section 2929.01 of the Revised Code. (H) Whoever violates division (B) of this section is guilty of operating a vehicle after underage alcohol consumption and shall be punished as follows: (1) Except as otherwise provided in division (H)(2) of this section, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor of the fourth degree. In addition to any other sanction imposed for the offense, the court shall impose a class six suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(6) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. The court may grant limited driving privileges relative to the suspension under sections 4510.021 and 4510.13 of the Revised Code. The court may grant unlimited driving privileges with an ignition interlock device relative to the suspension and may reduce the period of suspension as authorized under section 4510.022 of the Revised Code. If the court grants unlimited driving privileges under section 4510.022 of the Revised Code, the court shall suspend any jail term imposed under division (H)(1) of this section as required under that section. (2) If, within one year of the offense, the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to one or more violations of division (A) of this section or other equivalent offenses, the offender is guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree. In addition to any other sanction imposed for the offense, the court shall impose a class four suspension of the offender's driver's license, commercial driver's license, temporary instruction permit, probationary license, or nonresident operating privilege from the range specified in division (A)(4) of section 4510.02 of the Revised Code. The court may grant limited driving privileges relative to the suspension under sections 4510.021 and 4510.13 of the Revised Code. (3) The offender shall provide the court with proof of financial responsibility as defined in section 4509.01 of the Revised Code. If the offender fails to provide that proof of financial responsibility, then, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, the court may order restitution pursuant to section 2929.28 of the Revised Code in an amount not exceeding five thousand dollars for any economic loss arising from an accident or collision that was the direct and proximate result of the offender's operation of the vehicle before, during, or after committing the violation of division (B) of this section. (I)(1) No court shall sentence an offender to an alcohol treatment program under this section unless the treatment program complies with the minimum standards for alcohol treatment programs adopted under Chapter 5119. of the Revised Code by the director of mental health and addiction services. (2) An offender who stays in a drivers' intervention program or in an alcohol treatment program under an order issued under this section shall pay the cost of the stay in the program. However, if the court determines that an offender who stays in an alcohol treatment program under an order issued under this section is unable to pay the cost of the stay in the program, the court may order that the cost be paid from the court's indigent drivers' alcohol treatment fund. (J) If a person whose driver's or commercial driver's license or permit or nonresident operating privilege is suspended under this section files an appeal regarding any aspect of the person's trial or sentence, the appeal itself does not stay the operation of the suspension. (K) Division (A)(1)(j) of this section does not apply to a person who operates a vehicle, streetcar, or trackless trolley while the person has a concentration of a listed controlled substance or a listed metabolite of a controlled substance in the person's whole blood, blood serum or plasma, or urine that equals or exceeds the amount specified in that division, if both of the following apply: (1) The person obtained the controlled substance pursuant to a prescription issued by a licensed health professional authorized to prescribe drugs. (2) The person injected, ingested, or inhaled the controlled substance in accordance with the health professional's directions. (L) The prohibited concentrations of a controlled substance or a metabolite of a controlled substance listed in division (A)(1)(j) of this section also apply in a prosecution of a violation of division (D) of section 2923.16 of the Revised Code in the same manner as if the offender is being prosecuted for a prohibited concentration of alcohol. (M) All terms defined in section 4510.01 of the Revised Code apply to this section. If the meaning of a term defined in section 4510.01 of the Revised Code conflicts with the meaning of the same term as defined in section 4501.01 or 4511.01 of the Revised Code, the term as defined in section 4510.01 of the Revised Code applies to this section. (N)(1) The Ohio Traffic Rules in effect on January 1, 2004, as adopted by the supreme court under authority of section 2937.46 of the Revised Code, do not apply to felony violations of this section. Subject to division (N)(2) of this section, the Rules of Criminal Procedure apply to felony violations of this section. (2) If, on or after January 1, 2004, the supreme court modifies the Ohio Traffic Rules to provide procedures to govern felony violations of this section, the modified rules shall apply to felony violations of this section. Sec. 4705.09. (A)(1) Any person admitted to the practice of law in this state by order of the supreme court in accordance with its prescribed and published rules, or any law firm or legal professional association, may establish and maintain an interest-bearing trust account, for purposes of depositing client funds held by the attorney, firm, or association that are nominal in amount or are to be held by the attorney, firm, or association for a short period of time, with any bank, savings bank, or savings and loan association that is authorized to do business in this state and is insured by the federal deposit insurance corporation or the successor to that corporation, or any credit union insured by the national credit union administration operating under the "Federal Credit Union Act," 84 Stat. 994 (1970), 12 U.S.C. 1751, or insured by a credit union share guaranty corporation established under Chapter 1761. of the Revised Code. Each account established under this division shall be in the name of the attorney, firm, or association that established and is maintaining it and shall be identified as an IOLTA or an interest on lawyer's trust account. The name of the account may contain additional identifying features to distinguish it from other trust accounts established and maintained by the attorney, firm, or association. (2) Each attorney who receives funds belonging to a client shall do one of the following: (a) Establish and maintain one or more interest-bearing trust accounts in accordance with division (A)(1) of this section or maintain one or more interest-bearing trust accounts previously established in accordance with that division, and deposit all client funds held that are nominal in amount or are to be held by the attorney for a short period of time in the account or accounts; (b) If the attorney is affiliated with a law firm or legal professional association, comply with division (A)(2)(a) of this section or deposit all client funds held that are nominal in amount or are to be held by the attorney for a short period of time in one or more interest-bearing trust accounts established and maintained by the firm or association in accordance with division (A)(1) of this section. (3) No funds belonging to any attorney, firm, or legal professional association shall be deposited in any interest-bearing trust account established under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, except that funds sufficient to pay or enable a waiver of depository institution service charges on the account shall be deposited in the account and other funds belonging to the attorney, firm, or association may be deposited as authorized by the Code of Professional Responsibility adopted by the supreme court. The determinations of whether funds held are nominal or more than nominal in amount and of whether funds are to be held for a short period or longer than a short period of time rests in the sound judgment of the particular attorney. No imputation of professional misconduct shall arise from the attorney's exercise of judgment in these matters. (B) All interest earned on funds deposited in an interest-bearing trust account established under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section shall be transmitted to the treasurer of state public defender for deposit in the legal aid fund established under section 120.52 of the Revised Code. No part of the interest earned on funds deposited in an interest-bearing trust account established under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section shall be paid to, or inure to the benefit of, the attorney, the attorney's law firm or legal professional association, the client or other person who owns or has a beneficial ownership of the funds deposited, or any other person other than in accordance with this section, section 4705.10, and sections 120.51 to 120.55 of the Revised Code. (C) No liability arising out of any act or omission by any attorney, law firm, or legal professional association with respect to any interest-bearing trust account established under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section shall be imputed to the depository institution. (D) The supreme court may adopt and enforce rules of professional conduct that pertain to the use, by attorneys, law firms, or legal professional associations, of interest-bearing trust accounts established under division (A)(1) or (2) of this section, and that pertain to the enforcement of division (A)(2) of this section. Any rules adopted by the supreme court under this authority shall conform to the provisions of this section, section 4705.10, and sections 120.51 to 120.55 of the Revised Code. Sec. 4705.10. (A) All of the following apply to an interest-bearing trust account established under authority of section 4705.09 of the Revised Code: (1) All funds in the account shall be subject to withdrawal upon request and without delay, or as soon as is permitted by federal law; (2) The rate of interest payable on the account shall not be less than the rate paid by the depository institution to regular, nonattorney depositors. Higher rates offered by the institution to customers whose deposits exceed certain time or quantity qualifications, such as those offered in the form of certificates of deposit, may be obtained by a person or law firm establishing the account if there is no impairment of the right to withdraw or transfer principal immediately. (3) The depository institution shall be directed, by the person or law firm establishing the account, to do all of the following: (a) Remit interest or dividends, whichever is applicable, on the average monthly balance in the account or as otherwise computed in accordance with the institution's standard accounting practice, less reasonable service charges, to the treasurer of state public defender at least quarterly for deposit in the legal aid fund established under section 120.52 of the Revised Code; (b) Transmit to the treasurer of state public defender, upon its request, to the Ohio access to justice foundation, and the depositing attorney, law firm, or legal professional association upon the attorney's, firm's, or association's request, at the time of each remittance required by division (A)(3)(a) of this section, a statement showing the name of the attorney for whom or the law firm or legal professional association for which the remittance is sent, the rate of interest applied, the accounting period, the net amount remitted to the treasurer of state public defender for each account, the total remitted, the average account balance for each month of the period for which the report is made, and the amount deducted for service charges; (4) The depository institution shall notify the office of disciplinary counsel or other entity designated by the supreme court on each occasion when a properly payable instrument is presented for payment from the account, and the account contains insufficient funds. The depository institution shall provide this notice without regard to whether the instrument is honored by the depository institution. The depository institution shall provide the notice described in division (A)(4) of this section by electronic or other means within five banking days of the date that the instrument was honored or returned as dishonored. The notice shall contain all of the following: (a) The name and address of the depository institution; (b) The name and address of the lawyer, law firm, or legal professional association that maintains the account; (c) The account number and either the amount of the overdraft and the date issued or the amount of the dishonored instrument and the date returned. (B)(1) The statements and reports of individual depositor information made under divisions (A)(3) and (4) of this section are confidential and shall be used only for purposes of administering the legal aid fund and for enforcement of the rules of professional conduct adopted by the supreme court. (2) A depository institution may charge the lawyer, law firm, or legal professional association that maintains the account with fees associated with producing and mailing a notice required by division (A)(4) of this section but shall not deduct such fees from the interest earned on the account. Sec. 5528.54. (A) The commissioners of the sinking fund are authorized to issue and sell, as provided in this section and in amounts from time to time authorized by the general assembly, general obligations of this state for the purpose of financing or assisting in the financing of the costs of projects. The full faith and credit, revenues, and taxing power of the state are and shall be pledged to the timely payment of bond service charges on outstanding obligations, all in accordance with Section 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution, and sections 5528.51 to 5528.53 of the Revised Code, and so long as such obligations are outstanding there shall be levied and collected excises, taxes, and other revenues in amounts sufficient to pay the bond service charges on such obligations and costs relating to credit enhancement facilities. (B) Not more than two hundred twenty million dollars principal amount of obligations, plus the principal amount of obligations that in any prior fiscal years could have been, but were not issued within that two-hundred-twenty-million-dollar fiscal year limit, may be issued in any fiscal year, and not more than one billion two hundred million dollars principal amount of obligations may be outstanding at any one time, all determined as provided in sections 5528.51 to 5528.53 of the Revised Code. (C) The state may participate in financing projects by grants, loans, or contributions to local government entities. (D) Each issue of obligations shall be authorized by resolution of the commissioners. The bond proceedings shall provide for the principal amount or maximum principal amount of obligations of an issue, and shall provide for or authorize the manner for determining the principal maturity or maturities, not exceeding the earlier of thirty years from the date of issuance of the particular obligations or thirty years from the date the debt represented by the particular obligations was originally contracted, the interest rate or rates, the date of and the dates of payment of interest on the obligations, their denominations, and the establishment within or outside the state of a place or places of payment of bond service charges. Sections 9.96, 9.98, 9.981, 9.982, and 9.983 of the Revised Code are applicable to the obligations. The purpose of the obligations may be stated in the bond proceedings as "financing or assisting in the financing of highway capital improvement projects as provided in Section 2m of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution." (E) The proceeds of the obligations, except for any portion to be deposited into special funds, or into escrow funds for the purpose of refunding outstanding obligations, all as may be provided in the bond proceedings, shall be deposited into the highway capital improvement fund established by section 5528.53 of the Revised Code. (F) The commissioners may appoint or provide for the appointment of paying agents, bond registrars, securities depositories, and transfer agents, and may retain the services of financial advisers and accounting experts, and retain or contract for the services of marketing, remarketing, indexing, and administrative agents, other consultants, and independent contractors, including printing services, as are necessary in the judgment of the commissioners to carry out sections 5528.51 to 5528.53 of the Revised Code. Financing costs are payable, as provided in the bond proceedings, from the proceeds of the obligations, from special funds, or from other moneys available for the purpose. (G) The bond proceedings, including any trust agreement, may contain additional provisions customary or appropriate to the financing or to the obligations or to particular obligations including, but not limited to: (1) The redemption of obligations prior to maturity at the option of the state or of the holder or upon the occurrence of certain conditions at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as are provided in the bond proceedings; (2) The form of and other terms of the obligations; (3) The establishment, deposit, investment, and application of special funds, and the safeguarding of moneys on hand or on deposit, in lieu of otherwise applicable provisions of Chapter 131. or 135. of the Revised Code, but subject to any special provisions of this section with respect to particular funds or moneys, and provided that any bank or trust company that acts as a depository of any moneys in special funds may furnish such indemnifying bonds or may pledge such securities as required by the commissioners; (4) Any or every provision of the bond proceedings binding upon the commissioners and such state agency or local government entities, officer, board, commission, authority, agency, department, or other person or body as may from time to time have the authority under law to take such actions as may be necessary to perform all or any part of the duty required by such provision; (5) The maintenance of each pledge, any trust agreement, or other instrument composing part of the bond proceedings until the state has fully paid or provided for the payment of the bond service charges on the obligations or met other stated conditions; (6) In the event of default in any payments required to be made by the bond proceedings, or any other agreement of the commissioners made as part of a contract under which the obligations were issued or secured, the enforcement of such payments or agreements by mandamus, suit in equity, action at law, or any combination of the foregoing; (7) The rights and remedies of the holders of obligations and of the trustee under any trust agreement, and provisions for protecting and enforcing them, including limitations on rights of individual holders of obligations; (8) The replacement of any obligations that become mutilated or are destroyed, lost, or stolen; (9) Provision for the funding, refunding, or advance refunding or other provision for payment of obligations that will then no longer be outstanding for purposes of sections 5528.51 to 5528.56 of the Revised Code or of the bond proceedings; (10) Any provision that may be made in bond proceedings or a trust agreement, including provision for amendment of the bond proceedings; (11) Any other or additional agreements with the holders of the obligations relating to any of the foregoing; (12) Such other provisions as the commissioners determine, including limitations, conditions, or qualifications relating to any of the foregoing. (H) The great seal of the state or a facsimile of that seal may be affixed to or printed on the obligations. The obligations requiring signatures by the commissioners shall be signed by or bear the facsimile signatures of two or more of the commissioners as provided in the bond proceedings. Any obligations may be signed by the person who, on the date of execution, is the authorized signer although on the date of such obligations such person was not a commissioner. In case the individual whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature appears on any obligation ceases to be a commissioner before delivery of the obligation, such signature or facsimile is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes as if that individual had remained the member until such delivery, and in case the seal to be affixed to or printed on obligations has been changed after the seal has been affixed to or a facsimile of the seal has been printed on the obligations, that seal or facsimile seal shall continue to be sufficient as to those obligations and obligations issued in substitution or exchange therefor. (I) The obligations are negotiable instruments and securities under Chapter 1308. of the Revised Code, subject to the provisions of the bond proceedings as to registration. Obligations may be issued in coupon or in fully registered form, or both, as the commissioners determine. Provision may be made for the registration of any obligations with coupons attached as to principal alone or as to both principal and interest, their exchange for obligations so registered, and for the conversion or reconversion into obligations with coupons attached of any obligations registered as to both principal and interest, and for reasonable charges for such registration, exchange, conversion, and reconversion. Pending preparation of definitive obligations, the commissioners may issue interim receipts or certificates which shall be exchanged for such definitive obligations. (J) Obligations may be sold at public sale or at private sale, and at such price at, above, or below par, as determined by the commissioners in the bond proceedings. (K) In the discretion of the commissioners, obligations may be secured additionally by a trust agreement between the state and a corporate trustee which may be any trust company or bank having a place of business within the state. Any trust agreement may contain the resolution authorizing the issuance of the obligations, any provisions that may be contained in the bond proceedings, and other provisions that are customary or appropriate in an agreement of the type. (L) Except to the extent that their rights are restricted by the bond proceedings, any holder of obligations, or a trustee under the bond proceedings may by any suitable form of legal proceedings protect and enforce any rights under the laws of this state or granted by the bond proceedings. Such rights include the right to compel the performance of all duties of the commissioners and the state. Each duty of the commissioners and its employees, and of each state agency and local government entity and its officers, members, or employees, undertaken pursuant to the bond proceedings, is hereby established as a duty of the commissioners, and of each such agency, local government entity, officer, member, or employee having authority to perform such duty, specifically enjoined by the law and resulting from an office, trust, or station within the meaning of section 2731.01 of the Revised Code. The persons who are at the time the commissioners of the sinking fund, or its employees, are not liable in their personal capacities on any obligations or any agreements of or with the commissioners relating to obligations or under the bond proceedings. (M) Obligations are lawful investments for banks, societies for savings, savings and loan associations, deposit guarantee associations, trust companies, trustees, fiduciaries, insurance companies, including domestic for life and domestic not for life, trustees or other officers having charge of sinking and bond retirement or other special funds of political subdivisions and taxing districts of this state, the commissioners of the sinking fund, the administrator of workers' compensation, subject to the approval of the workers' compensation board and the industrial commission, the state teachers retirement system, the public employees retirement system, the school employees retirement system, and the Ohio police and fire pension fund, notwithstanding any other provisions of the Revised Code or rules adopted pursuant thereto by any state agency with respect to investments by them, and are also acceptable as security for the deposit of public moneys. (N) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in the special funds established by or pursuant to this section may be invested by or on behalf of the commissioners only in notes, bonds, or other direct obligations of the United States or of any agency or instrumentality thereof, in obligations of this state or any political subdivision of this state, in certificates of deposit of any national bank located in this state and any bank, as defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code, subject to inspection by the superintendent of financial institutions, in the Ohio subdivision's fund established pursuant to section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code, in no-front-end-load money market mutual funds consisting exclusively of direct obligations of the United States or of an agency or instrumentality thereof, and in repurchase agreements, including those issued by any fiduciary, secured by direct obligations of the United States or an agency or instrumentality thereof, and in common trust funds established in accordance with section 1109.20 of the Revised Code and consisting exclusively of direct obligations of the United States or of an agency or instrumentality thereof, notwithstanding division (A)(4) of that section. The income from investments shall be credited to such special funds or otherwise as the commissioners determine in the bond proceedings, and the investments may be sold or exchanged at such times as the commissioners determine or authorize. (O) Unless otherwise provided in any applicable bond proceedings, moneys to the credit of or in a special fund shall be disbursed on the order of the commissioners, provided that no such order is required for the payment from the bond service fund or other special fund when due of bond service charges or required payments under credit enhancement facilities. (P) The commissioners may covenant in the bond proceedings, and any such covenants shall be controlling notwithstanding any other provision of law, that the state and the applicable officers and agencies of the state, including the general assembly, shall, so long as any obligations are outstanding in accordance with their terms, maintain statutory authority for and cause to be charged and collected taxes, excises, and other receipts of the state so that the receipts to the bond service fund shall be sufficient in amounts to meet bond service charges and for the establishment and maintenance of any reserves and other requirements, including payment of financing costs, provided for in the bond proceedings. (Q) The obligations, and the transfer of, and the interest, interest equivalent, and other income and accreted amounts from, including any profit made on the sale, exchange, or other disposition of, the obligations shall at all times be free from taxation, direct or indirect, within the state. (R) This section applies only with respect to obligations issued and delivered prior to September 30, 2000. Sec. 5725.22. (A) The treasurer of state shall maintain a list of taxes levied by section 5725.18 of the Revised Code and certified for assessment by the superintendent of insurance pursuant to section 5725.20 of the Revised Code. (B) The treasurer of state shall collect, and the taxpayer shall pay, all taxes levied under section 5725.18 of the Revised Code and any interest applicable thereto. Payments may shall be made electronically or by any other means authorized as prescribed by the treasurer of state. Whenever the superintendent of insurance submits an electronic call for data, the treasurer of state shall electronically submit to the superintendent the data requested, including the amount of taxes collected and the name of the domestic insurance company from whom collected. The treasurer of state may adopt rules concerning the methods and timeliness of payments under this division. (C) Each tax bill issued pursuant to this section shall separately reflect the taxes due, interest, if any, due date, and any other information considered necessary. The last day on which payment may be made without penalty shall be the fifteenth day of June, unless that day is not a business day as defined in section 5709.40 of the Revised Code, in which case the payment may be made on the next business day. The treasurer of state shall issue the tax bill to the taxpayer electronically through the department of insurance's web site. The treasurer of state shall refund taxes as provided in this section, but no refund shall be made to a taxpayer having a delinquent claim certified pursuant to this section that remains unpaid. The treasurer of state may consult the attorney general regarding such claims. Refunds shall be paid from the tax refund fund created by section 5703.052 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) Unless an exigency exists, the treasurer of state shall issue a tax bill within twenty days after receipt of an assessment certified by the superintendent of insurance under section 5725.20 of the Revised Code, but if such assessment reflects a late filed tax return, the treasurer of state shall add interest as provided in division (A) of section 5725.221 of the Revised Code and issue a tax bill. In the case of an exigency, the treasurer of state shall issue the tax bill as soon as possible and may extend the due date for payment of the tax prescribed by division (C) of this section. (2) After receipt of any amended or final assessment of taxes received from the superintendent of insurance pursuant to section 5725.20 of the Revised Code, the treasurer of state shall ascertain the difference between the total taxes computed on such assessment and the total taxes computed on the most recent assessment certified for the same tax year. If the difference is a deficiency and that deficiency is greater than one dollar, the treasurer of state shall add interest as provided in division (B)(1) of section 5725.221 of the Revised Code and issue a tax bill, with payment due thirty days after the date of the bill is issued. If the difference is an excess of more than one dollar, the treasurer of state shall add interest as provided in division (B)(2) of section 5725.221 of the Revised Code and certify the name of the taxpayer and the amount to be refunded to the director of budget and management for payment to the taxpayer. If the taxpayer has a deficiency for one tax year and an excess for another tax year, or any combination thereof for more than two tax years, the treasurer of state may determine the net result after adding interest, if applicable, and, depending on if such result is greater than one dollar, proceed to issue a tax bill or certify a refund, as applicable. (E) Except as otherwise provided in this division, the treasurer of state may cancel a debt owed to the state arising from the tax imposed by section 5725.18 of the Revised Code, including any interest arising from such tax, if the total amount of the debt does not exceed fifty dollars. The treasurer of state shall not cancel any debt that has been certified to the attorney general under division (F) of this section. (F) If a taxpayer fails to pay all taxes and interest, if any, on or before the due date shown on the tax bill issued by the treasurer of state, and if that unpaid amount has not been canceled pursuant to division (E) of this section, the treasurer of state shall add a penalty equal to five hundred dollars for each month the taxpayer fails to pay all taxes and interest due. The treasurer of state may add an additional penalty, not to exceed ten per cent of the taxes and interest due, if the taxpayer fails to demonstrate that the taxpayer made a good faith effort to pay all taxes and interest on or before the due date shown on the tax bill. The Unless a delinquent amount is canceled pursuant to division (E) of this section, the treasurer of state shall prepare a delinquent claim for each tax bill on which penalties were added and certify such claims to the attorney general for collection. The attorney general shall transmit a copy of each claim certified by the treasurer of state to the superintendent of insurance. For each claim certified by the treasurer of state, the attorney general shall proceed to collect the delinquent taxes, penalties, and interest thereon in the manner prescribed by law. (G) Whenever the superintendent of insurance submits an electronic call for data, the treasurer of state shall electronically submit to the superintendent the data requested, including the amount of taxes collected and the name of the domestic insurance company from whom the tax is collected. Sec. 5725.23. Taxes, interest, and penalties may be recovered from a delinquent domestic insurance company or person in an action brought in the name of the state in the court of common pleas of Franklin county or any county in which such company or person has an office or place of business, and such court shall have jurisdiction of such action regardless of the amount involved. The attorney general, on request of the superintendent of insurance or tax commissionertreasurer of state, shall institute such action in the court of common pleas of Franklin county or any other county the superintendent or commissioner attorney general directs. In any such action, it shall be sufficient to allege that the tax, interest, and penalty sought to be recovered stand charged on the tax list of domestic insurance company franchise taxes in the office of the treasurer of state and have been unpaid for a period of forty-five days after having been placed thereon. Sums recovered in any such action shall be paid into the state treasury and distributed as provided in section 5725.24 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5729.05. On or before the fifteenth day of October each year, each foreign insurance company shall pay to the treasurer of state an amount equal to one-half of the previous calendar year's tax, before credits, which was assessed and paid under section 3737.71 of the Revised Code and this chapter. This payment shall be considered as a partial payment of the tax upon the business done in this state during the calendar year in which the payment date provided by this paragraph is contained. Payments shall be made electronically as prescribed by the treasurer of state. The treasurer of state may adopt rules concerning the methods and timeliness of payments under this section. At the time of filing its annual statement, each foreign insurance company shall pay to the treasurer of state the tax assessable under section 3737.71 of the Revised Code and this chapter, calculated by such company from such annual statement. The company may deduct the part of such tax already paid as a partial payment. The superintendent shall determine the correctness of the reports and statements of insurance companies, compute the annual tax, and, on or before the fifteenth day of May, prepare and furnish to the treasurer of state lists of all taxable companies, showing as to each company the whole amount of the annual tax computed by the superintendent. The treasurer of state, after deducting the tax already paid, shall promptly notify each such company of any amount due, which amount shall be paid by each such company to the treasurer of state by the fifteenth day of June next succeeding. If a company has for any reason overpaid or was illegally or erroneously assessed or charged for collection a larger amount of tax than its annual tax as computed by the superintendent of insurance and an application for refund was timely filed under section 5729.102 of the Revised Code, a refund of the excess amount shall be paid from the tax refund fund created by section 5703.052 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5729.10. If a company fails to pay the tax levied by section 5729.03 of the Revised Code, or to make any partial payment thereof as required by law after a statement thereof has been made and mailed to it, or if the annual statement required by law to be made by it is false or incorrect, the superintendent of insurance may revoke the license of such company doing business in this state. Upon failure to pay the tax or to make partial payment thereof according to law, the treasurer of state shall certify that fact the tax liability and any related interest and penalties to the attorney general, who shall thereupon begin an action against the company in the court of common pleas of Franklin county, or any other county the attorney general elects, to recover the amount of the tax. If such company ceases to do business in this state, it shall thereupon make a report to the superintendent of the gross amount of premiums not theretofore reported as provided in section 5729.02 or 5729.04 of the Revised Code received by it from policies covering risks within this state prior to such discontinuance of business, after deducting return premiums and considerations received for reinsurance not theretofore so reported, and shall forthwith pay to the treasurer of state a like per cent of tax thereon. Sec. 5739.17. (A) No person shall engage in making retail sales subject to a tax imposed by or pursuant to section 5739.02, 5739.021, 5739.023, or 5739.026 of the Revised Code as a business without having a license therefor, except as otherwise provided in divisions (A)(1), (2), and (3) of this section. (1) In the dissolution of a partnership by death, the surviving partner may operate under the license of the partnership for a period of sixty days. (2) The heirs or legal representatives of deceased persons, and receivers and trustees in bankruptcy, appointed by any competent authority, may operate under the license of the person so succeeded in possession. (3) Two or more persons who are not partners may operate a single place of business under one license. In such case neither the retirement of any such person from business at that place of business, nor the entrance of any person, under an existing arrangement, shall affect the license or require the issuance of a new license, unless the person retiring from the business is the individual named on the vendor's license. Except as otherwise provided in this section, each applicant for a license shall make out and deliver to the county auditor of each county in which the applicant desires to engage in business, upon a blank to be furnished by such auditor for that purpose, a statement showing the name of the applicant, each place of business in the county where the applicant will make retail sales, the nature of the business, and any other information the tax commissioner reasonably prescribes in the form of a statement prescribed by the commissioner. At the time of making the application, the applicant shall pay into the county treasury a license fee in the sum of fifty dollars for each fixed place of business in the county that will be the situs of retail sales. Upon receipt of the application and exhibition of the county treasurer's receipt, showing the payment of the license fee, the county auditor shall issue to the applicant a license for each fixed place of business designated in the application, authorizing the applicant to engage in business at that location. The county auditor shall transmit remit twenty-five dollars of each license fee to the treasurer of state attorney general for deposit into the state treasury to the credit of the organized crime commission fund for the purposes specified in section 177.011 of the Revised Code. The remaining twenty-five dollars of each license fee shall be credited to the general fund of the county. (B) If a vendor's identity changes, the vendor shall apply for a new license. If a vendor wishes to move an existing fixed place of business to a new location within the same county, the vendor shall obtain a new vendor's license or submit a request to the commissioner to transfer the existing vendor's license to the new location. When the new location has been verified as being within the same county, the commissioner shall authorize the transfer and notify the county auditor of the change of location. If a vendor wishes to move an existing fixed place of business to another county, the vendor's license shall not transfer and the vendor shall obtain a new vendor's license from the county in which the business is to be located. The form of the license shall be prescribed by the commissioner. The fees collected shall be credited as specified in division (A)(3) of this section. If a vendor fails to notify the commissioner of a change of location of its fixed place of business or that its business has closed, the commissioner may cancel the vendor's license if ordinary mail sent to the location shown on the license is returned because of an undeliverable address. (C) The commissioner may establish or participate in a registration system whereby any vendor may obtain a vendor's license by submitting to the commissioner a vendor's license application and a license fee of fifty dollars for each fixed place of business at which the vendor intends to make retail sales. Under this registration system, the commissioner shall issue a vendor's license to the applicant on behalf of the county auditor of the county in which the applicant desires to engage in business, and shall forward a copy of the application and license fee to that county. Twenty-five dollars of each license fee received by the commissioner for the issuance of vendor's licenses shall be deposited into the vendor's license application fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. The remaining twenty-five dollars of each license fee shall be deposited into the organized crime commission fund for the purposes specified in section 177.011 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall certify to the director of budget and management within ten business days after the close of a month the license fees to be transmitted to each county from the vendor's license application fund for vendor's license applications received by the commissioner during that month. License fees transmitted to a county for which payment was not received by the commissioner may be netted against a future distribution to that county, including distributions made pursuant to section 5739.21 of the Revised Code. A vendor that makes retail sales subject to tax under Chapter 5739. of the Revised Code pursuant to a permit issued by the division of liquor control shall obtain a vendor's license in the identical name and for the identical address as shown on the permit. Except as otherwise provided in this section, if a vendor has no fixed place of business and sells from a vehicle, each vehicle intended to be used within a county constitutes a place of business for the purpose of this section. (D) As used in this section, "transient vendor" means any person who makes sales of tangible personal property from vending machines located on land owned by others, who leases titled motor vehicles, titled watercraft, or titled outboard motors, who effectuates leases that are taxed according to division (A)(2) of section 5739.02 of the Revised Code, or who, in the usual course of the person's business, transports inventory, stock of goods, or similar tangible personal property to a temporary place of business or temporary exhibition, show, fair, flea market, or similar event in a county in which the person has no fixed place of business, for the purpose of making retail sales of such property. A "temporary place of business" means any public or quasi-public place including, but not limited to, a hotel, rooming house, storeroom, building, part of a building, tent, vacant lot, railroad car, or motor vehicle that is temporarily occupied for the purpose of making retail sales of goods to the public. A place of business is not temporary if the same person conducted business at the place continuously for more than six months or occupied the premises as the person's permanent residence for more than six months, or if the person intends it to be a fixed place of business. Any transient vendor, in lieu of obtaining a vendor's license under division (A) of this section for counties in which the transient vendor has no fixed place of business, may apply to the tax commissioner, on a form prescribed by the commissioner, for a transient vendor's license. The transient vendor's license authorizes the transient vendor to make retail sales in any county in which the transient vendor does not maintain a fixed place of business. Any holder of a transient vendor's license shall not be required to obtain a separate vendor's license from the county auditor in that county. Upon the commissioner's determination that an applicant is a transient vendor, the applicant shall pay a license fee in the amount of fifty dollars, at which time the tax commissioner shall issue the license. Twenty-five dollars of that license fee shall be deposited into the organized crime commission fund for the purposes specified in section 177.011 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner may require a vendor to be licensed as a transient vendor if, in the opinion of the commissioner, such licensing is necessary for the efficient administration of the tax. Any holder of a valid transient vendor's license may make retail sales at a temporary place of business or temporary exhibition, show, fair, flea market, or similar event, held anywhere in the state without complying with any provision of section 311.37 of the Revised Code. Any holder of a valid vendor's license may make retail sales as a transient vendor at a temporary place of business or temporary exhibition, show, fair, flea market, or similar event held in any county in which the vendor maintains a fixed place of business for which the vendor holds a vendor's license without obtaining a transient vendor's license. (E) Any vendor who is issued a license pursuant to this section shall display the license or a copy of it prominently, in plain view, at every place of business of the vendor. (F) No owner, organizer, or promoter who operates a fair, flea market, show, exhibition, convention, or similar event at which transient vendors are present shall fail to keep a comprehensive record of all such vendors, listing the vendor's name, permanent address, vendor's license number, and the type of goods sold. Such records shall be kept for four years and shall be open to inspection by the commissioner. (G) The commissioner may issue additional types of licenses if required to efficiently administer the tax imposed by this chapter. Sec. 5747.51. (A) On or before the twenty-fifth day of July of each year, the tax commissioner shall make and certify to the county auditor of each county an estimate of the amount of the local government fund to be allocated to the undivided local government fund of each county for the ensuing calendar year, adjusting the total as required to account for subdivisions receiving local government funds under section 5747.502 of the Revised Code. (B) At each annual regular session of the county budget commission convened pursuant to section 5705.27 of the Revised Code, each auditor shall present to the commission the certificate of the commissioner, the annual tax budget and estimates, and the records showing the action of the commission in its last preceding regular session. The commission, after extending to the representatives of each subdivision an opportunity to be heard, under oath administered by any member of the commission, and considering all the facts and information presented to it by the auditor, shall determine the amount of the undivided local government fund needed by and to be apportioned to each subdivision for current operating expenses, as shown in the tax budget of the subdivision. This determination shall be made pursuant to divisions (C) to (I) of this section, unless the commission has provided for a formula pursuant to section 5747.53 of the Revised Code. The commissioner shall reduce the amount of funds from the undivided local government fund to a subdivision required to receive reduced funds under section 5747.502 of the Revised Code. Nothing in this section prevents the budget commission, for the purpose of apportioning the undivided local government fund, from inquiring into the claimed needs of any subdivision as stated in its tax budget, or from adjusting claimed needs to reflect actual needs. For the purposes of this section, "current operating expenses" means the lawful expenditures of a subdivision, except those for permanent improvements and except payments for interest, sinking fund, and retirement of bonds, notes, and certificates of indebtedness of the subdivision. (C) The commission shall determine the combined total of the estimated expenditures, including transfers, from the general fund and any special funds other than special funds established for road and bridge; street construction, maintenance, and repair; state highway improvement; and gas, water, sewer, and electric public utilities operated by a subdivision, as shown in the subdivision's tax budget for the ensuing calendar year. (D) From the combined total of expenditures calculated pursuant to division (C) of this section, the commission shall deduct the following expenditures, if included in these funds in the tax budget: (1) Expenditures for permanent improvements as defined in division (E) of section 5705.01 of the Revised Code; (2) In the case of counties and townships, transfers to the road and bridge fund, and in the case of municipalities, transfers to the street construction, maintenance, and repair fund and the state highway improvement fund; (3) Expenditures for the payment of debt charges; (4) Expenditures for the payment of judgments. (E) In addition to the deductions made pursuant to division (D) of this section, revenues accruing to the general fund and any special fund considered under division (C) of this section from the following sources shall be deducted from the combined total of expenditures calculated pursuant to division (C) of this section: (1) Taxes levied within the ten-mill limitation, as defined in section 5705.02 of the Revised Code; (2) The budget commission allocation of estimated county public library fund revenues to be distributed pursuant to section 5747.48 of the Revised Code; (3) Estimated unencumbered balances as shown on the tax budget as of the thirty-first day of December of the current year in the general fund, but not any estimated balance in any special fund considered in division (C) of this section; (4) Revenue, including transfers, shown in the general fund and any special funds other than special funds established for road and bridge; street construction, maintenance, and repair; state highway improvement; and gas, water, sewer, and electric public utilities, from all other sources except those that a subdivision receives from an additional tax or service charge voted by its electorate or receives from special assessment or revenue bond collection. For the purposes of this division, where the charter of a municipal corporation prohibits the levy of an income tax, an income tax levied by the legislative authority of such municipal corporation pursuant to an amendment of the charter of that municipal corporation to authorize such a levy represents an additional tax voted by the electorate of that municipal corporation. For the purposes of this division, any measure adopted by a board of county commissioners pursuant to section 322.02, 4504.02, or 5739.021 of the Revised Code, including those measures upheld by the electorate in a referendum conducted pursuant to section 322.021, 4504.021, or 5739.022 of the Revised Code, shall not be considered an additional tax voted by the electorate. Money in a reserve balance account established by a county, township, or municipal corporation under section 5705.13 of the Revised Code shall not be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under division (E)(3) or (4) of this section. Money in a reserve balance account established by a township under section 5705.132 of the Revised Code shall not be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under division (E)(3) or (4) of this section. If a county, township, or municipal corporation has created and maintains a nonexpendable trust fund under section 5705.131 of the Revised Code, the principal of the fund, and any additions to the principal arising from sources other than the reinvestment of investment earnings arising from such a fund, shall not be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under division (E)(3) or (4) of this section. Only investment earnings arising from investment of the principal or investment of such additions to principal may be considered an unencumbered balance or revenue under those divisions. (F) The total expenditures calculated pursuant to division (C) of this section, less the deductions authorized in divisions (D) and (E) of this section, shall be known as the "relative need" of the subdivision, for the purposes of this section. (G) The budget commission shall total the relative need of all participating subdivisions in the county, and shall compute a relative need factor by dividing the total estimate of the undivided local government fund by the total relative need of all participating subdivisions. (H) The relative need of each subdivision shall be multiplied by the relative need factor to determine the proportionate share of the subdivision in the undivided local government fund of the county; provided, that the maximum proportionate share of a county shall not exceed the following maximum percentages of the total estimate of the undivided local government fund governed by the relationship of the percentage of the population of the county that resides within municipal corporations within the county to the total population of the county as reported in the reports on population in Ohio by the department of development as of the twentieth day of July of the year in which the tax budget is filed with the budget commission: 1 2 A Percentage of municipal population within the county: Percentage share of the county shall not exceed: B Less than forty-one per cent Sixty per cent C Forty-one per cent or more but less than eighty-one per cent Fifty per cent D Eighty-one per cent or more Thirty per cent Where the proportionate share of the county exceeds the limitations established in this division, the budget commission shall adjust the proportionate shares determined pursuant to this division so that the proportionate share of the county does not exceed these limitations, and it shall increase the proportionate shares of all other subdivisions on a pro rata basis. In counties having a population of less than one hundred thousand, not less than ten per cent shall be distributed to the townships therein. (I) The proportionate share of each subdivision in the undivided local government fund determined pursuant to division (H) of this section for any calendar year shall not be less than the product of the average of the percentages of the undivided local government fund of the county as apportioned to that subdivision for the calendar years 1968, 1969, and 1970, multiplied by the total amount of the undivided local government fund of the county apportioned pursuant to former section 5739.23 of the Revised Code for the calendar year 1970. For the purposes of this division, the total apportioned amount for the calendar year 1970 shall be the amount actually allocated to the county in 1970 from the state collected intangible tax as levied by section 5707.03 of the Revised Code and distributed pursuant to section 5725.24 of the Revised Code, plus the amount received by the county in the calendar year 1970 pursuant to division (B)(1) of former section 5739.21 of the Revised Code, and distributed pursuant to former section 5739.22 of the Revised Code. If the total amount of the undivided local government fund for any calendar year is less than the amount of the undivided local government fund apportioned pursuant to former section 5739.23 of the Revised Code for the calendar year 1970, the minimum amount guaranteed to each subdivision for that calendar year pursuant to this division shall be reduced on a basis proportionate to the amount by which the amount of the undivided local government fund for that calendar year is less than the amount of the undivided local government fund apportioned for the calendar year 1970. (J) On the basis of such apportionment, the county auditor shall compute the percentage share of each such subdivision in the undivided local government fund and shall at the same time certify to the tax commissioner the percentage share of the county as a subdivision. No payment shall be made from the undivided local government fund, except in accordance with such percentage shares. Within ten days after the budget commission has made its apportionment, whether conducted pursuant to section 5747.51 or 5747.53 of the Revised Code, the auditor shall publish a list of the subdivisions and the amount each is to receive from the undivided local government fund and the percentage share of each subdivision, in a newspaper or newspapers of countywide circulation, and send a copy of such allocation to the tax commissioner. The county auditor shall also send a copy of such allocation by ordinary or electronic mail to the fiscal officer of each subdivision entitled to participate in the allocation of the undivided local government fund of the county. This copy shall constitute the official notice of the commission action referred to in section 5705.37 of the Revised Code. All money received into the treasury of a subdivision from the undivided local government fund in a county treasury shall be paid into the general fund and used for the current operating expenses of the subdivision. If a municipal corporation maintains a municipal university, such municipal university, when the board of trustees so requests the legislative authority of the municipal corporation, shall participate in the money apportioned to such municipal corporation from the total local government fund, however created and constituted, in such amount as requested by the board of trustees, provided such sum does not exceed nine per cent of the total amount paid to the municipal corporation. If any public official fails to maintain the records required by sections 5747.50 to 5747.55 of the Revised Code or by the rules issued by the tax commissioner, the auditor of state, or the treasurer of state pursuant to such sections, or fails to comply with any law relating to the enforcement of such sections, the local government fund money allocated to the county may be withheld until such time as the public official has complied with such sections or such law or the rules issued pursuant thereto. Sec. 6101.51. The treasurer of a conservancy district, at the time of taking office, shall execute to the district and deliver to the president of the board of directors of the district, a bond with good and sufficient sureties, to be approved by the board, conditioned that the treasurer shall account for and pay over as required by law, and as ordered by the board, all money received by the treasurer on the sale of bonds and notes or from any other source, that the treasurer only shall deliver the bonds and notes to the purchasers under and according to the terms prescribed in this section and section 6101.50 of the Revised Code, and that, when ordered by the board to do so, the treasurer shall return to the board, duly canceled, any bonds and notes not sold, which bonds and notes shall remain in the custody of the board, which shall produce them for inspection or for use as evidence whenever and wherever legally requested to do so. The cost of the bond of the treasurer shall be paid by the board from the funds of the district. The board shall make appropriations at the proper time for the payment of the maturing bonds and notes of the district and the interest payments coming due on all bonds and notes sold, and the treasurer of the district shall place sufficient funds at the place of payment to pay them. If proper appropriations are not made by the board as provided in this section, the treasurer of the district of the treasurer's own accord shall place funds at the place of payment and report that action to the next meeting of the board. The canceled bonds and coupons, receipted notes, and receipts of the treasurer shall be evidence of such payment. The successor in office of any treasurer of a conservancy district is not entitled to take over the assets of the treasury until the treasurer has complied with this section. Moneys derived from the sale of bonds and from all other sources shall be deposited by the treasurer In accordance with sections 135.01 to 135.21 of the Revised Code. The funds derived from the sale of any of the bonds and notes shall be used only for paying the cost of the properties, works, and improvements and costs, expenses, fees, and salaries authorized by law. The district may secure the payment of loans from the United States government in the same manner as it may secure the payment of bonds, and the board may make any necessary regulations to provide for that payment. A party who has not sought a remedy against any proceeding under this chapter, until bonds or notes have been sold or the work constructed, cannot for any cause have an injunction against the collection of assessments for the payment of the bonds or notes. When consideration for bonds is received by the district, the bonds shall not be invalid for any irregularity or defect in the proceedings for their issuance and sale, and shall be incontestable in the hands of bona fide purchasers or holders of the bonds for value. No proceedings in respect to the issuance of any bonds are necessary except as required by this chapter. Notwithstanding any other provision of this section governing the deposit or investment of moneys of a conservancy district, the board of directors of a district, for the purpose of providing for the investment of the moneys on the district's behalf, may order the treasurer of the district to invest moneys of the district in the Ohio subdivision's fund authorized to be created under section 135.45 113.07 of the Revised Code. Any such investments in the fund are subject to and governed by that section and rules adopted under it. Section 2. That existing sections 113.05, 113.051, 113.09, 113.16, 117.44, 118.05, 120.52, 128.54, 135.01, 135.032, 135.14, 135.143, 135.22, 135.35, 135.45, 135.451, 151.01, 164.09, 183.51, 317.36, 319.63, 321.46, 321.47, 323.611, 956.13, 1557.03, 3307.12, 3333.374, 3334.08, 3334.11, 3705.242, 3737.945, 3953.231, 4511.19, 4705.09, 4705.10, 5528.54, 5725.22, 5725.23, 5729.05, 5729.10, 5739.17, 5747.51, and 6101.51 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 113.10 and 113.43 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. Section 4511.19 of the Revised Code is presented in this act as a composite of the section as amended by both H.B. 37 and S.B. 100 of the 135th General Assembly. The General Assembly, applying the principle stated in division (B) of section 1.52 of the Revised Code that amendments are to be harmonized and reconciled if reasonably capable of simultaneous operation, finds that the composite is the resulting version of the section in effect prior to the effective date of the section as presented in this act.